BOOK I.
Not to the imbattled field
Shall the achievements of the peaceful gown
The green immortal crown
Of valour, or the songs of conquest yield.
Not Fairfax wildly bold,
While bare of crest he hew'd his fatal way
Through Nasehy's firm array,
To heavier dangers did his breast oppose
Than Pym's free virtue chose
When the proud force of Strafford he controll'd.
Akenside
.
CHAPTER I.
Can this be HE
That hath no privilege of gentle birth,
Beauty, nor grace, nor utterance sublime
Of words persuasive, nor the blood-bought skill
That wins i' the foughten field?
But
even as you will, fair sireven as you
will! Though, an' you ride for Huntingdon this
night, and wish not, ere it be two hours the later,
that you had tarried here at the White Dragon,
then am not I called Walter Danforth, nor have I
drawn good ale in Royston these forty years and
better.
With this prophetic sentence did the lord of cup
and can wind up a long narration of roads
impassable
,
and bridges broken, and all the moving
accidents
of flood and field, with which, according
to time-honoured usage among the heroes of the
spigot, he was endeavouring to beguile the lated
wayfarer. In the present instance, however, it
would seem that the ominous warnings of the
worthy
Boniface were destined to be of none effect,
for with a cheery smile the traveller answered
'Tis like enough, good host of mine'tis like
enoughso all the cates of the White Dragon
vie with this puissant Bourdeaux; and, as he
spoke, he proffered to the landlord's grasp the
mighty flagon of bright pewter, which, despite his
eulogy, he had left still mantling with its generous
liquor,but, were the venture deeper, I must on
to-night; and, in good sooth, too often have I jour
neyed through the midnight passes of the wild
Abruzzi
,
and the yet wilder Pyrenean hills of Spain,
to ponder gravely on a late ride or a sprinkled
doublet among these chalky wolds of Hertford
shire.
Ay! were that all returned the other,
heaving a long breath after the potent draught
with which he had exhausted the flagon, and
eying
wistfully the coins which had dropped with so
sweet a jingle into his greasy palm,Ay, were
that allbut there are worse customers on
Ermine-street
than darkness, or storm either, though the
clouds be mustering so black in the west yonder,
over the woods of Potton. Wise men ride not
forth nowadays an hour after sundown, nor
earlier
,
save in company.
Then must Old England be sore changed since
last I left her, replied the traveller, a shade of
thought or sorrow, for it might be either, crossing
his features, and not entirely effaced by the frank
smile which followed it. And if she be he
paused, unwilling, as brave men ever are, to utter
sentiments which might, however justified by the
occasion, sound boastfully.
And if she be? inquired the interested
Walter
,
seeing that his guest hesitated to complete his
sentence, and if she be sore changed?
Why, then hath brown Bess borne me though
worse frays than I am like to meet, I trow, on this
side Huntingdon; nor will it be small peril that
shall arrest her now; and so good e'en, fair
landlord
.
A bold bird and a braggart! muttered the
disconcerted
publican, as the horseman, giving the
spur to the highbred mare of which he had just
spoken, rode briskly off. But if he meet with
those I wot of, he may yet crow craven.
Who those were to whom his words so
pointedly
alluded, is not perhaps a question of more than
ordinary moment, unless it be from the vast
conception
of their prowess which appears to have
been entertained by the landlord of the White
Dragon; for, in truth, the gentleman who had
earned his ill-will merely by a natural reluctance
to tarry in Royston when his occasions called him
elsewhere, was of very different mould from one of
whom it would be said that he was like to fall an
easy or unresisting prey to any who should dare
dispute his progress. Removed alike from the
greenness of inconsiderate youth and from the
inactivity
of an advanced age, the rider might be
looked upon as exhibiting a specimen of manhood,
in the full vigour of its endowments, both mental
and corporeal, as fair as is permitted by the
imperfections
of humanity. Considerably above the
ordinary
height of men, broad-shouldered,
deep-chested
,
and thin-flanked, he sat his charger with
an ease and firmness resulting more from natural
grace and flexibility of limb than from the
practised
art of the mange. His eye was clear and
even quick, though thought and calmness seemed
to belong, rather than energy or fire, to its general
expression,qualities belied neither by the broad
imaginative forehead, nor by the firm and slightly
compressed outline of his chiselled lips. He wore
a small mustache, but neither beard nor whiskers,
although both these were common in the last years
of the unhappy monarch who at that time swayed
the destinies of England. His hair, as was the
wont among the higher classes of society, flowed
in loose curls, trained with peculiar care, far down
the neck and over the collar of the doublet, while
a single ringlet, longer and more assiduously
cherished
than the rest, seemed to indicate that the
wearer was not of one mind with the pamphlet
lately published by the notorious Master Prynne
on the unloveliness of love-locks. The dress
of this cavalier, a loose velvet jerkin of that
peculiar
shade which, from being the favourite colour of
the greatest painter of his day, has been dignified
with the immortal title of Vandyke, was slashed
and broidered with black lace and satin; tight
breeches of buff leather, guarded with tawny silk,
high boots, and massive spurs, completed his attire;
all save a broad-leafed hat of dark gray beaver,
with one black ostrich feather drooping from the
clasp which held it over the left eyebrow. His
military cloak of sable cloth and velvet was
buckled
to the croup of his war-saddle, while from
beneath the housings of the bow peered out the
heavy pistols, which had not long before
supplanted
the lance as the peculiar weapon of the
horseman
.
A long rapier, with its steel scabbard and
basket-hilt of silver delicately carved, hung from a
shoulder-scarf of the same colour with his doublet,
matched by a poniard of yet more costly fabric in
his Cordovan leather girdle.
When it is added that the mare which he had
styled brown Bess was an animal that might be
pronounced unrivalled for the rare union she
displayed
of strength and beauty, of English bone and
high Arabian bloodthe latter manifested in the
clean limb, full eye, and coat glancing like polished
copper to the sunlightnaught will be wanting to
the picture of the traveller who was now
journeying
right onward, undismayed, if not incredulous of
all that he had heard, across the bleak and barren
hills which skirt the southern verge of
Cambridgeshire
.
Vol. I.B
The season was that usually the most delicious
of the English yearthe bright and golden days
of early autumnwhen the promises of spring and
summer are fulfilled in the rustling harvest-field
and the rich orchard, and before the thoughts of
change, decay, and death are forced upon the mind
by the sere leaf and withered herbage. The day
had been mild and calm, and, though evening was
far advanced, the sun was still shooting his slant
rays over the rounded summits and grassy slopes
of the low hills through which the ancient Roman
way holds its undeviating course. Ere long,
however
,
the clouds of which the landlord had spoken
as gathering so darkly to the westward, though at
that time visible only in a narrow streak along the
edge of the horizon, began to rise in towering
masses, until the light of the declining day-god
was first changed to a dark and lurid crimson, and
then wholly intercepted. After a while the wind,
which had been slight and southerly, veered round
and blew in fitful squalls, now whirling the dust
and stubble high into the air, and again subsiding
into a stillness that from the contrast seemed
unnatural
.
Such was the aspect of the night when
the sun set, and the little light which had hitherto
struggled through intervals of the increasing
storm-cloud
,
waned rapidly to almost utter darkness. To
render the traveller's position yet less enviable, he
had already passed the open country, and was now
involved in the mazes of scattered woodland, which
in the seventeenth century overspread so large a
portion
of that country. The way too, which had thus
far been firm and in good order, now running
between
deep hollow banks, resembled rather a
water-course
deserted by its torrent than a public
throughfare
;
so that his progress was both slow and
painful
until he reached the banks of the Camat that
place, as throughout much of its course, a strong
and turbid stream, wheeling along in sullen eddies
between shores of soft black loam. Here daylight
utterly deserted him, its last glimpse barely
sufficing
to show that the bridge had been carried away,
and that the river was apparently unfordable; since
a miry track wandered away from the brink to the
left hand; as though in search of a place where it
might pass the current, and resume its natural
direction
to the northward. While he was considering
what course it would be most advisable that he
should pursue, a few large heavy drops of rain
plashed on the surface of the gloomy stream,
warning
the stranger to hasten his decision. Then, as
he turned to follow, as best he might, the devious
and uncertain path before him, the windows of the
heavens were opened, and down came the thick
shower, pattering on the thirsty earth, and lashing
the river's bosom into a sheet of whitened spray.
Thoroughly drenched, and almost hopeless of
recovering
the true direction of his journey until the
return of daylight, it was yet not a part of that
man's character to hesitate, much less to falter or
despair. Having once determined what it would
be for the best to do, he went right onward to his
purpose, though it oftentimes required the full
exercise
of spur and rein to force the gallant animal
which he bestrode against the furious gusts and
pelting storm. For a weary hour or more he
plodded
onward, feeling his way, as it were, step by
step, and guided only by the flashes of broad
lightning
which from time to time glared over the
desolate
scene, with an intensity that merely served to
render the succeeding gloom more dreary. At
length, by the same wild illumination, he
discovered
that his path once more turned northward,
sinking
abruptly to the verge of that black river. Of
the farther bank he could distinguish nothing; and
though for many minutes he awaited the return of
the electric light before attempting to stem the
unknown
ford, with that singular perversity which
even things inanimate and senseless at times seem
to exhibit, the flashes returned no more. Still no
word of impatience or profanity rose to his lip, as
he spurred the reluctant mare resolutely down the
steep descent, holding his pistols, which he had
drawn from their holsters, high above his head. At
the first plunge, as he had well expected, all foot-hold
was lost, and nothing remained but a perilous swim,
not without considerable risk of finding an
impracticable
bank at the farther side; but whether it was
the result of skill or of fortune, or, more probable
than either, a combination of the two, after a few
rough struggles and a scramble through the
tenacious
mire, horse and man stood in safety on the
northern verge. Not yet, however, could the
adventures
of that night be deemed at an end; for,
having once deviated from it during the hours of
darkness, it was no easy matter to recover the line
of the high road. The storm, it is true, after a
while abated; and the by-path into which he struck
was sufficiently hard to enable the cavalier to travel
at a pace more rapid than he had tried since
quitting
Royston; but notwithstanding this, so much
time had been lost, and so small did the prospect
seem of reaching his destination, or indeed any
other village at which to pass the night, that the
merciful rider was beginning to occupy himself
in searching for such temporary shelter as a
cattleshed
,
or the lee-side of some lonely haystack might
afford, when his eye was attracted by a distant
lightnow seen, now lost among the young
plantations
,
or scattered stripes of forest which
checkered
everywhere the scenery. It required but a
moment's
pause to discover that the light was in
motion
,
and at a smaller distance than he had at first
conjectured; and though there might have been
grounds for suspicion and distrust to the weak or
timid in the place and manner of its appearance,
quickening his pace to a gallop, and somewhat
altering
his course, he rode straight for the object.
Five minutes brought him to a bank and ditch,
evidently skirting the road of which he was in
quest; the clatter of the horse's hoofs as he leaped
the trifling obstacle, and landed safely on the rough
pavement of the Roman way, was, it should seem,
the first intimation of his approach that reached the
bearers of the light; for ere he could distinguish
more than the figures of two or three rude-looking
countrymen, one of them bearing on his shoulders
what resembled the carcass of a deer, it was either
extinguished altogether or suddenly veiled from
sight.
They are upon us, cried a hoarse voice,
shoot, Wilkin! and instantly the clang of a steel
crossbow, and the whistle of the heavy bolt, as it
narrowly missed the rider's ear, showed that the
mandate was complied with as promptly as
delivered
.
Hold! hold your hands! he shouted, or ye
will fare the worse. Ye know me not, nor care I
aught for ye.
Fare the worse, shall we? interrupted the
other,that shall we see anon. Come on, brave
boys, and down with this proud meddler! and
with a loud fierce cry, some six or seven ruffians,
as he judged from the sound of their footsteps,
rushed against him. In the moment which had
elapsed since the first outrage, he had prepared his
weapons, and was already on his guard; but it was
not destined that he should this time need their
service
;
B 2
for just as he reined up his steed, and
parried
the first blow aimed at him with a crowbar or a
quarterstaff, the quick tramp of coming horsemen
was heard upon the road behind him; and with
their swords drawn, as if excited by the shout of
the ruffians, two or three persons galloped rapidly
to his assistance.
What knaves be these? inquired a loud and
dissonant voice from the foremost of the
new-comers
,
as the cavalier fell back toward his welcome
rescuers. What knaves be these that raise this
coil on the highway?
Down with the thieving Girgashites! shouted
another of the riders, ere an answer could be
rendered
to the querist; and, at the word, he fired a
petronel at random, its momentary flash displaying
the marauders struggling, as best they might,
through a strong blackthorn fence, which parted the
road from a wild tract of coppice, glade, and
woodland
.
Deer-stealers, Master Oliver, he continued,
reslinging his now useless weapon, after the
herds of my Lord De la Warr. But I have scared
them for the nonce!
More shame to thee, Giles Overton, cried the
same voice which had first spoken, and more sin
likewise, to use the carnal weapon thus in
causeless
strife; setting the precious spirit of a being
like to, or it may well be better than thyself, upon
the darkling venture of chance-medley, and
bartering
a human life against the slaughter of a
valueless
and soulless beast. Go to, Giles Overton, see
that thou err not in the like sort again! But art
thou hurt, good sir? proceeded the speaker,
turning
in his saddle toward the traveller, for whose
safety he had come up so opportunely,or have
we, by the mercy of the Lord, who may in this
if it be not presumptuous in me, considering how
unprofitable I am, and the mean improvement of
my talent, so to judge of his workings
vouchsafe
to preserve thee for a chosen vessel. Have
we, I would say, come in season to protect thee
from these sons of Ammon?
Thanks to your timely aid, fair sir, replied
the cavalier, not a little astonished at the strange
address of his preserver; for he had but recently
returned to his native land after protracted absence,
and, at the time of his departure, the reign of the
saints had not yet commenced on earthI am
uninjured; and now, I pray you to increase yet
farther this your kindness, by informing me the
straightest road for Huntingdon; it cannot be, I
do suppose, far distant.
Good lacka stranger, by your questioning,
answered he who had been called Oliver;
Huntingdon
do I know right wellay! even as one
knoweth the tabernacle of his abode, and the
burial-place
of his fathers; but I profess to you that it is
distant by full thirteen miles, and those of sorry
road. But ride thou on with me to Bourne, some
three miles farther, and I will bestow thee at a
house where thou mayst tarry until mornthe
Fox Tavern, I would sayPhineas Goodenough,
my glove hath fallen; I pray thee reach it to me
a clean house, truly, kept by a worthy manyea,
verily, a good man, one that dwelleth in the fear
of the Lord alway.
A stranger am I doubtless, returned the other,
else had I not inquired of thee that which I then
had well known; and, of a truth, I know not now
that I can do aught better than to accept your
proffer
frankly as it is made!
Be it so! was the ready answer. Will it
please you to ride somewhat briskly; for myself, I
am bound an hour's ride farther to worshipful
Master
Pym's, nigh Caldecote!
Ha! Pym, the friend of Hampden and John
MiltonI knew not he lived hereabout, exclaimed
the cavalier.
And what knowest thou, so I may ask it,
queried Oliver, of Hampden or John Milton?
Truly, I took thee for a carnal-minded person;
but, of a surety, it is not for a man to judge!
For what it liked your wisdom to mistake me,
I know not; nor, to speak frankly, do I care
greatly
,
replied the other; but, to satisfy your
question
,
of Hampden I know nothing, save that the
mode of his resistance to that illegal claim of
ship-money
hath reached my ears, even where the
tongue of England would have sounded strangely.
John Milton, if it concerns you any thing to hear
of him, was, and that too for many months, my
chosen comrade of the road, and my most eloquent
tutorer in the classic lore of Italy!
In Italy, saidst thou? In Italy, and with John
Milton? answered Oliver, after a long and
meditative
pause; and, as he continued, his own voice had
lost much of its harshness, and his manner not a
little of its offensive peculiarity. A better
comrade
couldst thou not have chosen than that
pure-minded
Christian, that most zealous patriot. Verily,
I say to you, that, in consorting with that sanctified,
elected vessel, you must needs have imbibed some
draughts more worthy than the profane and carnal
lore of those benighted heathens, whose bestial
and idolatrous rites are even now to be found
corrupting
with their accursed stench the faith which
claims to be of Jesus, even as the stinking fly
poisoneth the salve of the mediciner. Verily I
will believe that he hath opened unto you the door
of that wisdom which is alone all in all! Ay! and
as I find you here returning hard upon his heels,
even as he hath of late returned from the city of
her that sitteth on the seven hills, clothed in the
purple of the harlot, may I not humbly hopeI
would sayconfidently trust, that you will also
draw the sword of truth to defend this
sore-aggrieved
and spirit-broken people from the
tyrannous
oppression of their rulers, and the
self-seeking
idolatries of those that sit in the high places of
the land!
Fair sir, replied the cavalier, you question
somewhat too closely; and converse, methinks, too
freely for a stranger. That I come, summoned
homeward by the rumour of these unhappy broils
between our sovereign and his parliament, is not
less true than that I care not either to conceal or to
deny it! Beyond thiswhat part soever I may
play in that which is to comepardon my
plainness
,
sir, I do not deem it wisdom to discourse
with a chance customer. Nor have I yet indeed
decided what that part shall be, until I search more
narrowly the grounds, and so find out my way
'twixt over license on the one hand, and, as it
seems to me, intemperance on the other, and too
fiery zeal!
Edgar Ardenne, returned the puritan, his
naturally harsh voice subsiding into a hollow
croak, Edgar Ardennefor I do know you,
though, as you have truly spoken me, a stranger
I tell you now, this nation totters on the brink
of a most strange and perilous convulsion! We
are the instrumentsvile instruments, it is true,
but still instrumentsin the hands of Him who
holds the end of all things. Watched have we,
and prayed; yea, wrestled with him in the spirit
for a sign, and lo! a sign was sent us. It may be
we shall achieve deliverance for our country
freedom
from corporeal chains and spiritual bondage!
It may be we shall fail, and, failing, seek the
shelter
of that New Jerusalem beyond the Western
Ocean, wherein there be no kings to lord it o'er
men's consciences, and to compel them how to
worship God! But fail we, or succeed, the sign
hath been given to us from on high, and therefore
shall we venture! and fail we, or succeedmark
my words, Edgar Ardenne, for thou shalt think on
them hereafterthy lot is cast with ours! Thy
spirit is of our order, thy heart
is
with us, and thy
tongue
shall be
, yea, and thy sword likewise!
How you have learned my name, I
comprehend
not, answered Ardenne, for so must he be
styled henceforth, veiling whatever of suspicion or
annoyance he might feel beneath the semblance of
a cold and dignified indifference; but, were it
worth the while, I could assure you that, in
learning
this, you have learned all! What part you play
in this wild drama,whether you be hypocrite or
zealot, patriot or traitor, I care nothing; but, if we
meet hereafter, you will learn that neither sophistry
nor canting can affect my head, nor the dark phrensy
of fanaticism reach my heart!
We
shall
meet, answered the stranger; we
shall
meet again, and shortly! and then shall you
too learn if I be saint or hypocriteif I be patriot
or traitor!and, above all, then shall you learn if,
in these things that I have spoken, I be a lying
prophet or a true! But lo you nowthis is the
Fox at Bourne, and here comes honest Langton, to
whose good offices I do commit you!
As he spoke, they drew up their horses before
the door of the little wayside hostelry, a low and
whitewashed tenement, imbosomed in deep
woodlands
,
and nestling, as it were, amid the verdant
foliage of jessamine and woodbine; while, warned
already of their coming by the clatter of hoofs and
the sound of voices, the puritanic person of mine
host, bearing on high a huge and smoky flambeau,
which poured its red light far into the bosom of
the darkness, stalked forth to meet them. On his
lean and starveling form, however, Ardenne cast
but a passing glance, being employed in
serutinizing
,
by the wild illumination which streamed full
upon them, the features of his singular companion;
who had paused for a moment to allow his horse to
drink, and to hold a whispered conversation with
the landlord. There was, however, nothing
familiar
to him, though he probed his memory to its
lowest depth of youthful recollections, in that
manly yet ungraceful figure, or in those
lineaments
,
harsh and ill-favoured to the verge of
downright
ugliness. Ill-favoured was that countenance
indeed, with its deeply-furrowed lines and its
sanguineous
colouring; its sunken eyes, twinkling
below the penthouse of the heavy matted brows;
and its nose, prominent, rubicund, and swollen.
Yet was there a world of thought in the expansive
temples and the massive foreheadan expression
of firmness that might restrain an empire in the
downward curve of the bold mouthand a general
air of high authority and of indomitable resolution
pervading the whole aspect of the man. The head
of this remarkable-looking individual, at a period
when the greatest attention was lavished on the
hair by all of gentle birth, was covered with coarse
locks, already streaked with gray, falling in long
disordered masses on either cheek, and down the
muscular short neck, from underneath a rusty
beaver, steeple-crowned and unadorned by
feather
,
loop, or tassel. Instead of the cravat of
Flanders
lace, he wore a narrow band of soiled and
rumpled linen; and his sword, a heavy iron-hilted
tuck, was not suspended from a scarf or
shoulderknot
,
but girt about his middle, over a doublet of
black serge, by a belt of calf-skin leather,
corresponding
to the material of his riding-boots, which
were pulled up above the knee to meet the loose
trunk hose, fashioned, as it would be supposed, by
some ill country tailor from the same unseemly
stuff with his cloak and doublet. The only part of
his appointments which would not have disgraced
the commonest gentleman was his horse, a tall
gray gelding of great power and not a little
breeding
;
yet even he was badly accoutred with mean
and sordid housings. Such was the appearance of
the person whose conversation had not been
listened
to by Edgar Ardenne without deep interest;
and noweven while he confessed to himself that
the man's frame and features entitled him to no
regard as a person of superior caste or bearing
there was still something in his air which produced
an indescribable effect on the mind of the cavalier,
forcing him, as it were, despite his senses, to admit
that he was in somewise remarkable, above, and at
the same time apart from, ordinary mortals, and not
unlike to one who might be indeed the mover of
great changes in the estate of nations.
While he was yet gazing on him with
ill-dissembled
curiosity, the stranger, in his loud hoarse
notes, bade him adieu, and, striking at once into a
rapid trot, was swallowed up with his companions
in the surrounding gloom. Edgar, after a fruitless
effort at ascertaining from the saintly and abstracted
publican the name and quality of his late
companion
,
applied himself to creature comforts, as the
landlord termed them, of a higher order, and to a
bed more neatly garnished, than he could have
augured from the lowly exterior of the village inn.
CHAPTER II.
A gentle being, delicately fair,
Full of soft fancies, timorous, and shy;
Yet high of purpose, and of soul so firm,
That sooner shall you the round world unsphere,
Than warp her from the conscious path of right.
A bright domestic goddess, formed to bless,
And sooth, and succouroh most meet to be
The shrined idol of a heart like his.
Two
days had elapsed, and the third was
already
drawing toward its close, since the
encounter
of the cavalier with his saintly ally; for the
sun, scarce elevated thrice the breadth of his own
disk above the horizon, was now almost
perceptibly
declining in the west, though he still darted
long pencilled rays of light athwart the landscape
from between the folds of gauze-like mist which
veiled his splendours from the eye. One of these
straggling beamswhile others might be
discerned
shedding their bright intelligence upon some
verdant slope or twinkling waterfall, thus rescued,
although miles away, from the hazy indistinctness
that steeped the distant hills, and rendered
prominent
,
like epochs marked by fame amid the gloom
of ages else forgottenone of these straggling
beams had found its way into a nook as sweet as
ever poet sung or fairy haunted. It was an angle
in one of those broad green lanes which form so
beautiful a feature in the rural scenery of England.
Carpeted with deep unfaded verdure, through
which meandered a faint wheel-track; bordered by
hedges so thick and tangled as to resemble natural
coppices rather than artificial fences; imbowered
Vol. I.C
by the fragrant honeysuckle, and spangled with the
dewy flowers of the yet sweeter eglantine; decked
with the golden blossoms of the broom, the
fringe-like
brachens, and the flaunting bells of the white
and crimson fox-gloves; canopied by the dense
umbrage of the broad-leaved sycamore, the
gnarled
and ivy-mantled oak, or the lighter and more
graceful ash; and watered by a tiny brooklet, that
stole along, now on one side, now on the other, of
the rarely-trodden pathhere tinkling over its
many-coloured pebbles with a mirthful music, there
silently reflecting the tufted rushes and the mossy
log that spanned its surface with a sylvan bridge
that solitary nook might well have furnished forth
a tiring-room for Shakspeare's wild Titania. Nor,
though the days of Puck and Oberon were already
numbered with the things that had been, did that
lone bower lack its presiding genius; for on a
trunk, cushioned with hoary lichens, and
overlooking
a crystal basin formed by the rill which
undermined
its tortuous roots, and had, perchance, in
bygone
ages, caused its decay and ruin, there sat a
female form, loveliest among the lovely, gazing, as
at first sight it seemed, Narcissus-like, upon her
watery image, but in truth so deeply buried in her
own imaginings that she was no less ignorant of
all she looked upon than was the senseless stump
on which she leaned so gracefully. She was a
girl perhaps of twenty summers; for, looking on
her, it had been impossible to reckon save by
summers
,
so sunny was the style of her young beauty.
On either side of her white and dazzling forehead,
ringlets in rich exuberance of the deepest auburn
so deep that, saving where they glittered
gold-like
in the sunshine, they might have been deemed
blackfell off behind her ears and wantoned down
her swan-like neck; while, in the luxury of calm
abandonment, her velvet hat, dropped by her side,
lay on the grass, its choice plumes ruffling the
mirror of the pool. Her eyes were bent so
steadfastly
upon the waters at her feet, that it was by
the long dark lashes only, pencilled in clear relief
against the delicate complexion of her cheek, that
they could be judged large, and suited to the
character
of her most eloquent features. Of an almost
marble paleness, with scarce a rosy trace to tell of
the pure blood which coursed so warmly through
those thousand azure channels that veined her neck
and bosom, there was yet a transparency, a
glowing
hue in her fair skin that spoke of all the lively
elasticity of health; while, to remove a doubt, if
doubt could have existed, the sweet curve of that
small mouth, wooingly prominent, was tinged with
the rich hue of the dark red carnation. Though
Grecian in their chiselled outlines, there yet was
more of intellect and energy in the expression of
her features than of that poetical repose which
forms the general character of the classic model.
Her shape, as she reclined along her rustic couch,
though of voluptuous roundness, was rather slight
than full; and the ankle, displayed somewhat too
liberally by the disordered draperies of her satin
riding-dress, was slender as a sylphid's limb, while
her dimpled chin was propped, in attitude of busy
thought, on so diminutive a hand as would alone
have proved her pedigree from the unconquered
race of Normandy. Nor was the attitude belied
by aught of consciousness or coquetry, for all
betokened
the deep hush of natural and unstudied
meditation. A beautiful white palfrey, with
decorated
rein and velvet housings, which stood unfettered
at her side, awaiting, docile and gentle creature,
the pleasure of his mistress, would stamp and toss
his head till the silver bits rang audibly, and
uttered
once or twice a tremulous impatient neigh,
unheeded
at the least, if not unheard. A vagrant
spaniel of the Blenheim breed, with soft dark eyes,
and ears that almost swept the groundone from
a number that had followed the fair girl, and now
dozed listlessly upon the grass around herhad
been for some time rustling among the dewy
bushes
,
and now sent forth a shrill and clamorous
yelping
,
as pheasant after pheasant whirred up on noisy
wings into the higher branches, whence they
crowed
,
with outstretched necks, defiance to their
powerless
assailant. Still there was no sign in the
demeanour
of the lady to indicate that she had
marked
the sounds, harmonizing as they did with the
spirit of the place and hour, and blending naturally
with the low of the distant cattle, the cawing of
the homeward rooks, and the continuous hum of
the myriad insect tribes which were still disporting
themselves in the September sunset, not the less
merrily that their little glass of life had already run
even to its latest sands. But anon a noise arose,
which, in itself by no means inharmonious, was
not so much attuned to the rural melodies around
but that it jarred discordantly on the ear. It was
the clear and powerful voice of a man, venting his
feelings as he rode alongfor at times the tramp
of a horse might be distinguished, when his hoof
struck upon harder soil than common, mingling
with the measured tones, as, perhaps unconscious
of his occupation, the rider recited aloud such
passages
from the high poets of the day as were
suggested
to his memory by all that met his senses.
At first the accents were indistinct from distance,
and their import quite inaudible; then, as the
speaker drew so nigh that his words might
partially
be understood, the voice ceased altogether;
but after a brief pause it again broke forth in the
pure poetry of Drummond.
Thrice happy he, who by some shady grove,
Far from the clamorous world, doth live his own,
Though solitary, who is not alone,
But doth converse with that eternal love:
O how more sweet is birds' harmonious moan,
Or the hoarse sobbings of the widowed dove,
Than those smooth whispers near a prince's throne,
Which make good doubtful
As the words passed his lips the horseman turned
the last angle of the winding lane; and for the first
time discovering that the free outpourings of his
spirit had found a listener, Edgar Ardennefor the
moralist was no otherpaused in his sonnet and
checked his steed by a common impulse, and, as it
seemed, a single movement. His eyes flashed
joyfully as they met the large and violet-coloured
orbs which the fair girl had raised at first in
simple
wonderment, but which now lightened with a
gleamy radiance that he was not slow to construe
into delighted recognition.
Sibylsweet Sibyl!
Edgar, can it indeed be you? Welcome, oh
welcome home!
At once, without a moment's interval, the words
burst forth from either as they hastenedhe with
impetuous hurry from his charger, she gathering
her ruffled robes about her, and rising from her
rustic
throne with the unblushing ease of conscious
modestyto manifest their pleasure at this
unexpected
meeting. Were they friends; or kindred,
or more dearly linked than either by the young ties
of holy, unsuspicious, and unselfish love? They
met; the formal fashions of the day would scarcely
have allowed the gallant to fold even a sister to his
bosom; Edgar clasped her not, therefore, in the
arms that evidently yearned to do so; but with a
polished ease, belied by the flushed brow and frame
that quivered visibly with eagerness, himself
ungloving
,
he raised her white hand to his lips, which
C 2
dwelt upon it even too fervently for brotherly
affection
.
A deep blush, glowing the more remarkably
from its contrast to her wonted paleness, over brow
and cheek, and visible, though with a fainter hue,
even upon her neck and such brief portion of the
bosom as might be descried between the fringes of
rich lace that edged her bodice, she yet expressed
not aught of wonder or of reluctance to his
familiar
greeting. Though the small hand trembled in
his grasp with a perceptible and quick emotion, it
was not withdrawn; nor, while he gazed upon
those eloquent eyes as steadfastly as though
through them he would have read the inmost
feelings
of the soul that so informed them, did she
shrink from his evident though chastened
admiration
.
A moment or two passed ere either again
spoke; it might be that their passionate feelings
were better to be interpreted from silence than
expressed
by wordsit might be that their hearts
were full to overflowing, and that so they dared not
to unlock those secret channels lest they might be
ledhe into such betrayal of his feelings as is
deemed weak and womanish by the great mass of
men, themselves too calculating or too cold to feel
at allshe into such disclosure of her soul's
treasured
secret as oftentimes is censured, and not
perhaps
unjustly, as at the least impolitic, if not
immodest
or unmaidenly. It was, however, Sibyl
who, with the delicate and ready tact peculiar to
her sex, first broke the silence, which had endured
so long already as to become almost embarrassing;
and as she spoke, her words explained their
relative
position, although it might even then be
doubted
whether the full extent of their connexion was
as yet divulged.
I can hardly, she said, in those low and
musical
notes which are indeed an excellent thing in
womanI can hardly trust my eyes, dear cousin,
when they tell me, truant as you are and traitor,
that you stand bodily before me. So long have
our hearts been rendered sick by hope deferred
so often have we gazed, from peep of morn till the
sad close of evening, for your expected, for your
promised coming, and gazed but to be
disappointed
that
now, when you have truly come, we had
ceased, not to hope, indeed, and pray, but surely to
expect.
Oh, Sibyl, did you know how many an anxious
thought, how many a bitter pang these wearisome
delays have cost me, you would pity rather than
upbraid.
Fair words, good cousin Edgar, she replied,
with an arch glance, and a light thrilling laugh;
fair words, and flowery all! and with such, you
lords of the creation, as in your vanity you style
yourselves, deem you can wipe away the heaviest
score of broken vows and perjured promises from
the frail memories of easy and deluded damsels.
But, in good sooth, I marvel not that you should
slight poor me, when you have questioned nothing,
and that too after a three years' absence, of your
noble father; and when you stand here dallying
within a scant mile of his presence, rounding
your false excuses into a credulous lady's ear. For
shame, sir! for my part, if I felt it not, then would
I feign at least some natural affection.
Wild as thou ever wert, fair Sibyl, answered
Edgar, a beautiful smile playing over his grave
features, and revealing a set of teeth even and
white as ivory; I hoped, when I beheld you so
pensive and so melancholy, musing beside yon
lonely pool, that years growing toward maturity
might have brought something of reflection to tame
those girlish spiritsbut, in good faith, I should
have known you better. But am I not assured,
were it but by your being here so blithe and
beautiful
,
that all goes well at home?
Well parried, if not honestly, still laughing
she replied; and for your taunts on my
demeanour
,
I defy you! But help me to my horse, sir
loiterer
,
and we will homeward; for I do believe,
despite
your manifold enormities, that you would fain
see those who, to your shame be it spoken, will
feel more joy to greet you, than you have shown
alacrity to do so much as ask of their well-being.
I warrant me, if you had met Sir Henry first, you
had not once inquired whether poor I were in
existence
.
In another moment the lady was mounted on her
white palfrey, and, with the cavalier beside her
bridle-rein, rode toward her home more joyously
than she had done for many a month before. Not,
however, in loud mirth, nor even in the sprightly
raillery which she had adopted on their first
meeting
,
was her happiness divulged to common ears;
but her soft eyes, dwelling fondly on the features
long unseen of her accepted and acknowledged
lover, though they were lowered modestly so often
as they caught his answering glanceswith the
subdued and quiet tones of her melodious voice as
they conversed of old home scenes and sweet
familiar
recollections, more endeared to them, all
trivial as they were, than loftier memorieswere
confirmations strong as an angel's voice of her
unchanged
affection. After a short ride, rendered
shorter yet to them by the enjoyment for so long a
time unused, though not forgotten, of each other's
converse; by the sweet consciousness of mutual
love; and by the full expansion of their feelings,
unrestrained by the cold formalities of that most
heartless intercourse which men have styled
society
,
and untrammelled by any chains save those
instinctive bonds of pure and delicate propriety
which noble natures ever wear about them in the
guise of flowery garlands, gracing, while they
dignify
,
the motions which they in no respect
impede
after
a short ride through the windings of
that verdant lanehere rendered almost gloomy
by the shadows of occasional woodlands which it
traversed; here running past the door of some
secluded
cottage, its thatched porch overhung with
bowering creepers, and its narrow garden gay with
tall hollyhocks and ever-blooming peas; and here
looking forth from intervals in the tall hedges over
some sunny stubble-field, on which the golden
shocks stood fair and frequent, or some deep
pasture
,
its green surface dotted with sleek and
comely
cattlethey reached a rustic gate of unbarked
timber, woven into fantastic shapes, and through it
gained admittance into a demesne, as rich as ever
was transmitted by its first winner of the bloody
hand to a long line of undegenerate posterity. Even
to the wandering and homeless stranger there is a
calm and quiet joy in the stately solitude of an
English park,in its broad velvet lawns, sloping
southwardly away, studded with noble clumps, or
solitary trees more noble yet, down to the verge of
some pellucid lake or brimful river,in its
swelling
uplands, waving with broom and brachens
sweet haunt for the progeny of the timid doe
whence glitter frequently the white stems of the
birch or the red berries of the mountain ash,in
the wild belling of the deer, heard from some
rock-ribbed
glen, where they have sheltered during the
hot noontide,in the cooing of the pigeon, or the
repeated tap of the green woodpecker,in the
harsh cry of the startled heron, soaring on his
broad vans from the sedgy pool before the
intruder's
footstep,in the lazy limp of the pastured
hares, and in the whirr of the rising covey. What
then must be the feeling summoned by the same
picture to the heart of one who hears in every
rural
sound, and witnesses in every sylvan scene, the
melodies that soothed his earliest slumber, and the
sights that nursed his youngest meditations? To
him these stately solitudes are peopled with a
thousand holy recollections; the step, perchance, of
a departed mother still roams beneath those
immemorial
trees; her musical voice still speaks to his
heart audibly, and in the very tones his childhood
listened
,
when all its cares were hushed;to him each
bosky bourn and twilight dingle has its memory
of boyish exploit, each chiming rill of boyish
revery
.
Homehomehackneyed as is the thought
and time-wornwhat a world of treasured
sweetness
is there in that one word Home! The
humblest
as the highestin sorrow as in mirthto the
needy exile as to the successful adventurerfor
ever dear, for ever holy. Crowded out perhaps
from the selfish spirit by the bustle, the tumult,
the conflict of the daybut still returning with
undiminished
force when the placid influence of night
and slumber shall have stilled the fitful fever, and
restored to the sullied heart, for one short hour, the
purity it knew of yore. Oh! if there be on the
broad face of earth the wretch that loves not, with
an unquenchable and ever-living love, the native
homecurse him not when ye meet, he is
accursed
already. Vindictive men have warred against,
ambitious men have sacrificed, and sordid men
have sold their countries; but these, ay, each and
all of these, if we could read their souls, have had
their moments of repentant thought, their moments
of triumphant fondness. What then must be the
feelings of a mind like that of Ardennea mind
coupling the severe and disciplined philosophy of
schools with the warm and wild romance of a
poetic
fancya mind which had learned wisdom
without learning vice, amid the fierce pleasures and
the fiercer strife of a licentious worlda mind no
less unselfish than it was reasoning and regular
a mind, filled with the beautiful principles of that
universal love, which is honour, and patriotism,
and every shape of virtuevirtue, not cold in
itself
,
as the wicked say, and chilling all things that
it touches, but genial, and enlivening, and warm
with every generous aspiration? What must have
been the feelings of a man, endowed with such a
mind, returning to his unforgotten home from years
of restless wandering, in pursuitnot of the idol
mammon, not of the phantom fame, but of that
high philosophy which is derived from the perusal
of men, not books; which is learned, not in the
solitary chamber nor by the midnight lamp, but on
the tented field and in the dazzling court; at the
banquet and the masque; amid the treacheries of
men and the wilier fascinations of beauty;riding
by the bridle of his own betrothed, through the
very fields in which he had won, years before, her
virgin heart;hastening to the embrace of a father,
whom, much as he revered and honoured him, he
loved yet more? Who may describe that
wonderful
and deep sensation, that tincture of joy and
sorrow
,
of bitterness and pleasure, which must be
mingled to make up the draught of human
happiness
,
exhibited no less in the gushing tear than in
the glittering smilein the choked voice and
suffocating
spasm, than in the flashing eye and the
exulting
pulse? Enoughhe was for the moment
happy, absolutely andif aught mortal may be
called perfectperfectly happy. The antiquated
hall burst on his vision as he passed a belt of
sheltering
evergreens, its tall Elizabethan chimneys
sending their columns of vaporous smoke far up
into the calm heaven; its diamond-paned oriels
glowing like sheets of fire to the reflected sun; its
hospitable porch yawning to admit stranger or
guest alike with kindly welcome; its freestone
terraces
,
with a group of lazy greyhounds basking on
the steps, and a score or two of peacocks perched
upon the balustrades, like the ornaments of an
eastern throne, or strutting to and fro on the broad
flag-stones in all their pride of gorgeous plumage.
He sawhe had no wordsbut his gentle
companion
might perceive his nether lip to quiver with
strong emotion, and a tear, unrestrained by selfish
pride, to trickle down his manly cheek. A heavy
bell rang out; there was a bustle, and a rush of
many servitors, badged and blue-coated men, with
hoary heads and tottering limbsthe heir-looms of
the family, transmitted, with the ancestral armour
and the ancient plate, from sire to son. With
difficulty
extricating himself from the familiar
greeting
of these domestic friends, he hurried up the
steps; but, ere he crossed the threshold, a
noble-looking
man, far past the prime of lifeas might
be seen from his long locks, already streaked with
wintry hues of age, but vigorous still and active
fell upon his neck with a quick shrill cry, My
son! my son! the hot tears gushing from his eyes
not that he mourned, but that he did rejoiceto
borrow the magnificent words of the Greek lyrist
as he beheld his chosen offspring, the stateliest
of the sons of men.
CHAPTER III.
Minstrel of freedomEngland's holiest bard
His were the electric strains, that spurn control!
That stir with lightning touch a nation's soul,
Filling each heart with aspirations high,
With zeal to doto sufferand to die!
With fear of tyrants conquering fear of strife!
With that high lovemore strong than love of life
Which arms may not subdue, nor fetters pine,
The deathless love of liberty divine!
It
was a beautiful and tranquil evening; the
broad bright hunter's moon was riding through the
cloudless firmament, bathing the whole expanse of
heaven with a radiance so pervading, that the
myriad stars were wellnigh quenched in her more
lustrous glory. It was one of those evenings on
which we cannot gaze without comparing the pure
and passionless quiet of the world above with the
fierce solicitudes, the selfish strife, the angry
turmoil
of the world around usone of those
evenings
which at any time must infuse a sentiment of
peaceful melancholy into every bosom, even of the
wild and worldly; but which has at no time so
deep an influence on the spirit as when
contemplated
from the near vicinity of some large city
The contrast between the chaste paleness of those
celestial lamps, and the ruddy glare of the terrene
and lurid fires glancing from many a casement,
between the perfect calm alert, unbroken save by
the gentle murmur of the wind, and the confused
uproar below, rife with the din of commerce, the
dissonance of mingled tongues, and now a distant
scream, and now a burst of unmelodious laughter,
must needs impress more strongly on the mind
Vol. I.D
than aught of homily or lecture, that loathing of
the mortal world, and the base things its tenants;
that ardent and inexplicable yearning after
something
of truer and more substantial happiness than
we can here conceive,that wish for wings like
a dove, that we might flee away and be at rest,
which constitutes perhaps the most essential
difference
,
as exhibited on earth, between ourselves and
the yet lower animals, content to fatten and to
perish. Such was not improbably the strain of
thought into which the aspect of the night had led
onea man, not yet advanced beyond the prime
of life, of elegant though low proportionswho
stood gazing heavenward as he leaned against the
low wall of a pleasant garden, which, girt about
with its tall hedges of clipped box or hornbeam, its
gay parterres, and its pleached bowery walks, a
fair suburban villa; situate in what was then, as
now, termed Aldersgate, though at that period not
a densely-peopled thoroughfare, but a long
straggling
street, half town half country, with leafy
elms lining the public way, and many a cultivated
nursery and many a grassy paddock intervening
between the scattered dwellings of the retired
trader or the leisure-loving man of letters. The
countenance of this person, as it was directed
upward with a pensive wistful gaze toward the
melancholy planet, receiving the full flood of its
lustre, was singular for softness and attraction.
He wore no covering on his head, and his
luxuriant
tresses of light brown hair, evenly parted on
the foretop, hung down in silky waves quite to his
shoulders. The hues of his complexion, delicately
coloured as a woman's, and the somewhat sleepy
expression of his full gray eye, accorded well with
the effeminate arrangement of his locks, and indeed
entitled him to be considered eminently handsome;
for there was so much of intellect and of
imagination
in the forehead, low but expansive, and so
many lines of thought about the slightly-sunken
cheeks, now faintly traced and transient, but which
would, with the advance of years, increase to
furrows
,
that the softer traits, while adding to the
beauty, detracted nothing from the dignity and
manhood of his aspect. His form, though low
and small, was yet compact and muscular, affording
promise of that powerful agility which is paramount
even to superior strength in the use and skill of
weapons. Neatly clad enough in a loose coat of
dark gray cloth, with vest and hose of black, cut
plainly without lace or fringe; and, above all, not
wearing even the common walking-sword, at that
time carried throughout Europe by all of gentle
rank, the meditative loiterer would have excited
little or no attention among the greater body of
mankind, ever caught by the glitter, and deluded
by the glare, but careless as it is undiscerning of
true merit, when harbingered to its opinion by
naught of pride or circumstance. He might have
been an artisan or merchant of the city, but that
the slouched hat, lying with a staff of ebony beside
him on the wall, distinguished him from the
flatcapped
dwellers to the east of Temple Bar; while
his hands, which were delicately white, and tender
as a lady's, showed that they had never been
exercised
in the ungentle labour of a mechanic calling.
But, stronger even than these tokens, there was
that vivid and inexplicable impress of exalted
genius, that looking forth of the immortal spirit
from the eyes, that strange mixture of quiet
melancholy
with high enthusiasm, pervading all his
features
,
which must have made it evident to any
moderately keen observer, that figure or decoration
could be but of small avail when considered as the
mere appendages to such a mind.
He stood a while in silence, though his lips moved
at intervals, perusing the bright wanderers of
heaven
with a gaze so fixed and yearning as though his
spirit would have looked through them, the
windows
of the firmament, into the very tabernacle and
abode of the Omnipotent. At length he spoke
articulately
,
in a voice deep, slow, majestic, and
melodious
,
but in the unconscious tones of one who
meditates or prays aloud, without reference or
respect to aught external.
Beautiful light, he said; beautiful lamp of
heavenwhat marvel that the blinded and
benighted
heathen should ignorantly worship thee? What
marvel that a thousand altars, in a thousand ages,
should have sent up their fumes of adoration unto
thee the mooned Ashtaroth, unto thee the Tauriform
Diana, unto thee the nightly visitant of the
young-eyed
Endymion? What marvel that to those who
knew not, neither had they heard of the One,
Uncreate
,
Invisible, Eternal, thou shouldst have seemed
meet Deity to whom to bend the knee,thou
firstborn
offspring of his first-created giftthou blessed
emanation from his own ethereal glorywhen I,
his humble follower, his ardent though unworthy
worshipper,when I, an honest though an erring
Christian, do strive in vain to wean my heart from
love of thee; indoctrinating so my spirit that I
may kiss the rod with which, I am assured too
well, HE soon will chastise me, in changing the
fair light, that glorious essence in which my soul
rejoiceth, for one black, everlasting, self-imparted
midnight? Yet so it shall be. A few more
revolutions
of these puissant planets,a few more
mutations
of the sweet-returning seasons,and to me
there shall be no change again on earth for ever!
No choice between the fairest and the foulest! No
difference of night or day! No charm in the rich
gorgeousness of flowery summer above the sere
and mournful autumn! No cheery aspect in the
piled hearth of winter! No sweet communion
with the human eye compassionate! No
intercourse
with the great intellects of old, dead, yet
surviving still in their sublime and solid pages!
He paused for a space, as though he were too
deeply moved to trust his thoughts to language;
but, after a moment, drawing his hand across his
eyesBut if it be so, he continued, as I may
not doubt it willif his fiat be pronounced against
me of dark corporeal blindness, what duty yet
remains
?
Whatbut to labour that the blindness
be not mental also? Whatbut to treasure up
even now, during my brief-permitted time, such
stores of hoarded wisdom as may in part suffice,
like to the summer-gathered riches of the
industrious
and thrifty bee, to nourish and to cheer me
at the coming of my senseless season? What
but to profit, even as best I may, by those good
opportunities which his great mercy hath
vouch-safed
to me; to sow the seed even now, during the
fertile autumn, that by his blessing it may swell
and germinate during the brumal darkness of the
approaching winter, and in his good time give forth
to light a crop improved and gloriously surpassing
that from which it sprung? Whatbut to give
thanks alway, and to praise the tender-heartedness
and love of Him, to whom it were no harder task
to plunge the mind in lunatic and senseless stupor,
than to seal up the fount of light to the poor eye.
Of Him, who, giving all the thousand blessings I
enjoy, judges it fitting to deprive me but of one,
haply that from its single loss others may fructify,
and bear good harvest to my use? Wherefore, oh
D 2
merciful and mighty One, be it unto me as thou
willest, and thou only. And oh! above all things,
be it unto me, as now, so alway, humbly to cry,
and happily, Thy will be done.
Even as the pious scholar brought his
meditations
to a close, the footsteps of one advancing,
though still unseen, through the mazes of the
shrubbery, were heard upon the crisp and
crackling
gravel; and, ere he had resumed his hat,
which was steeple-crowned and of the puritanic
fashion, the intruder made his appearance, in the
guise of an humbly-clad and grave-eyed
servingman
,
who announced, in phrase ungarnished by
much form of reverence toward his master, the
presence of three gentlemen within, praying to
speak with him.
In faith, returned the other, in faith, good
Andrew, 'tis an unseasonable hour for visitants!
Who be these gentles?
Master Cromwell is among them, answered
the attendant; but of the rest I know not, save
that I heard the name of St. John pass between
them. They await your coming in the summer
parlour.
Without farther query or reply, the scholar, as
if satisfied that his presence was indeed required,
traversed the garden with quick steps; and
entering
the house, a small but cheerful dwelling,
through an entrance hung round with maps and
charts of statistics or chronology, passed to the
chamber in which his guests expected him. It
was a pleasant room, with a bay-window
looking
upon the garden, but cheaply decorated with
hangings of green serge, to which a splendid
organ
,
by the first maker of the day, and a choice
collection of rare books, several of the number
being papyri of great worth, afforded a remarkable
contrast. In the recess formed by the window
there stood a reading-desk, curiously carved in
old black oak, with cushions of green velvet,
somewhat the worse for wear, supporting a noble
folio Bible in the Greek text of Geneva. The
table was loaded with a heterogeneous mass of
books and papers, an original manuscript of the
Bacch of Euripides, reposing on a Hebrew copy
of the Septuagint, and a stray duodecimo of
Petrarch's
sonnets, marking the place at which the
reader had closed the pages of a huge tome of
controversial divinity; while, on a marble slab
opposite the chimney, lay a couple of foils, with
their wire masks and gloves, partially hidden by
the draperies of a threadbare mantle of black
velvet
;
a violin, a guitar, some written music, and,
peering out from beneath the whole, the iron
basket-hilt
and glittering scabbard of a heavy
broadsword
.
In this the student's sanctum, he found the three
gentlemen who had been announced, evidently
engaged
in whispered conversation of deep import,
for they did not perceive the presence, till he had
stood for a moment or two almost beside them, of
their host; who had thus ample opportunity of
examining their persons, by the light of a brazen
lamp of antique form, with several burners, which
hung from the ceiling immediately above the
abstracted
group. Nearly opposite the door, with
his searching eyes fixed upon another of the
company
,
who was speaking with considerable
emphasis
,
though in an under tone, stood the same
individual who had assisted Ardenne on the night
of his adventure near to Royston; wearing the
very garb in which he had appeared on that
occasion
,
save that, for his riding-boots, he had
substituted
a pair of coarse gray woollen stockings,
drawn tight to the mid-thigh, with ill-blacked
shoes of calfskin, laced to the instep, and bearing
neither rose nor buckle. The speaker, to whose
words he lent so careful heed, was a tall and
slender
person, handsomely, though gloomily, attired
in a full suit of black, with silken hose and velvet
cloak to match, a mourning rapier hanging at his
side, though evidently worn for fashion rather than
for use. His countenance, though not of pleasant
favour, much less such as could be termed
handsome
,
was nevertheless one from which men could
not easily withdraw their eyes, possessing
attributes
of unquestionable talent, though accompanied
by an expression which none so dull but they would
wish to fathom. His eyes, which were large and
black, had a bright and flashing glance when
under influence of excitement almost painful to
the beholder; while a continual, and, as it would
seem, involuntary sneer, sat on his thin and
writhing
lip. His hair, black as the raven's wing, was
long and curling, though not worn after the
flowing
fashion of the cavaliers; but the most
remarkable
trait of his aspect was the immoveable gloom
which overshadowed his dark saturnine features
with a cloud so constant, that it has been recorded
of him, that seldom, even in his moments of
hilarity
,
was he beheld to smile. The remaining person
of the trio was a finer and more comely man than
either of his comrades; fairly proportioned, though
not above the middle height, with a brow rather
full than lofty, a quick and penetrating eye, and an
intelligent expression, thoughtful rather than grave,
and with no touch of sternness or morosity on his
noble features, lighted up, as they were from time
to time, by a smile of singular and cheerful
sweetness
.
He was habited as became a gentleman, in
a rich garb of marone-coloured velvet, his costly
sword suspended from a scarf of good white
taffeta
,
and a white feather in his beaver; the whole
though plain enough, if compared with the
luxurious
bravery of the cavaliers, whose dresses would
oftentimes have been too cheaply rated at a year's
income of their patrimonyconveying an idea of
absolute magnificence, when viewed beside the
simple habiliments of his fellow-visiters. After he
had surveyed this group for a few moments' space,
satisfied apparently with the survey, the master
of the house stepped forward, startling them
slightly
by his motion, and cutting short their converse.
Give you good evening, Master Cromwell, he
said, addressing himself to the most
slovenly-apparelled
of the company; it shames me to have
caused you wait my coming.
Not so, good sir, returned the other; it is
we rather who have trespassed on your studies,
coming thus at an hour surely unseasonable. But,
of a truth, I had forgottenI pray you, Master
Milton, for it was no other than the immortal
poet, who had deplored, in such heartfelt yet
unrepining
language, the advent of that dread
calamity
,
which had already been predicted to him by
the first physicians of the day as the sure
consequence
of his persisting in his arduous and
unremitted
labours,I pray you, Master Milton,
know these most worthy and God-fearing
gentlemen
!
This, motioning with his hand toward the
taller and more gloomy figure, this, my good
friend, Master Oliver St. John; and this, my
well-beloved
and trusty cousin, honest John Hampden.
Of a truth, Master Cromwell, replied the
poetin those days better known by his
magnificent
and stately prose, for a controversial writer
of unequalled power, than by the slight though
beautiful effusions of poetry which hitherto he had
cast forth merely as the erratic sports of leisure
moments, stolen from graver studies, and not yet
as the sublime continuous soarings of his unrivalled
genius,of a truth, Master Cromwell, I owe
you more of thanks than I am wont to offer, that
you have brought to my poor dwelling these, the
most constant and the noblest cultivators of that
fair vineyard, to the renewal and reform of which
I too, an humble fellow-tiller, have devoted my
unworthy labours! And he turned to the
companions
of his friend, esteemed already by all the
worshippers of freedom as the wisest, the purest,
and the best of her adorers!as the pilots, who
might alone be trusted to hold the shattered helm
of state aright, amid the terrors, the confusion, and
the storm of the approaching crisis!as the
champions
,
who had already reared the banner of
undaunted
opposition to all that was corrupt, or
bigoted
,
or arbitrary, in religious or in civil rule!as
the leaders, who, above all others, were endowed
with the talent, and the worth, and, more than
these, with the unflinching energy to wring the
iron sceptre of usurped prerogative from the high
hand that wielded it with such despotic sway!
He greeted them with words savouring more of
courteous deference than of that plain-spoken and
uncompromising brevity, on the use of which his
party prided themselves so deeply in their
intercourse
of man with man. There was, however,
nothing of vain or worldly adulation, much less of
that fawning sycophancy, that low servile
man-worship
,
for which the courtiers of the day were
so deservedly contemned by the stern puritans, in
his frank though reverential bearing.
After a few seconds spent in civilities, which
were accepted, as indeed they were intended, for
the befitting homage of one surpassing intellect to
others, though in a different sphere, of not inferior
merithomage, degrading not the giver, while it
added to the real dignity of the receiver,the party
fell into the ordinary demeanour of men familiar,
if not with the persons, at least with the minds and
principles each of the other; and the conversation
flowed as quietly on the accustomed topics of the
time as though the speakers had been in the
daily wont of mingling in the same social
intercourse
.
There was, however, not only naught of
levity or license, but naught of common import or
every-day occurrence, in the interchanged ideas of
those high spirits, devoted, one and all, to the
same pursuit of patriotism, and equally engrossed
in the quick-succeeding incidents of fearful and
pervading interest, which rendered every hour of
that eventful year a great historic epoch.
Have ye received aught new from Ireland,
inquired the poetye of the lower house,
touching
this perilous and damnable rebellion?
Ay, of a surety have we! answered
Cromwell
,
full confirmationfull, ay, and overflowing
all that we had heard before!
All Ulster is in one light blaze, cried St. John,
his dark eye flashing with indignant fire; the
forts all captured, and that most subtle villain,
Phelim
O'Neil, wading knee-deepwith thirty
thousand
fanatic and phrensied papistsknee-deep in
Protestant and English gore! Connaught and
Leinster
revelling in red-handed massacre, and the five
counties of the Pale, arrayed by the lords-justices
to quell the insurrection, united to their brother
rebels!
None may conceive the horrorsnone may
enumerate the sufferingsor recount the wretched
sufferers, continued Hampden, a deep shade of
melancholy settling down on his fine lineaments;
at the least reckoning, twenty thousand of our
brethren, men, women, and children, yea, the very
infants at the breast, have porished! No insult,
no atrocity, that Romish perfidy could plan, or
fiendish cruelty performno last extremity of
famine, cold, or torture, has been spared to their
defenceless victims by the barbarian Irishthe
very priests setting the torch of midnight
conflagration
to the planter's dwelling, and hounding on
their furious followers to massacre and havoc!
But of the king, fair sirs?
Well hast thou said, John Milton,
interrupted
the harsh voice of Cromwell before the other
had concluded his inquiry; well has thou said
and truly! 'tis of that man of Belial! ay, root and
branch of him, and his self-seeking carnal
cavaliers
!
It is, we fear, too true said Hampden, in
reply
to the bewildered looks of the anxious auditor;
it is, we fear, too true! O'Neil, in his dark
proclamation
,
boasts openly his own authority from
the great seal of Scotland. Sir William St. Leger,
trusty alike and brave, hath, as we learn,
dismissed
his levies, and laid down the arms he had
assumed on the first outbreak of the rebels, at
sight of a commission, with Charles Stuart's
manual
sign, held by that murderous bigot Lord
Musquerry
.
And last, not least, sneered Oliver St. John,
Mac Mahon hath confessed, at shrewd
solicitation
of the rack, that the original scheme of this
rebellion was brought to Ireland, from our
gracious
king and governor, by Dillon and the
members
of the late committee.
Of a truth, said Cromwell, in reply to the
words of his milder cousin, of a truth, there may
be cause for
fear
, ay, and for griefyet
wherefore
?
Verily 'tis a hard thing to rejoice, to
rejoice
in the midst of slaughter and abomination!
Yet who shall deem or boast himself to know of
that which is to come, save He that holdeth the
end, I say the end and the accomplishment of all
things, in the hollow of his hand? But I will tell
ye thisyea, but mistake me not,this will I
avouch to ye, that
I
fear not, but do rejoice! 'Tis
a sad thing, in truth, that an anointed king, even a
king in Israel, should arm his hand against his
people, and turn away his countenance from the
well-beloved of the Lord, inclining his ear
likewise
unto the idolatries of the beast, and unto the
charmings of the Moabitish woman; yea, and
pour out the vials of his wrath upon the heads of
the sons of righteousness! But, of a surety, it is
not for a man to judge save thusfor I will speak
even as it is put into my mouth,save
thus
that,
to a man foreweaponed and forewarned, less
dangerous
is an open enemyyea, if he be mightier
by tenfold,than one who lurketh privily beneath
the vesture of a friend, looking in secret whom he
may devour!
Forewarned indeed ye are, replied the poet,
musingly, and your own fault 'twill be if ye be
not foreweaponed likewise; for, in good sooth, I do
believe the lives of none are safethe lives and
liberties
of none who dare uplift their voices in defence
of England's constitution or the church's purity.
And is it not to this end, cried Oliver, and is
it not to this end that we are watching, even now,
with our loins girded, and our lights burning,
watching unto the protection of those that are
defenceless
,
and unto the enlightening of those that
sit in darkness? And is it not to this end that we
have now come to thee, John Milton, trusting to
gain a strong allyeven a valiant, and a
heart-whole
,
Vol. I.E
and a spirit-serving soldier!seeking to
learn form theeso far as it is for man to learn
of man, yet neither confident in worldly wisdom,
which is ignorance before the Lord, nor relying
altogether on the judgment of a fellow-worm, how
excellent soever he may be in the gifts of carnal
knowledge,seeking, I say, to learn from thee
the character and principles of one with whom
we do believe that you so long have communed as
to know the thoughts of his heart, ay, and to
interpret
the workings of his inward man!
Such is indeed our object, continued
Hampden
,
while St. John fixed his searching eye upon
the beautiful features of the listener with keen
and interested scrutiny; such is indeed our
object
in this untimely visit. We have but now
received
intelligence of the decease of that shrewd
counsellor and honest patriot, Elias Chaloner, the
fellow-townsman of my worthy cousin Cromwell,
and lately member for the godly town of
Huntingdon
;
and, with this same intelligence, the great
charge has been laid upon us, by the zealous
burghers of the place, of commending to their
choice a person who shall honourably fill the post
of him that is departed.
And how? you would ask, John Milton,
Cromwell broke in, for I can read the query on
your browhow, you would ask, can you assist
us in this matter? Verily
thus
for it hath been
suggested to our souls when we were seeking out
the Lord in prayer, yea, wrestling with him in the
spirit, that he should guide us to a sure election,
it was,I tell you truth, I do profess,borne in
upon the ears of our minds, as with an audible and
spoken voice, `Ye shall call to aid the man
even the young manEdgar Ardenne'
With whom, interrupted St. John, evidently
weary of the prolix, verbose haranguing of the
other, with whom, as we are well assured, you,
Master Milton, have mingled much in foreign
travel, having thereby good opportunity to judge
of his opinions and to learn his heart. We would
hear from you, therefore, worthy sir, whether this
gentleman of high extraction, born of a race
devotedly
,
I had wellnigh said
slavishly
, loyal
whether
this gentleman be indeed, as we would wish to
find him, a firm, uncompromising lover of his
countryone who would pledge himself, and
keep his plight religiously, to advance the views
and serve the interests of our party! May it
please you, tell us fully what of yourself you
know, and what may be your judgment of this
your fellow-travellerand, above all, whether he
may be wrought, and by what means, to further
our purposes!
For years, replied the poet, after a moment's
pause, for years have I been wont to read the
living minds of men with even more of study than I
have expended on their embalmed and written
thoughtsfor years!and neverI can say it
honestly and freely, for I do believe I know his
inmost aspirations even as I am conscious of my
ownnever have I found, or even read of such a
head, combined with such a heart, as that of Edgar
Ardenne. A worshipper of wisdom, of liberty, of
truthpurer and far more fervently devoted than
the great spirits of the old republics! A scholar
in the study, and that too of the ripestan orator
in the forum, strong, stirring, and persuasivea
soldier in the field, well tried, and as well proven!
An adorer of all that is beautiful, but one who sees
no beauty save in virtue! A Christian, fervent
and sincere, yet tolerant, and of much charity!
Ambitiousbut ambitious only to do good! If
ever there was born a man wholly unselfish, that
man is Edgar Ardenne. Suchand on my
judgment
well may you relysuch is the man whom
you would take into your counsels. Gain him,
thengain him, if ye mayfor certainly as
Edgar
Ardenne could achieve aught to benefit his
country, though every hope, every feeling, every
passion of his soul were listed to oppose it, so
certainly
would he tread hope, feeling, passion, into
the very dust beneath his feet. He has a head so
clear, he cannot fail to
see
the righthe has a
heart so true, he would not failthough at the
price of all he holds most dearto
follow
it.
Beware
,
however,beware, if ye decide to gain him,
how you show aught of doubt, much less suspicion!
proffer to him the seat for Huntingdon
untrammelled
!
say not a word of partynot a word of
opposition to the courtmake ye not one
condition
ask
not one pledge!for had ye heaven
itself to tender him, and were to tender it, so
bribing
himay, were it even to act wellmy life!
he would refuse even heaven! If, therefore, ye
can resolve unpledged to trust him, seek not to
sound his viewsfor as well might ye assay to
fathom the most central depths of ocean;seek not
to bind his actionsfor as well might ye go forth
to chain the subtle and pervading lightning;but
proffer to him, in plain terms, the seatat the free
choice of the burghersand if he do accept it, as
well I trust he will, be sure there is no man in
England that better knows the duties of a member
in the commons House of Parliament, or trulier will
discharge them!
You have described, replied the calm and
meditative Hampden, you have indeed
described
a man, such as there are but few this side
the grave! Your words, too, tally well with
the surmises I have formed from his known
actions!
And would you then, asked the moody St.
John, would you then set so great a matter on
the casting of a die? Do you not know that even
now we have but a majoritynot over-strong nor
over-certain?that many have been already won
or put to silencethat Hyde and his moderate
partisans
daily gain strength, and only lack occasion
to join the court in open and unblushing servitude?
Know you not that Falkland wavers, and that, if
he go over, ten votes at least will instantly
apostatize
?
and would you then elect this cavalier, for
such in truth he is, on vague hopes and uncertain
indications?
I said not so, replied Hampden, quickly; I
said not so! but only that I believe him wise and
honest! Farther I will say now, thatif, on any
terms, we shall decide to recommend him to the
choice of the electorsmy voice is for so doing
with nothing of restriction! If he be honest, it
needs not to bind him by a promiseif otherwise,
'twere madness to suppose that promises will bind
him! But on this matter we will speak more
anonwe have already trespassed over long upon
the leisure and the patience of our honourable
host.
St. John replied not; and Cromwell, who had
perhaps made up his mind already, had fallen into
a long and rambling exposition of some doctrinal
point, wholly remote from the subject in question,
to which Milton listened with a tranquil smile
playing
about his well-turned lip, and with the aim
apparently
of discovering what was the meaning, if there
indeed were any, of the wild and ill-digested
oratory
of the member for Cambridge, at this time just
beginning to attract the notice of the house, though
E 2
no one could perhaps assign a cause for his
increasing
influence. For a short space the others
spoke apart, warmly, though in an under tone
Hampden, as it seemed, urging on his grave
confederate
some dubious or unpalatable measure; the
energy of his manner gradually rising, while the
opposition of his friend waxed fainter, until the
habitual sneer departed from his lip, and the
accustomed
cloud partially yielded to an opener and more
cheery aspect. Be it so! he said at length,
raising
his voice, as the discussion was finished by his
assent; be it so, if you willand, in faith, I
believe
you are in the right on't! Now, Master
Cromwell, he continued, turning toward him as
he spoke, it lacks but a scant hour of midnight,
and our host's oil, I trow, is wont to lend its light
to purposes of more importance than our farther
converse! Give you good night, fair sir, he
added, with a short inclination to the poet, as,
gathering his cloak about him, he led his
comrades
,
after brief ceremony, into the moon-lit
streets; while he whom he had last addressed
applied himself, in solitary diligence, to the
exercise
of his pen, slight instrument of mightiest
powers
,
whether for good or evil, and, in the hand of
the philosopher, prime mover of more potent
revolutions
than its dread rival and confederatethe
mortal sword!
CHAPTER IV.
Oh what more blest than that serene repose,
Which steeps the sould forespent with foreign woes,
What time we turn, our weary wanderings o'er,
To the old homestead, thence to roam no more,
And stretch our limbs in calm luxurious rest,
On the dear bed our careless childhood pressed.
Catullus
.
Free Translation
.
None
know, but those who have for years been
wanderers from the paternal roof, whether of choice
or of necessity it matters not,who have for years
been sojourners, not dwellers, on the broad desert
earth,who, in the midst of friends almost as dear
as those, who girt as with a magic cestus the
unforgotten
fireside of their childhood, have craved,
with an insatiate and yearning appetite, the
well-known
aspect of the old home-places,who have
languished for a father's blessing, a mother's
wistful
eye, a sister's holy kiss,who have felt, with
the patriotic Syrian, that Abana and Pharpar,
rivers of Damascus, are truly to the exile better
than all the waters of Israel;none know, but
these, the deep calm happiness of being once again
the centre of that sweet domestic circle; of
receiving
the fond welcome of every living thing
ay, even to the household dog, or superannuated
horse, that yelps or whinnies in the fulness of his
recognition; of lying down to rest beneath the very
curtains, and on the very bed, which had so often
wooed them to repose before they knew the
bitterness
of sin or sorrow.
Fully indeed, and far more sensibly than it is
tasted by the common pilgrim of life's journey, did
this impression of tranquil bliss pervade the breast
of Ardenne, as he leaned, gazing upon the familiar
landscape, from out the open casement of his
chamber
;that
chamber, which had never for a moment
faded from his memory, with its oaken wainscoting
and faded tapestries,its angular recesses, peopled
by his youthful fantasy with lurking shapes of
terror,its pleasant seats in the deep bay windows,
its brazen-handled cabinets of quaint deviceits
bed with sculptured tester and dark hangings,and,
more than all, its ebon desk, with the velvet-bound
and silver-studded Bible, whence his long-lost and
long-regretted mother had lessoned him so lovingly
while he was yet a boy.
The moonlight lay upon the velvet park and
tufted elms, as though it loved to sleep among
that peaceful scenery; and if, at intervals, it shone
reflected from the surface of some quiet water, it
lingered even there with a half-shadowed lustre,
not flashing out with the bright gleams of gorgeous
sunshine, but calmly harmonizing with the spirit
of the place and hour. So clear, however, was the
mellow light, that the graceful attitudes of the
slumbering deer might be distinguished on the
open lawns, while the pinion of the gliding owl
was seen to glance against the massy shadows of
the surrounding forest. Yet now, although he
gazed upon all that was most beautiful of natural
scenery,all that was most endeared to him by
boyish recollections,although he was surrounded
by the very objects that he had most earnestly
desired
to see,although he was at the very point which
he but yesterday would have esteemed the summit
of fruitionhe was not happy. It is true, that he
had found in her on whom his mind had dwelt most
fondly and most frequently during his absence, the
very being he had loved so fervently of yore
bearing
no traces of the years which had elapsed, save
in the ripening of her mind to excellent maturity,
and in the rounding of her sylph-like figure into
the exquisite proportions of young womanhood!
It is true that the father, whom he had honoured
and obeyed with that old-fashioned filial reverence,
whichill betide the changehas long since passed
away, together with the diamond-hilted rapiers, and
the somewhat formal courtesy of our progenitors,
had welcomed him to his affections, a man yet in
the prime of intellectual vigour! It is true that
he had brought back to his native land a heart
untainted
by the follies and the sins of foreign
countries
;
a mind well satisfied, not by the baseless
arguments of boyish prejudice, but by the strong
convictions of experience, that his own earth-fast
island was indeed the home best calculated for the
seekers of that sweet domestic quietude, that
fireside
,
church-going happinessthat calm
enjoyment
of the duties, the labours, and the pleasures
of a country life, blent, as these ever are, with a
romantic taste for the green fields and slumbering
woodlands, the gentle river and the smooth
hill-side
which
have at all times formed a feature so
distinctive in the English character! But it is no
less true that, even at the moment when his hand
might have been said to grasp all that his soul
desired
,
his spirit was disturbed, and his heart ill at
ease.
It were perhaps the wisest, as it surely were the
happiest course, for mortals to obey the dictates
equally inculcated by the disciples of two schools,
which, seemingly the most at variance with each
other, are nevertheless in truth as similar in not a
few essentials, as it is possible for creeds to be in
other points so diverse as those entertained by the
followers of Epicurus andwith reverence be it
spokenof the Saviour,both recommending
nay, both strenuously urging the necessity, and in
words almost identical, that we take no heed for
the morrow. Yet, in a mortal sense, obedience
to this injunction is perhaps impossible
impossible
at least to any man endowed with enough of
intellect and mental vigour to perceive the connexion
between present causes and eventual effectsto
foresee with prescient sagacity the crop which will
spring up to-morrow from the seed laid in the
ground to-day!For who could sit at ease,
appreciating
the full quality of each delicious viand,
pleasantly debating on the flavour of each fragrant
wine, knowing that the sword of Damocles was
swinging by a single hairand that, too, yielding at
every instant to the weightabove his head? Had
it not been for thishad it been possible for
Ardenne
to seal up his eyes and close his ears against
the evidence of what to-morrow must bring forth
had he lacked the wisdom to discover the future
destinies of England, her vitals even now
convulsed
by the first throes of the incipient
earthquake
or
the patriotism to sympathize with the
afflictions which, as that wisdom taught him, must
ere another year befall his countryhe might have
surrendered himself to momentary pleasure,
careless
or ignorant of the approaching wo. Andso
rare of occurrence, and so brief when they do
occur
,
are the periods during human life even of
comparative happinessperhaps, had he so done,
he had been able to look back in after days to
more of sunny hours than he could count among
the strange and mingled incidents of his eventful
life. But, constituted as he was, it was not in his
power to fix his gaze on the bright present aspect
of the things around him, without observing the
huge melancholy clouds which were rising up on
the political horizon, threatening to overshadow
with their gloomy pall, and perhaps to overwhelm
in the wild tempest they must soon discharge, the
feeble shallop of his fortunes, together with the
stronger vessel of the constitution.
At an early period of his life a visiter of
southern
landswhere he had wandered, not to mark
alone the sunny skies and desolated fields, the
ruined
temples and the beautiful cascades, but to
muse on the condition of the nations once so
powerful
and so degraded now; to ponder on their rise
and fall; to draw deep lessons of the future from
the contemplation of the past; he had learned to
cherish liberty the more from having witnessed, if
not himself endured, the wrongs, the misery, and
the oppression of unlimited authority. Summoned
of late by rumours rife throughout the world of
present disagreement and of coming strife between
the king and parliament of his own country, he had
returned to England at the instigation of his natural
sense of duties, which forbade him to expend his
energies of heart and hand in the service of a
foreign
prince, when both might be required to aid the
better cause of liberty or loyalty; no less than at the
dictates of those natural affections which, sooner or
later, will point, as surely as the magnetic needle
to the north, toward the home of childhood. While
on the journey, all his thoughts had been of joy
of that serene and moderate happiness which
makes the days flow onward like a broad and
tranquil
river, fertilizing some fair plain, rich with the
hopes of thousandsbeautiful, but with an
indescribable
and unromantic beautypresenting none
of those wild charms, those scenes at once
sublime
and lovely to the eye, which mark the course
of far-famed torrents amid the savage glens of
moorland, moss, and mountainbut leaving on the
mind a mingled sentiment of gratitude and bliss
that will be fresh and vivid when the sterner
memory
of its rivals shall have yielded to oblivion. His
spirit had looked forward to a long perspective of
sunshiny yearsyears not to be degraded by the
selfish sloth of luxury; not to be wasted in the
mere sports of the field, which, useful, ay, and
ennobling
in their tendencies, when partaken but as
a relief to grave and solid duties, so surely
brutalize
if they be exalted to a daily occupation; not to
be dreamed away in apathetic musings and
would-be
philosophy; but to be dignified by high and
patriotic laboursby the cultivation of the sciences
and artsby the promotion of public virtue and
domestic worthto be enlivened by the gay
communion
of the noble and the goodto be softened
by the sweet charities, the endearing ties, the holy
sympathies that clasp within their pale the
members
of a happy familyand to be closed at length
by a calm death-bed amid weeping friends, and by
a grave beneath the elms of the ancestral
church-yard
,
still to be decked with flowers, and pointed
out to far posterity as the long home of one whose
life had been a course, to which death had but
brought the consummation, of unbending honour.
Such, when the chalky cliffs loomed white and
lofty, such were the fond anticipations, the
imaginations
,
never perhaps to be realized, which
poured
their gilded halo round his heart; and when he
felt his foot once more securely planted on the
parent
soil, when all those gushing influences of
mingled
ecstasy and tenderness swept in an
overwhelming
torrent over his every sense, he deemed
that all his hopes were on the point of being
gratified
that
he was indeed about to be the happiest
of men. The rumours of evil seemed to fade
away; the menaces of political discord, perchance
even of civil strife, to mutter only at a distance, if
not unheard, at least unworthy to create solicitude;
the fears that would at times arise unbidden,
clouding
with darker shades the bright hues of his
mental
painting, were all forgotten; and when he
arrived
,
as he had done that evening, at the dear home
of his boyhood; when he perceived the mighty
pleasure that lightened forth from every feature of
his admiring father; when he found himself
revelling
in the manifest affections of his destined
bride, and knew that she partook of the same
rapture
,
and in no less degree, he for a while
abandoned
his whole soul to the tide of feeling; he
suffered
himself to be carried away by his enjoyment
of the present, careless and fearless of the future;
he felt, perhaps for the first time of his life, during
those brief hours that elastic buoyancy of temper
which seems to tread the earth with winged steps,
about to soar aloft, insensible to aught that may
depress, reckless of all that may opposethat rapt
intoxication of the spirit, which is succeeded so
invariably
by the contrary extreme of listless, sad
despondency, that, in the northern parts of Britain,
it has given rise to a pervading superstition, to an
undoubting creed, that such is the forerunner and
the omen, not of a causeless gloom,. but of a
coming
evil. However this may be, it nevertheless is
certain, that scarcely had he retired from that
delicious
intercourse to the seclusion of his own
apartment
,
ere the exhilaration, which had almost
surprised
himself while he indulged it, gave place,
first, to an uncertain sense of restlessnessthen to
a consciousness of some impending evil, increasing
in distinctness moment after moment, till it
assumed
at length the shape of an anxiety, if not a fear,
positive, well-defined, and, alas! but too well
grounded. Nothing, indeed, but the whirl of
mingled
Vol. I.F
sensations, leaving room for naught of serious
meditation, could have, even thus far, blinded
Ardenne
to the difficulties and the dangers of his
future
course. The boasted loyalty of his
forefathers
their
fond devotion, stronger almost than
life, to the king, not as a person, but as a portion,
and that the most important, of the statetheir
orthodox and sturdy zeal, condemning all as
sectaries
and fanatics who differed in the least from the
established canons of the churchtheir prejudiced
affection for all that was antique, even for antique
error!their holding up all those who would
improve
or alter, with the most diffident and sparing
hand, as innovators on the good old times, as
levellers
of rank and order, as iconoclasts of the holy
constitution, as traitors to their monarch, to their
country, to their God! All these, he could not
but remember, had been the principles impressed
upon his dawning intellect as the very elixir of
political
wisdomas the examples which must point
the steps of every Ardenneas the dogmata for
the maintenance of which he must, if ever called
upon to do so, rejoicingly expend his fortune and
his blood! All these, he could not but foresee,
must still, according to all human calculation, be
the favourite maxims of his father, whoas he felt
in contradiction of those hopes, which, even in
spite of hope, he knew unfoundedwould be too
like to deem the slightest deviation from the
footsteps
of his idols as the worst apostacy!the most
respectful opposition to the arbitrary will of the
misguided sovereign as flat rebellion!the most
moderate interference in behalf of liberal views
and privileges of the people as a banding against
the legitimate aristocracy of the land with all that
was low, and sordid, and degraded!too like, in
short, to deem the part which Edgar felt already to
be the only one he could in honour or in honesty
espouse, a base abandonment of his natural
position
a
shameful dereliction from the principles
and virtues of his racea crime not to be atoned
for, even by exclusion from his heart and expulsion
from the home of his fathers! And had he been
able even heretofore and at a distance to close his
eyes against this fatal certainty, he must indeed
have been both blind and deaf of heart had he not
marked the words of blasting sarcasm, of fierce
and fiery hatred, which flashed forth as oft as any
casual mention intervened of those who had stood
forth to check the headlong declination of the
English
Church toward dreaded popery, or the more
rapid increase of prerogative toward absolute and
autocratic sway. But they had not escaped him.
Although unnoted, or at least unremarked, amid the
free and flowing conversation of that first evening,
and unable for the time to dash his most unusual
exuberance of animal spirits, they had sunk deep
into his heart;and now they rose in long array
against him, ghastly and gloomy shapes,
reproaching
him with his unnatural and foolish joy, and
pointing to an endless course of tribulation and of
sorrow. Nor was this all!though this had been
enough to overshadow a temperament more
sanguinely
inclined than that of Edgar Ardenne,
determined
as he was to follow that which he himself
should deem the wise, the upright, and the
honourable
way of action, though such should be avenged
by the prostration of all his fancy's idolsby the
ruin of his fortunesby the blighting of his nearest
and dearest aspirationsand, more intolerable far
than all beside, by the forfeiture of that high
opinion
which his merit had induced, and the frustration
of that just expectance which his promise had
excited
in the bosoms of his friends and kinsmen.
Nor was this all! For, as he pondered now in
the lone stillness of the night, as he reviewed with
a dispassionate, keen-sighted judgment the
occurrences
of the past dayas he recurred to every
word that had fallen from the lips to which he
looked for love, and life, and every thingto every
expression which had wreathed in smiles, or
clouded with disapprobation, the soul-fraught
lineaments
of Sibylhe could not bless himself with
the conviction, scarce even with the hope, that she
was not, although in a less stern degree, a
holder
of the same ancestral prejudicesa worshipper
of the same creed, hallowed as it was by much
that naturally would call forth the sympathies of a
mind imbued with all the poetry of feudal
recollections
,
not as yet faded from the earthby the
high chivalrous devotionthe noble and unselfish
confidencethe enthusiastic valourthe unsullied
memory and cloudless glory, of the days when
kings were loved as second only to the godswhen loyalty was regarded as a virtue among
men, in the same rank with piety toward Heaven.
Whither thenwhither had fallen his exulting
fancies
whither
had flown his visionary prospects
of a useful and a happy life, of an honoured and
regretted endif the paths of happiness and honour
were destined to run diverse? Ifhis heart
burning
with the pure and hallowed flame of liberty,
his head clearly appreciating the miserable and
abhorred aims of the rash man who wore the
crown of England, his whole soul glowing with
patriotic ardourhe must either prostitute his
energies
to make what to him seemed the worse
appear
the better causemust either lift his voice
to justify and to defend time-honoured wrong and
new-devised oppressionmust either edge the
weapon of the despot with all the powers of his
armor, following the dictates of his own
conscience
,
ranking himself among the vindicators of
the constitution to its early purity, among the
assertors
of a legitimate and tempered freedomas
far removed from the wild anarchy and license of
falsely styled republics, as from the forced
obedience
and intolerant rule of arbitrary governors
must be content to sacrifice all that his heart held
worthy its acceptance! if, in short, he must act a
part dishonest and unworthy, so to gain those
ordinary
means of happiness, to which none so lowly
but they do aspire; or must surrender every hope,
nay, every possibility of earthly bliss, at the
inflexible
commands of duty and of honour? These
were the dark reflections into which the mind of
Ardenne had relapsed, as he stood alone, gazing
from the lattice of his chamber into the bosom of
the night, profiting by, if not enjoying, the first
moments of calm solitude, the first opportunity for
quiet and heart-searching meditation, that had
fallen
to his lot since he had been numbered once
again among the dwellers beneath the oaken
shades of his paternal Woodleigh. Nor, as the
hours of night passed, not unheralded by musical
chimes from the old belfry, and the moonlight
waned in the peaceful sky, did his wild thoughts
and sad forebodings give way to aught of
weariness
;
the more he pondered, and the less able did
he seem to find the slightest clew to guide his
footsteps through the gloomy labyrinth of the
futurethe longer he sat gazing on the pallid
stars, and the less he felt disposed for slumber
till at length, the spirit moving, as it were, too
rapidly, and the blood coursing through his veins
too fiercely to permit the body to remain inactive,
he arose, scarce conscious that he did so, and
paced the oaken floor, backward and forth, with
F 2
swift irregular steps, the livelong night.
Gradually
the coming of the early twilight dappled the
darkness of the eastern sky; a bird or two, of
those which had securely roosted under the
ivy-curtained
eaves, awaking with a lively chirp, gave
notice of the dawn; and anon the calm and
colourless
light of an autumnal morning crept into
Ardenne's
chamber, dispelling from its every nook
the massy shadows which had nestled, like unholy
spirits, in those deep recesses, beneath the partial
influence of the moon. But all unnoted by its
occupant had those successive changes circled the
firmament; and when the sound of voices and of
footsteps, passing to and fro the corridors,
announced
the return of those bright hours allotted to so
much of human toil and sorrow, he absolutely
started in surprise, and almost doubted whether it
could indeed be morning, that had stolen on his
waking dreams, and found him still a watcher.
With something like a smile at his own
thoughtful
carelessness, he turned to change and alter his
discomposed attire; and as he dashed the pure cold
water over his throbbing temples, and bathed his
feverish hands, he perceived that its refreshing
coolness pervaded not his body only, but calmed
and soothed his mind; and when the merry bell
summoned its hearers to that most unrestrained
and sociable of meetings, the morning meal, he
descended the old staircase, gazing on its walls,
decked with time-honoured banners, and glittering
with starry groups of weaponsand on its
landing-places
guarded by complete panoplies of steel,
standing erect with advanced arms and lowered
visors, as if still tenanted by the strong frames
that had supported them of yore amid the din of
battle, if not with a heart at ease, at least with a
countenance that bore no traces of the conflict still
at work within. On entering the summer parlour,
as such rooms were termed in the quaint language
of the time, wherein meet preparations for a
breakfast
,
far more solid than are used in these
degenerate
days, had been already made, he found his
destined bride alone, in a projecting oriel window,
seated on the broad-cushioned ottoman which
circled
the recess, with a light frame before her, filled
with a gorgeous Indian silk, on which her art had
traced some fair embroideries, yet incomplete
but, though the many-coloured skeins assorted
within reach, and the well-filled needle between
her taper-fingers, showed that she had commenced
her feminine and graceful occupation, the
thoughtful
attitude of her head, languidly propped on her
left hand, while the right lay motionless on the
rich texture, belied her fancied industry. So
noiselessly had Edgar's step fallen on the soft
Turkey carpet that she had not perceived his
entrance
;
and so beautiful was the picture of still life
which she afforded to her lover's gaze, that he
lingered
for a moment ere his voice should rouse her
into animation. A flood of morning lustre
streamed
downward with a golden hue, caught from the
teinted panes, upon her glossy hair and pure
complexion
,
cireling her entire form with a halo of
rich light, not unlike that with which the painters
of the Romish school are wont to dignify their
female saints and martyrs. The outlines of her
beautiful shape were mellowed, as it were, and
shrouded partially by the hazy beams of sunshine
which fell in oblique lines between her person
simply arrayed in a close bodice, accurately fitted
to her fine bust, and a full robe of whiteand the
observer's eye. Her luxuriant tresses folded
plainly
about the contour of her small and classic head,
without ornament or gem of any kind, and the
exceeding
repose, if it might not be termed
melancholy
,
of her sweet features, giving, together with
the accidents of light and shade, a madona-like
and sainted aspect to her figure, which would
have enchained an artist with no less of
fascination
than it exercised, from different reasons, over
the mind of Ardenne. As he approached, her
delicate ear detected him; she turned her head,
and springing to her feet,Dear Edgar, she
exclaimed
,
her eye discovering with instinctive
quickness
the trace of melancholy left upon his
lineaments
,
however faintly, by his nightly musings;
Dear Edgaryou are ill at easenay, smile not
'tis a ghastly smile, not of your own expression!
you are ill at easehave passed a sleepless
night
Sweet Sibyl, he replied, with a wan smile, and
gently pressing her extended hand, you are
indeed
a keen observer; too keen, believe me!
How should I be but well and happy, surrounded
thus by all I love most tenderly?
How indeed, Edgar? she answered, even
more sadly than before. How indeedif you
do
love so tenderly?But ill at ease you are, and
have been sleepless! All night long have I heard
your heavy strides upon the chamber floor, and
those not regular and measured as your wont, but
fitful and uncertain. So do not pass the happy
their first night beneath the roof that saw their
birth.
If
I do love, Sibyl,
if!
he exclaimed, with
deep, almost reproachful energy; but, in good
truth, I am a poor dissembler, and could scarcely
feign, were it to win even thy heart, Sibyland,
for it seems I must confess me, I am somewhat,
though slightly, ill at ease
I knewI knew it at a glance, she
interrupted
him; and wherefore then conceal it?
Good Dr. Masters, though somewhat past his
prime, still ministers, and skilfully, to his familiar
patientsan hour will have him here and she
moved hastily toward a silver hand-bell, which
stood, with books, and drawings, and a lady's lute,
upon a fairy-looking cabinet of tortoise-shell and
marquetry.
Nay! nay! he cried, gently arresting her,
I meant not so!Be not alarmed, dear Sibyl,
mine is a robust frame, not oft or easily affected
by aught of feebleness or ailment. My mind hath
been of late somewhat overwroughtbut a few
days, consumed in the enjoyment of
home-happiness
and the delights of your society, shall speedily
restore me. Look not so graveso sadI do
beseech
you.
Oh, Edgar, she interrupted him again, tell
me, if you do love me, tell me all! long years have
we been partedparted, as I have hopedas, from
your kind and fervent letters, I have well believed
in body, not in soul! and is it nowoh, is it to
be thus? Are we to be but more divided when
we are more together? Have we but met to be
more widely and more coldly severed! Oh! if
you love me, let me know your griefs! Who
before
me should know?or who, as I, would share
them?
Allall, he answered, in the hollow voice of
one who struggles vainly with his feelings, forcing
a smile as faint as a December's sunbeam,you
shall share allgriefhappinesslifedeath
eternity!All, all, sweet Sibyl, if that indeed you
be so minded! From you I have hadI will
have no secretsbut now, I do assure you, I am
not in griefhow should I? Something of gloomy
thought may have come over mesomething of
moody sadnesscauseless and senselesssuch as
will float at times across the brains of all who
thinkas I dodeeply. But no, Sibyl, no; I
am not unhappy! Not for the proudest station
upon earth would I exchange this fond proximity to
theenot for the universal blast of the world's
approbation
would I barter that bright tearshed for
me, Sibylor that yet brighter smile that chases
it. Cheer up, my own own love; we will talk
more of this anonfor lo! there comes my father!
And as he spoke, attired in hunter's garb of
green, booted to the mid-thigh, with bugle-horn
and wood-knife usurping the place of rapier and
of poniard, and with two gallant stag-hounds at his
heel, the noble veteran entered.
Alertalert! he cried, with a gay smile;
you of young blood! Methought I was myself
full early stirring, but here are ye, in rising as in
all else, beforehand with me. What ho! ye
loitering
knaveshurry our breakfast! 'Tis a rare
morning, Edgara soft mild wind, a heavy dew
last eventide, and the clouds gently rising. Old
Stavely tells me he has harboured a right hart of
greasea stag of ten!and I have sent out riders
these four hours agone to rouse the country. The
Outrams will be here anonyou mind the
Outrams
,
boy, your college mates of yore, and now
right noble gallantsand Atherstone, of Ashstead
Halland old Lord Middleton, with his brave sons!
Friends alltrue friends, thought some of them, I
doubt, forgotten! But, 'fore George, we will make
a day of it!
Thus the old man ran on, overlooking in his
light-hearted cheerfulness the evident abstraction
of his listeners, although they rallied up enough of
animation to maintain some sort of conversation
during their hasty meal, which scarce was ended,
ere Sir Henry started from his seat. See! see!
he cried, as a fair cavalcade swept past the
windows
,
their plumes waving in the light west wind,
spurs jingling, and steeds curvettingsee! they
be here, even now; and lo! the pack! Aswith
their attendant huntsmen and half a score of
prickers
,
splendidly mounted on blood horses, in forest
jerkins sumptuously laced, round caps, and huge
French horns encircling their shouldersrestrained
by many an echoing shout and many a clanging
lash, some twenty couple of tall northern blood
hounds came trotting slowly up the lawn, in all
that accuracy of condition and perfection of detail
which has, in every period of her history, been so
distinctive of the field-sports of England!
Fly, Sibylfly, my fairy, cried the impatient
veteran. Do on your riding gear right speedily.
Ariel is champing on his bits even now to summon
you! Edgar and I meanwhile will look to our
guests in the great hall. Dally not, girl, I pray
youthe sun is shrouded even now, and the scent
will lie most bravely. I would not, to be Prince
of Wales, lose such a morning! What ho! my
jovial roisters, he continued in a louder tone,
striding into the huge vaulted hall through one
door, as his fair niece vanished at the other.
What ho! my jovial roisters, addressing the
laughing group who waited his arrival. Here
have ye an old friend, whom some of ye perchance
have not as yet forgotten. And with a prouder
air and more exulting smile, he introduced his
gallant
son, unseen for many a year, to his admiring
friends. A short half hour flitted pleasantly away
in heartfelt greetings and gay converse of light
moment, but lively, joyous, and sincere. Then
every high-plumed hat was doffed, and every
voice was lowered, as Sibyl Ardenne, with her
attendant
maidens, meetly equipped for the field,
entered
the hall! To horse! to horse! and the
ladies were assisted to their velvet selles by
favoured
cavaliers, and the gallants vaulted to their
saddles, and threw their chargers on their
haunches
by dint of curb and spur, and drew their forms to
the most graceful attitude, as with courtly
merriment
and sylvan music they swept away through
shadowy avenues and over shaven lawns, to the
wilder coppices and more secluded glades of chase
and forest.
CHAPTER IV.
The chase is o'er. Go couple up the pack,
And let your lusty horn ring holyday
To the swinked foresters. We'll hunt no more,
Since duty calls of gravest import stern,
And deep electionof high causes twain
Which is the better!
The
hunt was at its height! The noble stag
which had been harboured on the previous night in
a deep swampy thicket, situate at the extreme
western verge of the chase, and adjoining a wild
tract of semi-cultivated moorlanddisdaining to
seek refuge in the recesses of the devious
woodland
,
had broken covert gallantly, as the first crash
of deep-mouthed music burst from his stanch
pursuers
;
and clearing by a gigantic effort the rough
park-palings, had taken to the open country,
crossing
hill and dale in a line scarce less direct than
the crow's flight, and at a pace that, ere an hour
had passed, reduced the number of those who
followed
the now mute and panting hounds from a
score or two of fearless horsemen to a scant
half-dozen
of the boldest and best-mounted riders. The
ladies of the party had long since been thrown out,
scarcely indeed having cantered a half mile along
the nearest road, after the hounds had left the
confines
of the park; but still the foremost of the field,
with all the hair-brained courage of a boy, and all
the deep sagacious foresight of a veteran
sportsman
,
rode old Sir Henry Ardenne; his manly
features
flushed with the excitement of his healthful
exercise, and his gray hair floating in the current
of air created by his own swift motion, as, cap in
hand, he cheered the laggards of the pack with a
voice that had lost nothing of its full-toned
roundness
.
At length, in a sequestered dell, clothed on
each hand with a dense growth of underwood
feathering its rocky and precipitous declivities,
down which a sandy road wound in short toilsome
curves, and watered by a bright and brawling
rivulet
,
hard pressed and weary, the brave quarry turned
to bay. The deep note of the leading hound
changed to a shrill and savage treble as he viewed
his prey, and at the same instant the loud
death-halloo
rang from the exulting lips of the old
baronet
as he caught and comprehended the import of
that sharp yell. Another minute brought him to
the brink of a wide pool, embayed between rough
cliffs of sandstone, and overlooked by a gnarled and
leafless oak, on the highest branch of which a
solitary raven sat, unmoved by the fierce clamour,
and expecting, with a sullen croak, its share of the
after-carnage. In the farther corner of this basin,
clear as the virgin crystal in its ordinary state, but
turbid now and lashed to foam by the wild conflict
of the animals, the stag had turned on his pursuers
nor had he turned in vain; for one, a brindled
bloodhound, the boldest of the pack, unseamed
Vol. I.G
from shoulder-blade to brisket by a thrust of the
terrible brow-antler, lay underneath his stamping
hoofs a lifeless carcass; while others bayed at a
distance, reluctant, as it seemed, again to rush
upon an enemy who had already left such painful
evidences of his strength and valour on their gored
and trampled limbs. Nor, though his velvet coat
was clogged and blackened with the dust and
sweat, and though the big tearstokens of anguish
in its expression wellnigh humanrolled down
his hairy cheeks, did he exhibit aught of craven
terror at the approach of his inveterate pursuers;
but, as the veteran advanced upon him, with the
glittering wood-knife bared and ready, leaving the
dogs, as if beneath his notice, he dashed with a
bold spring against his human persecutor, eye,
hoof, and horn, in perfect concert of quick
movement
.
The slightest tremour in the huntsman's
nerves, the most trifling slip or stumble, might
have well proved fatal; but, although seventy
winters
had shed their snows upon his head, his
muscles
had been indurated so by constant exercise in
his beloved field-sports, that many a younger arm
had failed in rivalling their powerful though
unelastic
firmness. When the despairing deer made
his last effort, cluding by a rapid turn his
formidable
front, Sir Henry struck a full blow as he passed,
completely severing the tendons of the hinder leg
hamstrung and crippled, the gallant brute plunged
headlong forward, and received in the next instant
the keen point in his gulletone short gurgling
bleat, and two or three convulsive struggles of the
agile limbsthe full eye glazed, and in a moment
all the fiery energy, the bounding life, that had so
rately animated that beautiful form, was utterly
extinct
for ever. Then came the thundering shouts,
and the long cadences of the French horns, their
joyous notes multiplied by the ringing echoes, and
sent back from every heath-clad knoll or craggy
eminence,the merry narrative of harmless
accidents
,the
self-congratulations of the select and
lucky few, who, from the start to the death, had
kept the hounds in view,the queries for the
absent
,the
praises of some favourite horse or daring
rider,the stingless raillery,the honest unfeigned
laughter!
Who hath seen Ardenne? What chance hath
hindered Edgar? suddenly inquired one of the
younger of the party.
Edgar not here! exclaimed his father, for the
first time discovering his absence; Edgar not
here! 'Fore George! but he must bide the jest
for this!
'Tis strange, Sir Henrypassing strange,
though! interposed an old gray-headed forester.
None here can match the master's horsemanship;
and that brown mare hath the pace in her, and the
bottom too. Pray Heaven he be not hurt.
I fear he mayI fear he may be hurt,
exclaimed
another. He was beside me just before
we crossed the northern road. I marked him
charge the Hartley burn right gallantly, and
noticed
the mare's stridenigh thirty feet, I warrant
it.
In a moment or two the wonder had increased
until it might be called anxietyexcitementthe
more so, as at intervals the laggards of the chase
came straggling in, with mud-stained garb and
jaded
horses; yet none brought tidings of the absent
cavalier. At length, sounding their horns from
time to time, they turned their horses' heads
toward
home, asking for tidings of their missing
comrade from every traveller or peasant they en
countered. Naught did they learn, however, till
they had reached the park, when an unlucky groom,
leading his lame and weary hunter by the rein,
informed
them that the young master had been
accosted
,
as he crossed the great north road, by a
passing strangera marvellously sour-looking
knave, the servant said, with a cropped pate and
puritanic garb; that he had curbed his horse to
listen
to him, and on the receiving of some packet or
despatches, he knew not whether, had ridden
slowly
homeward in deep converse with the bearer.
St. George! and with a puritan! cried one of
the young Outrams, a hair-brained, light-hearted
cavaliera rascally, starved roundhead!
He must be strangely altered then, I trow,
muttered the aged huntsman, who perhaps had
taught him when a boy to ride so well, an' he be
gone home with a musty beggarthe hounds
running
breast high, too, o'er the vale of Bardsey!
Tush! tell me not; he is too true an
Ardenne
,
cried his father, almost angrily, that he
should e'er consort with base and brutal fanatics,
Heaven's curse upon them!
It was true, notwithstandingthe report of the
fallen riderto its most minute particular of
circumstance
;
for as he leaped the fence into the
road, and pulled upon his rein to spare his horse's
feet on the rough pavement, a strange-looking man
gaunt, grim, and tall, with an affected air of
sanctified austerity on his pinched features,
wearing
his coarse and foxy hair shorn close to the skin,
and clipped into small peaks alike unseemly and
ridiculous
,
with a tall steeple-crowned hat, and a
sad-coloured
doublet, threadbare and travel-worn,
presenting
altogether an appearance as dissimilar as
possible to that of a gentlemancalled to him in
a pert shrill voice
Canst tell the distance hence to Woodleigh,
the residence of Ardennehim men call Sir
Henry
;
cumbering their tongues with vain distinctions,
titles alike unsavoury and profitless?
A brief three miles, frankly returned the
cavalier
.
But you may spare yourself even that
short distance, an' you list. There rides Sir
Henry
he
on the chestnut horse! I will o'ertake and
stop him, an' your business may not tarry!
Nay, friend, returned the other, my call is
not with the old, vain-minded, carnal cavalier, but
with his sona godly youth, men sayhonest and
sanctified! yea, one of the elect
A truce to thine impertinence, sir knave!
Edgar
replied, in a quick angry tone; a truce to
thine impertinence, an' thou wouldst not receive its
wages; nor deem thy fulsome flattery toward
myself
shall anywise excuse thy ribald scoffing at
my father! Begone, sir; tempt me, an' you be
wise, no farther! and he had already touched his
mare with the spur in order to regain his place
beside
the hounds, which had gained on him some
two fields' width during the interruption, when the
puritan reined his hackney short across the path,
crying out in a voice somewhat diminished of its
self-importance, Nay! no offence! he said; for
if thou be'st the man, 'twere worth thy while to
tarry. I am the bearer of a letter! yea, of two
letters, for the good youth, Edgar Ardenne. I pray
thee to relieve me of the charge.
Begone, sir! To your duty! again
vociferated
Ardenne, in a tone yet sterner than he had
used before. Begone to Woodleigh and await
my leisure. When I return, 'twill be, I warrant
me, right soon enough to look to these despatches.
I know not who should write to me by such a low
and scurvy comrade, that I should lose my sport
to minister to his convenience!
G 2
Well, be it as thou wilt, muttered the puritan;
but, an' John Milton'sworshipful John Milton's
letter meet with no better treatment, I had as well
wend back again to Huntingdon!
Milton! ha! answered Ardenne, who had
already
moved to some considerable distance before
he caught the name; Milton! why saidst not so
before, perverse and insolent? Dally with me no
farther, thou wert best, but give at once thy
missives
,
and follow me direct to Woodleigh.
Ere he had finished speaking he received the
packetsthe one a large and cumbrous parcel,
wrapped in a skin of thick discoloured parchment,
and fastened by a triple band of flaxen thread, with
a huge seal stamped with armorial bearings,
charged
on a broad municipal escutcheonthe other a
small neatlyfolded letter of smooth white vellum,
secured by a skein of delicate sleave silk and drop
of wax impressed with a superb antiquethe stern
and rigid features of the elder Cato. The former
was addressed, with cramped mercantile
penmanship
,
to Edgar, son of the worshipful Sir Henry
Ardenne, knight banneret, and baronet of
Woodleigh
,
nigh to Buxton, in the good shire of
Derby
,
with haste and diligence, post haste! The
latter was directed, in a beautiful but bold and
manly hand, To the noble youth Edgar
Ardenne
.
This was the first he opened, and a
pleasing smile played over his fine features as he
perused the well-turned periods of his already
celebrated
friend.
I much rejoice to hear,thus did the letter
runmost excellent and esteemed sir, that you
have now accomplished, with no hurt or detriment,
your long looked-for return to England; and, what
redounds so vastly to your credit, that you have
comeweaning your thirsty soul from those
delicious
draughts of pure Parnassian waters in which
you have so bathed of late your fancy, and casting
aside your delectation in those Italian cities
wherein
you have so profited by cultivating high pursuits
of literature and conversations of the learnedto
turn the complete
vis
and vigour of your intellect
toward the miserable strait in which our native land
lies struggling,
`Ut clausus Gyar scopulis parvque Seripho,'
a strait so fearful, that she wellnigh has lost, not
only the fruition, present and temporal, of her
liberties
,
both civil and religious, but the very hope
of their redemption. And yet more earnestly do
I rejoice that you are called so suddenly, and with
so honourable circumstance, to take your place in
that high council of the nation, for which your
genius and your talents so excellently do befit you.
I would not wish you in so much to ponder on the
character and principles of them that have united
in this tribute to your worth, if they should be in
aughtalthough good patriots and true
distasteful
to your feelings; as on the mighty services you
well may be an instrument to render, and on the
duty paramount which should enforce you so to
render them, in that most glorious and free
assemblage
on which hangs every hope of England.
But, with respect to this, without attending my
injunctions
;
you have an admirable monitor, a very
entire and pure guide, in your own sense of right,
which to obey is to be virtuous and wise, and in
obeying which you shall at once fulfil the wishes
of your oppressed and lamentable country, and give
the highest pleasure to your well-wisher and friend
constantly,
John Milton
.
From my villa,
Aldersgate
,
Oct.
12, 1641.
The calm deliberation with which the cavalier
had opened and applied himself to read the
familiar
letter of his trusty fellow-traveller, gave way,
long ere he had concluded, to manifest and restless
eagerness; and if he read it through before he tore
asunder the fastenings of the larger packet, it was
rather that he hoped within itself to find a clew
whereby to solve its mystery, than that he was
indifferent
to learn what was the nature of the call
to which his friend alluded. But when he closed
it, still in ignorance of that which it behooved him
most to know, his colour went and came, and his
heart beat quick as he turned hastily to the sole
remaining source of information. The paper that
first caught his eye on opening the packet was a
fair document, in large clear characters, engrossed
on vellum, and purporting to be an invitation from
the freeholders of the good town of Huntingdon
to Edgar Ardenne, that he would present himself
a candidate to fill the seat as member for their
borough in the most worshipful the commons
House of Parliament, lately made vacant by the
untimely
death of their regretted and right trusty
delegate
,
Elias Chaloner. The second was a brief
explanatory statement, signed by the mayor and
several of the leading burghers of the town,
assuring
him, that all he had to do in order to secure
election was to make known to them his
willingness
to serve in parliament, as no other candidate
was in the field; nor, if there were, could any have
the smallest chance of coping with success against
a nominee so universally admired and approved by
every class of voters. No pledge was askedno
line of conduct indicated, to which it was expected
that he should adhereno query hinted at,
concerning
his attachment to either of the parties,
between
which the whole of England was at that
time divided. They were sufficiently assured, the
letter stated, of the integrity, the wisdom, and the
constancy of him on whom their choice had fallen;
so well assured, that they were perfectly content,
without condition specified or question asked, to
place their interests, their hopes, their fortunes,
and, if need were, their lives, at his disposal. In
mute astonishment he read successively these
several
documents; and still, the more he read, the
more his wonder and his doubts increased. That
he, who had been absent from the land of his
fathers
almost from the day on which he first wrote
manthat he, unstamped by any public act or
private
declaration; uncommitted to any party or
opinion, nay, undecided, for aught that the world
knew, in his own mind as to which cause he should
espouse in the approaching contest, foreseen by
him as by all men endowed with ordinary
prescience
of eventsthat he should be thus
summoned
,
within two weeks of his arrival in his
native
country, and that without a pledge, to fill a
place the most conspicuous to which a private
individual
can well aspirethat he should be thus
eminently trusted, and by men whose very names
were strangers to his ears; whose town he had
never even entered save as a passing traveller;
whose principles, but from the somewhat formal
and affected plainness of their style, together with
the unseemly garments and austere demeanour of
their messenger, he had no means of so much as
conjecturing; and who, so far as he could
comprehend
,
must be still more at a loss to judge of the
parts or principles of him, to whom they had so
confidently offered the representation of their
interests
,
the proxy of their united voices;all this
was indeed sufficiently embarrassing, nay,
unaccountable
at any time; and the more so at a period
when political intrigue and treachery were rife,
beyond
all precedent, among the men reputed as the
leaders in the councils of the nation. That such a
call was flattering, and that in a degree not trivial
or accustomed, could not be doubted or denied,
but while he felt that sweetest, most ennobling of
sensations, the conviction that his character was
understood and his worth appreciated by his
fellow-citizens
,
mingled with a high consciousness that
his eloquence, his learning, and experience might
indeed minister not smally to the welfare of his
country, Ardenne was yet perplexed, anxious, and
doubtful.
Nor did it seem that he was destined easily or
by any effort of his own to extricate himself from
this uncertainty; for when, after musing long and
vainly on the import of the letters, he turned for
information to the messenger, that worthy,
doubtless
resenting with all the rancour of a petty mind
the merited rebuke of Edgar, wrapped himself up
in such a veil of real or pretended dulness as
defied
every species of cross-examination applied to
wring from his fanatic obstinacy the reluctant truth.
He had been sent, he said, an hired messenger,
to carry certain missives, not to expound enigmas,
nor to illuminate the darkness of those whom, it
might be, Jehovah had for their sins involved in
the dark night of ignorance. He knew not aught
of the matter; nor, if he had known, should he
have deemed it fitting to reveal that which those
worthy persons, his employers, had found it meet
to leave uncertain. The burgh of Huntingdon, he
answered, when Edgar varied the subject and the
manner of his investigationthe burgh of
Huntingdon
was a true town and godlyits late
member
,
good Elias Chaloner, a man learned beyond
his fellows, not in the vain and carnal lore of the
idolatrous and God-defying heathen, but in the pure
and sanctifying wisdom of the gospel! Of its
politics
he knew not any thing, nor cared. Some
cavaliers
there weredebosht rakehelly profligates
such as the Knight of Hinchinbrook, uncle of
worthy
Master Cromwell, now sitting in the commons
house for the right saintly town of Cambridge, and
others not a few. But of a truth the citizens,
craftsmen, and artisans, ay, and the mayor and
council, were pious and God-fearing men, seeking
the Lord alway, day and night, in prayer and
meditation
.
For the rest, if it were so that they had
summoned Master Ardenne to be their deputy in
parliament, verily theirs was the power to do so
ay, and they knew right well the wherefore! They
were not men, he trowed, to leap i' the dark and to
repent at leisure. If Master Ardenne thought it
good to suit himself to this promotion, his, as was
very fitting, would be the honour and advancement.
If not, the men of Huntingdon would be at little
trouble to elect as good if not an abler statesman
to represent their voices.
In this unsatisfied and dubious state of mind
Edgar, with his uncourtly comrade, arrived at the
park gates; and, quickening his pace, rode hastily
along the noble avenue of elms to the main
entrance
,
flung his rein to a groom, and consigning
his companion to the attentions of the gray-headed
steward, passed with a hurried and irregular step
to his own chamber; there, in undisturbed and
silent
solitude, to ponder on his singular position.
An hour fled by, as with his head propped on his
hands, and his eyes fixed on the characters of
which his mind however took no note, he racked
his brain with almost hopeless efforts to conjecture
who might be the secret movers in this matter.
That his friend Milton had ever been an ardent
votary of liberty, in its most liberal and extended
sensea dreamer of those bright utopian visions
concerning perfect commonwealths and absolute
equality of man, which, in whatever age or country,
never have beennever can be realizeda
modeller
of constitutions excellent in contemplation, but
untested by experience; or, if tested by the
self-styled
republics, but real aristocracies, of early
Rome or earlier Greece, proved only to be fickle,
changeful, and unstable, Ardenne well knew;and
often with delighted ears had listened, and with
a mind that yielded to the inthralling grandeur of
those theoretic dreamings, while it perceived their
fallacy, to the deep-souled and burning eloquence
with which he loved to advocate his wild but
splendid projects. He had moreover heard, that
subsequently to his return from Italy, the sage
enthusiast
had devoted himself with stern and
self-denying
application to the maintenance of the
most rigid puritanic forms of Protestant morality
and doctrines against the laxer customs of the
Church of England, at that time assimilating
itself
daily more and more, through the bigoted
obstinacy
of its reckless monarch, and of that most
dangerous of all his counsellors, the haughty and
half papish Laud, to the detested ritual and creed
of Rome. Nor could he doubt, well as he was
informed of the almost inseparable league between
puritanism in religion and the love of freedom in
the state, that the already celebrated author of
Reformation in England, and the Reason of
Church Government, was no less strongly
interested
in opposition to that extension of prerogative,
already stretched to the very verge of absolute and
irresponsible autocracy, than his illustrious
admirers
and associates, Hampden and Pym. Still he
could not easily give credence to the fancy, that
Milton onlyfor to him alone, of all those patriots
with whom his spirit sympathized so warmly in
their devoted struggles in behalf of England's
constitution
,
was he personally or intimately known
should have possessed the power to procure him
that untrammelled offer of a seat, which individuals
of far greater eminence might have been proud to
occupy. Amid these painful meditations too there
ran a mingled strain of deeper, because more
personal, disquietudean agonizing apprehension,
amounting almost to a certainty, that a seat in
parliament
,
entailing on him, as it necessarily must,
the highest of all moral obligationsbinding him,
with fetters stronger a hundred-fold than the poetic
adamant, to the upholding of that cause which his
mature unbiased judgment should deem right
must set him on the instant in direct unnatural
opposition
to his father; and yet worse, must sever
him from her whose love he surely prized above
all mortal blessings. It was in vain that he
attempted
to shake off the leaden weight of this
dark apprehensionit was to no purpose that hope
whispered to his bosom how all might yet be well
it was to no purpose that he strove to reconcile
the diverse paths of duty and of pleasure. A dozen
times he took his pen in hand to write an answer
to the perplexing invitation; and as often threw it
from him in utter inability to frame a single
sentence
.
Once, at suggestion of his warmer
passions
,
and yielding to the persuasion of that single
grain of selfishness, which must still lurk in every
bosom, even of the best and purest, his fingers
traced three lines of absolute denial; but, ere the
clause was finished, the juster sense returned, and
the torn sheet was in an instant shrivelling amid
the logs that crackled on the hearthstone. No,
no! he cried aloud, in the low husky tones which
Vol. I.H
tell so fearfully of inward agony. No, nomy
countrynever will I betray thee at thine utmost
need!What though my heart be broken in the
strifewhat though I lose all things that make this
earth a paradise and not a hellwhat though I
perish
or,
yet worse, live homeless, friendless,
fatherless
,
desertedhated by whom I most adore, and
cursed by whom I blesswhat though
I, I
, one
man and for one little life, must bear all anguish
that a life can compass,shall I for this shrink
back, knowing that England needs the voice, the
hand, the soul of every son she has, to save her
from destructionto redeem her living millions
her millions yet unbornfrom countless centuries
of servitude and sorrow! The cupthe cup is
filled! God grant me strength to drain itay, to
the very dregs! And with a calm unfaltering
hand he drew a brief but full acceptance of the
trust so proffered to his choice,pledging himself
to act, so long as he should represent their voices,
so, and so only, as his own heart should dictate.
I would, he wrote, before investing myself
with the great and onerous responsibility you wish
to impose upon meI would that you should
clearly know and apprehend my principles and
rule of action. All party I disclaimall
preconceived
opinion from my soul I disavow! To hold
the freedom of our land inviolateof our religion
pure, I do esteem the first of duties. But the
freedom which I look toI do pray you mark me
now, so shall there be no blame hereafteris the
freedom of our British Constitution, not the
licentious
anarchy of democratic innovationand the
religion which I will maintain is the religion of my
fathersthe reformed church of England, equally
aloof from the debasing superstitions of the Romish
creed, and from the stern fanaticism of Lutheran
or Calvinistic sectaries. If, then, on knowing these
my tenets both of church and state, ye make it
your election still to go forward in this matter, I
shall so labourwith such powers both of mind and
body as God in his good wisdom has assigned
meas I may deem the fittest to secure unto
ourselves
,
and unto our posterity for ever, the blessings
of a government at once liberal and firmof a
religion
pure, no less than tolerant and free. If, on
the other hand, ye doubt in aught my motives, or
disapprove my principles as stated heretoforeif
ye do look that I should yield at any time, or
under
any circumstance, my own conviction to the
opinion or the prejudice of otherseven of
yourselves
,
my own constituentsthen make at once a
fresh selection, choosing a man more suited to
your purposes; accepting in meanwhile my high
consideration of the honour ye have done me, in
thus summoning me, as yet a stranger, to the
highest
station of your trust.
Scarcely had he concluded his epistle, ere a
quick heavy footstep sounded through the corridor
approached his chamber door, and paused beside
it, followed by a short firm tap upon the oaken
panel
.
Now comes the crisis of my fate, inwardly
muttered Ardenne, as, recognising on the instant
the footstep of his father, he hurried to admit
him.
So studious, Edgar? cried the veteran;
plunged to your very neck in parchments!The
matter must, I trow, be all-important, that should
have won you homeward from such music as was
ringing in your ears, when you this morning left us
in the Vale of Bardsey! 'Fore George, but he ran
gallantly and straight, poor dapple!turned him to
bay in the Witch hollow beneath Leader hillgored
brindled Mortimer to the death ere I came up with
him, and hurt some six or eight of the others.
What in the fiend's name called you home? What
clouds your face even now so darkly? Speak,
Edgar
,
hast ill tidings?
Not ill, sir, not ill tidings, but of weighty
import
,
answered Ardenne, as his father threw
himself
upon a massive settle in the chimney corner;
and such as have urged on me much grave thought
ere I might answer them! and, as he spoke, he
tendered to his hand the invitation from the burgh
of Huntingdon. Here, if my visage be o'ercast,
here shall you find the causeand this, when you
shall have perused the first, contains my answer.
With deep anxiety did the eye of Edgar dwell
upon the keen intelligent features of the aged man,
fitfully lighted up by the uncertain gleams from the
piled hearthfor evening had crept on them
unperceived
,
and the sky was growing dark apaceas
he read the letters by the firelight. Changes there
were indeed upon the broad unwrinkled forehead,
chasing each other over it in quick succession
now a deep frown corded the muscles of the brow,
but more perhaps from the effects of thought than
from disgust or angeranon it was relaxed, and a
more bland expression played around the mouth,
and the full open eye shone cheerfully. Again
the glance was clouded, and the lip curled in scorn,
till every hair of his mustache worked as it were
instinct with life.
The roundhead scurvy villains! he exclaimed
at length, striking the extended parchment forcibly
with the forefinger of his right hand; the base
mechanical burghers!I marvel they should dare
pollute a gentleman's ear with their accursed
puritanic
cant. You have refused them, Edgar
indignantly
hurled back their most insulting proffer in
their teeth! Is it not so?now, on your life, say
ay!
I see it not in this light, sir, Edgar replied,
respectfully but firmly; I see it not at all in this
lightnor is there aught, to my poor
comprehension
,
either of cant or insult in this invitation.
Doubtless you have accepted itthis flattering
invitation! interrupted the old man, with an
expression
of the most bitter irony; doubtless you have!
I have accepted it, calmly returned his son;
I have indeed accepted it, nor can I possibly
conceive
You have
not
, Edgar Ardenne, his father
almost shouted, as he sprang to his feet, spurning
the footstool from beneath them to the farther
corner
of the room; you have not
dared
to do so!
You! you! an Ardenneheir to some twenty
generations of high-minded, noble, loyal cavaliers
you
blend yourself with the foul puddle blood of
craftsmen and pinched beggarly mechanicsyou
band yourself with hypocrites and traitors against
your church, your country, and your king!No,
no!it can
not
be!
Indeed! indeed! it could not, replied Edgar,
in tones almost femininely soothing; indeed it
could not be, that I should ever mix myself with
aught degenerate or base, much less with aught
unprincipled or traitorous. But, of a truth, my
father, I apprehend not any thingthough
straining
to the utmost of my understandingI
apprehend
not any thing here written to imply aught
that can by any means be tortured into treason or
fanaticism. Nay, for my part, I find not aught that
would restrain me, if I should be so minded, from
degrading loyalty, even as the member for this
very borough, into most prostrate oriental
slavishness
from
bartering our reformed religion for
Romish superstition! A seat is proffered to me
freelywithout condition, pledge, or hint of any
H 2
interference. Nay! the constituents aver that
they refer themselves in all things to my judgment
submit themselves to absolute dictation of my
individual will. Now, sir, it seems to meI pray
you so far pardon me as to permit me speak to
the endit seems to me, ifas I see no cause to
deem them suchthese men of Huntingdon be
fanatics and traitors, there cannot be a better mode
of frustrating their ill intentions, than that I, who
most assuredly am neither, should accept their
offer, and represent their bigoted and treasonable
voices by a most tolerant and patriotic vote!
Sir Henry's passions had displayed their
progress
on his features during his son's rejoinder
even more strongly and with more definite changes
than before. At the first, every line and feature
was inflamed almost to bursting with fierce and
fiery indignationvarying as Edgar proceeded to
that air of obstinate unwilling coolness with which
a man resigns himself to some infliction which he
may not avoid. Then, as the truth of what was
said impressed itself by slow degrees upon his
senses, he listened with attention approaching
somewhat to respect, till, when the last sentence
fell upon his ear, and he fancied that the full policy
of his son was there disclosed to him, the mighty
satisfaction flashed from his whole face as he
exclaimed
Excellent! I was dull indeed! excellent!
Edgar; and so `hoist the knave engineers, e'en
with their own petard!' 'Fore George but you
surpass, not your old father's talents onlythat
you did everbut his uttermost wishes! And so,
when the fool puritans would have you rob the
church and manacle the king, vote like a loyal
cavalier!Now out on me for an old
superannuated
dolt that would not hear or comprehend!
Nay, sir; but even now, said Edgar, not a
little astonished by this ebullition of mistaken
pleasureeven now you do misapprehend me
somewhat. I have accepted this same seat in the
Commons, giving the men of Huntingdon to know
that I will hold myself responsible to no authority
save that of my own conscience. Party, or place,
I hold not to, nor covet. In all high honour and in
all accordance with my own sense of just and right,
will I vote ever!If these men should dare
propose
to me, or hint that I should swerve one
hair-breadth
from the course of truth and honourthen
would I surely disobey themspit at them, and
spurn them. But, if they should prove honest, as
surely will I compromise no tittle of their interests
or their opinions; and so far am I from suspecting
aught of this, that I do well believe that my
constituents
will prove right honest men and trueelse,
under favour be it spoken, I deem it most unlikely
they should have fixed their choice on mea man
perhaps not altogether void of some repute of
honour
,
andif unknown myselfat least a scion of a
family that has not ever stooped to fraud or to
disgrace
!
Enough said! Edgar; enough said! I was a
fool to doubt thee; and the old man grasped his
hand with warm affection as he answered, while a
tear slid down his withered cheek; I was a fool to
doubt theefor thou wert ever true and noble, as I
was ever over-choleric and rash. Some things too,
in good sooth, there are, that might be well amended!
This ship-money I like not altogethernor these
violent forced subsidiesyet less like I the sordid
puritanic knaves who do oppose them, not that
they know or understand the evil of the measures
which they rail at, but that they would embarrass
and annoy, and, if their means were mated to their
will, perchance o'erturn the government from which
those measures emanatenot that they love their
country, but that they hate their kingbecause,
being base themselves, they loathe the very name
of what is high, or generous, or noblebecause,
having naught to lose even in England's ruin, they
may gain all in the midst of uproar and confusion.
But enough said!you shall receive their offer,
since so you will it, although I hold a promise of a
borough from my Lord of Middleton awaiting your
acceptance, for whichI speak it in all candour
I would far rather have you member than for this
beggarly psalm-singing body corporate of
Huntingdon
.
But enough said!Bear with me, Edgar, for
I am old, and choleric withal, and hasty! And now
to supper! For John, cook, will be foaming an
his goosepie be burnt, or his beef boiled to rags
as with o'erflowing eyes he swore to me they
were last night, and all through fault of mine!
CHAPTER VI.
'Tis hard to part
When youthful hearts with treasured dreams are high
Of sunny days, and calmest nights serene,
A happy future!but on harder far,
When dark anticipation veils the scene
With melancholy clouds, and hard at hand
Sits chill despairthat vulture of the soul
Watching the latest gleam of hope expire
To pounce her conscious prey.
Time
journeyed onwardand with a flight as
rapid, when every day and hour was charged with
tidings of some great event, with some terrific
rumour
,
or some perilous foreboding, as though it had
ebbed noiselessly away in peace and in obscurity.
The golden days of autumn had already flown
the last slow wain had dragged its freight to the
piled threshing-floorthe last flower had shed its
petals scentless and colourless upon the frosted
grass. The leaves, that had for many weeks
clothed grove and forest in a rich garb of
many-coloured
splendour, now detached themselves one
by one from the sere branches, and fell whirling
slowly in the heavy atmosphere, like hopes
blighted
before accomplishment, to the dank steamy
earththe glimpses of the sun were rarer and
more pallid than their wont, and often in the depth
of night the mighty winds went forth, wailing as if
in sorrow over the faded glories of the year. Nor
were the signs of the times less gloomy than the
tokens of the season. All England was in
confusion
and dismay, and both these hourly
increasing
,
till the one half of the people was wellnigh
maddened by its fears, the other by the excitement
of its own fierce and stormy passions. To-day a
rumour was abroad of mighty armaments levied
beyond
the sea; and even now preparing to pollute
with foreign weapons the free soil of England, and
to erect the power of her monarch, already stretched
beyond all limits of constitutional sway, into
absolute
and self-controlling tyranny. On the next, a
tale was rife that Pym, the champion of the
people's
cause and king of their affections, had been
assailed, perhaps even murdered, by the hired
emissaries of a sovereign stern and cold by nature,
and rendered merciless and cruel by the extremity
of terror. Then came the one great accusation,
swallowing up in its atrocity all lesser charges, all
inferior crimes, as the sunshine drinks up and blots
from heaven the fainter lustre of the stars!The
one great accusation, at that time generally credited
by men of every class except perhaps a few of the
most confiding and most generous cavaliersand
since those days confirmed almost beyond the
possibility of doubtthat the Irish rebellion, with
all its horrible features of midnight massacre and
midday conflagration, was the premeditated, coolly
calculated, work of Charles and Henrietta! The
one great accusation, penetrating every breast, in
every rank of persons, with mingled sentiments of
pity, horror, hatred, and disgust; imbittering still
more against him the foes of the misguided
sovereign
,
and alienating from his side many of those
devoted and enthusiastic spirits, that never would
have swerved from their allegiance, so long as they
had sense or being, had he but shown himself in
the most trivial circumstances constant, not to his
faithful servants, but to his own true interests, or
even to himself. In the Commons house the minds
of men were even more unsettled than in the world
at largeparties ran daily higher, and with a greater
share of virulence and private animosity than at any
previous period; and, indeed, it seemed that the
king himself was labouring as earnestly to the
advantage
of his enemies, the puritans, as they
themselves
could wish. At the first meeting of the
parliament, a committee had been appointed to
draw up a general remonstrance of the state of the
kingdom, and the particular grievances it had
sustained
;
which, after its first nomination, had,
however
,
scarcely ever met, and was almost forgotten.
But now, during the causeless and protracted
absence of the ill-fated monarch in the sister
kingdomirritated by his apathy with regard to
bleeding Irelandappreciating fully his dishonest
motives in lingering at a distance from his
parliament
and
goaded almost to madness by his
attempt to seize or to assassinate, as many did in
truth believe, Argyle and Hamiltonthe party
came to the resolve of reproducing that
momentous
question; and, in accordance with their views,
upon Strode's motion, it was carried, that the
committee of remonstrance be revived, and
ordered
without more delay to meet; and time and
place incontinently were appointed. Within a
few days of this measure, a bill of far more
questionable
character, and justified aloneif it might
any way be justifiedby the unwonted and most
unbecoming violence of the spiritual lords, who
lent themselves in every instance as willing
instruments
to aid the usurpation of the sovereign, and
scrupled not to violate the spirit and the letter of
the laws against the Romish churchwas
introduced
,
ordered by a majority of voices to be read,
and, without any opposition worthy of remark,
transmitted to the lords, for the disabling the
bishops from the exercise of voting in the upper
house, or of any temporal office throughout the
kingdom. Just at this critical and anxious
juncture
,
with his accustomed rashness and inveterate
obstinacy, Charles deemed it fitting to collate five
preachers of undoubted eminence and learning, but
known as well for principles of state the most
obnoxious
as for their talents, to as many sees vacant
by death or by translationin absolute defiance, as
it seemed, to the desires of the popular branch of
legislation, and contrary to the advice of his most
trustworthy and valuable counsellors. In the midst
of the tumultsfor to an extent which scarcely can
be designated by a less forcible word was the
violent
struggle carried between the upper and the
lower housesconsequent upon this doubtful
measure
,
tidings arrived in London, that on a day
appointed
,
having arranged all matters in that
kingdom
to the general satisfaction, his majesty intended
to depart from Scotland on his homeward progress;
and straightway the committee offered the report
of their proceedings, together with a draught of the
remonstrance, to the house; which instantly,
although
divided much in sentiment, and, as many
thought, in general opposed to this decisive stroke,
proceeded to discuss it with a degree of bitterness
and fury perhaps unprecedented except in the
debates upon the case of Strafford. In the
meanwhile
an answer had been returned to Ardenne by
his constituents of Huntingdon, agreeing fully to
the terms he had proposed, whereon to serve them
in the Commons as their representative and
member
;
and urging him, so soon as it might be
consistent
with his leisure, to betake himself to
London
;
there to assume his seat. All preparations had
been made for his departure; chambers secured
for him in Westminster; his retinue and horses
sent before him; nay, even a day fixed whereon
again to leave, after so brief enjoyment of its
serene and tranquil pleasures, his paternal home.
He felt not, it is true, that terrible sensation of
passionate and overwhelming sorrow which drowns
the hearts of the young at their first setting forth
into the wide and cheerless world, from the dear
roof that saw their birth!much less that sullen
and collected bitterness with which the exile gazes,
ere he turn from them for ever, upon the scenes
never before so beautiful or so beloved!but he
did feel a heavy and continual gloom clouding, he
knew not wherefore, all his anticipations of the
futurean ominous and all-engrossing sense of
coming evila prophetic fear, that it would ne'er
be his again to cast away the burden of his
sorrows
,
and be, as it were, once again a child in spirit,
beside that old domestic heartha fear not
justified
,
perhaps, by any clear perception, nor founded
upon any evidence of judgment; but still
oppressing
his mind, no less than the influence of a coming
thunder-storm is often seen to agitate the lower
grades of animal creation, when not a speck of
cloud is visible as yet above the clear horizon.
As far indeed as regarded any real or well-founded
apprehensions, Ardenne had every following day
less cause to dread a rupture with his father in
consequence of any difference in politics; for so
completely had the old man taken up the notion
that his son intended to apply his nomination by
the puritanic party to the advancement of the
royal interests, that Edgar fruitlessly endeavoured
to apprize him of the error, and to convince him
of his own sincerity and singleness of purpose.
Right! right! boy, he would cry; never
betray
your counsel!and in good sooth thou hast a
perilous part to play, and a politicbest vote a
few times with the canting knavesso better to
throw dust i' their eyes, that they discover not thy
game ere it be fit time to disclose it, husbanding
so thy powers as to aid our gracious master in his
real straits, an' it should comewhich God avert
to such an issue!
For a time, indeedso utterly abhorrent was
the smallest shadow of deception to his ingenuous
mind and rigid sense of honourhe strenuously
and sincerely strove to make Sir Henry
comprehend
his principleshis entire devotion to the laws
and constitution of his country, as established by
the precedent of ages, not as interpreted by the
corrupt and pensioned lawyers of the courthis
firm attachment to the privilege of Parliament, as
opposed to the prerogative of the crownand,
over all, his absolute disgust at the late
proceedings
taken by the king in relation to the claim of
ship-money especially, and to the infringement of
Vol. I.I
the anti-Catholic statutes;but finding all
endeavours
vain to overturn his preconceived opinion, he
abandoned altogether the ungracious task, in an
uncertain
state of mind, bordering at one moment on
hope, at another on its opposite extreme, despair;
arguing within himself, when brighter thoughts
prevailed, that, as his father's violence of loyalty
was even now so greatly modified as to permit
him to allow the participation of corrupt men, and
the existence of evil measures, in the councils of
his kingly idol, his own course might so far tally
with his views, or, at the worst, might differ from
them only in so small particulars as to call forth no
very strenuous or lasting reprobation;and again,
when giving way to gloomier though perhaps more
probable imaginations, foreseeing that the obstinate
determination of the sovereign to dispense with
parliaments; to recognise the laws of the land but
so far as they should further his own imperious
wishes; to rule, in short, as an absolute and
arbitrary
monarchand the noble stand assumed by
the delegates of the people in defence of the
people's
rightswould by no means ever be composed
or reconciled except by arbitration of the sword;
and farther, that in such a case, as certainly as he
should be himself found warring in the ranks of
freedom, so surely would Sir Henry arm to
buckler
the time-hallowed names of church and king,
although the former should be almost Romish, and
the latter utterly despotic.
Thus was the mind of Edgar balanced during
the interval which elapsed between his first
acceptance
of the proffered honour and his departure for
the metropolisits moods as various as the changes
of an April day, now bright with sunshiny and azure
skies, now blackened with the scudding rack, and
howling with the stormy gusts. The days,
however
,
wore onwardthe chase in the morning, with
its heart-stirring sounds and high associations, or
the stroll through the highly-cultivated grounds
about the homestead, or the familiar visit to the
independent yeomen or the sturdy peasantry,
consumed
the earlier hours; and, when the mid-day
meal was ended, the ramble in the beautiful broad
park, beneath the autumnal trees, with his sweet
cousinthe ramble, finished, as it seemed to them,
almost before it was commencedbeguiled the
hours till twilight, when the lamps would all be
lighted, and the guests assembled in the lordly hall,
or the smaller circle gathered about the parlour fire,
to cheat the evening with lay and legend, or with
sprightly converse, more pleasantly than with loud
minstrelsey and the gay dance. The days, however,
wore onwardand although none else perceived the
constant cloud that dwelt on Edgar's brow, Sibyl
had marked and understood it; and, as if in
sympathy
,
her own transparent skin showed less and less
the healthful hues of her elastic bloodand her
deep eye was always dimmer than its wont, and
often tearful, as it would dwell unnoticed on the
overshadowed features of her lover, now constantly
absorbed, as he had rarely been of yore, in fits of
meditation, abstracting him entirely from the
business
or the pleasure of the moment. After the
morning following his return to Woodleigh,
although
on other topics there had been no reserve
however trivial, no hesitancy or concealment of
action, thought, or motive, neither had again
alluded to the subject of their interrupted
conversation
he
shunning it, not merely because he
could have
naught agreeable, but because he
had
naught definite which to communicate, and
therefore
was unwilling, needlessly perhaps, to cloud
her prospects with certainly a distant, and not
improbably
a causeless, terror!and she not pressing
it, because, relying with a pure and holy confidence
upon her promised husbanda confidence inferior
only to her trust in her Creator!because seeing,
that, be his secret sorrow what it might, he felt it
not his duty at that time to impart it to her ear!
and because she would have scorned herself could
she have entertained the thought but for a moment
of obtaining that from his fondness, which his
judgment
would not warrant his bestowing!
It was not long, however, before Sibyl had
another and a surer reason for her silence; for,
with that wondrous shrewdness which a woman's
heart possesses in divining and discovering any
thing that may affect it in its own particular
province, she fancied herself ere long to be the
mistress of the causes of his hidden grief. She
saw the struggle in his heart between his love for
her and for his father, and his devotion to his
country
.
She knew that in the heart of such a man the
struggle could last but for a single hour ere it must
be decidedshe suffered no diminution of her
self-respect
,
no fretting of her vanity, as she
acknowledged
that her own claims to his affection must
surely yield to the overruling
amor patri
and,
while she sorrowed with the deep sincerity of a
true and loving heart over the election which, she
was assured, he had already made, she yet thought
she hardly could desire that he had decided
otherwise
!And
even yet there was another cause!
a lingering hopethat she might yet have been in
errorthat she might falsely have interpreted the
outward workings of his minda fear of banishing
that lingering hope, by questioning of that which
she most yearned to knowa dread of learning
that, which even now almost knowing true, she
would have given worlds to know unreal.
The days wore onward, and the last morning
broke, and the last sun arose, which was to shine
on Edgar a dweller in his father's house. It was
a clear, bright, cheerful morninga slight touch
of frost on the preceding evening had imparted
just enough of coldness to the atmosphere to
render
it more pure and bracing, but the sun shone
warmly out, and the dew sparkled laughingly upon
the shrubs and grass, and the rooks clove the liquid
firmament with their exulting wings at an
immeasurable
pitchall nature seeming to rejoice with a
more healthful and elastic joy than in the fullest
flush of summer. It was, in short, just such a
morning as would make the careless and
unburdened
heart sit lightiler on its throneas would
impel the mounted traveller to give his horse the
spur, and let his spirits loose by a free and fearless
gallopas would swell the pedestrian's chest, and
plant his stride more firmly on the sod, and
perchance
unclose his lips with something of a song
but it was such a one withal as would cause one
departing from some loved and lovely scene, to
need a stronger effort to tear himself away than he
would have been called on to exert had the skies
been lowering, and the day in nearer unison with
his own sad sensations. Accordingly, the tone of
Edgar's feelings were depressed beyond their
wont, even as the aspect of all visible things was
fairer than the promise of the seasonhis mien
was careworn, and at times it scarcely would have
been too strong a term to call it haggardhis gait
was various and irregular, hasty at times and
hurried
,
and at times unusually slowhis eye was
often fixed on vacancy, and those who would
address
him were compelled to speak their wishes
more than once ere they appeared to reach his
understanding
.
The earlier hours were consumed in
I 2
preparations till high noon came round, and he
sat down to the last meal he was for many a
month to taste in fellowship with those who sat
beside him, while the unwelcome thought would
still intrude itself, that it might be verily the
last
. In silence then, if not in sorrow, dinner
went by, until the board was cleared of all save
cup and flagon, and the old servitors withdrew,
and Sibyl vanishedto attend, perchance, her
household duties, or, more probably, to give in
private
vent to the gushing feelings which she in
public was compelled to smotherand sire and
son were left without companions. For a while
the old man spoke not, resting his head upon his
hand as if in anxious thought; and, although once
or twice he raised it and made as if about to
speak, he yet seemed at a loss for wordsat
length, as if with something of an effort, he
aroused himself, filled up his goblet from the stoop
of Bordeaux wine before him, and, pushing it
toward his son, motioned that he should follow the
examplegazed for a moment wistfully upon the
clouded features that met his eye, and with a nod
and smile that vainly struggled to be lightsome,
emptied his winecup.
Come, Edgar, come! he said, this gloom
will never do!Cheer up, kind heart, cheer up!
Thou takest on more sadly now methinks than
when thou left us for thy three years term of
service
in the Low Countries! but I can see how sits
the windold though I be, and past these toys
this many a winter's dayI mind when I was a
young cavalier, and notalthough I say it who
should notthe most unlikely in the court of good
Queen Bess, we ne'er shall look upon her like
againI mind how I was wont to droop at parting
frompoor Alice!Sibyl, though passing fair, is
naught for beauty to what she was!Welltoo
well! do I mind it.
Ardenne, who had shaken off his air of
abstraction
for a moment as his father drank to him, was
again relapsing into the same listless mood on
perceiving
that his words were rather unconnected
musings than such as called for answer or remark
but when the name of Sibyl caught his ear, his
eye lightened, and the colour rushed to his brow, as
he perceived that his inmost thoughts were about
to be subjected to the keen probe of mental
surgery
!
Ay! ay! I can see plain enough how
sits the wind, continued Sir Henry, without
pausing
for a reply; though why you should be so
cast down, I may not comprehend so readily.
Your cousin Sibyl, I do know right well, has long
possessed your love, and as long too returned it.
That I have in all things approved of this, I need
not tell you now, seeing that you must well
conceive
,
that knowing this and not prohibiting was
to all needful ends consenting. That you should
be cast down at leaving of so sweet a girl as Sibyl,
isI gainsay it notright natural; nathless I
cannot
but imagine that you do apprehend some greater
evil than a mere temporary separation. Now, boy,
to the point!You would espouse your cousin
Sibylshe says not nay!and if my interference
be a cause of dread to you, I say but this, that you
have cruelly misjudged your father's heart! My
benison on you both! I know no sweeter balm
for all the manifold griefs of age, than to make,
and to see, the youthful happy. So set your soul
at easebrave boyyou shall wed Sibyl when
you will; and the more quicklythe more gladly
and more surely shall I witness it. You start for
Westminster to-night; and I have meditated
somewhat
often now of late on passing this next
Christmas-tide
in London. Sibyl, poor child, hath seen
naught of court-gayety nor of the world as yet, and
this is but a lonesome place in winterthe more
so now that half the gentles of the land will, as it
seems too likely, be detained till spring in the city
by these protracted sittings of the Houses, which
men speak of. I have determined now to give
you a commissionchoose me a fitting mansion
whether to rent or purchase I care not a maravedi
in the Strand if thou mayst, if not in
Westminster
or Charing!see it right nobly furnished, and
write me when 'tis done. I will bring Sibyl thither
straightway, and, sith you may not spend these
holydays with us, why we will keep them up with
you, I warrant me. And now away to Sibyl; say
to her all that I have said to you, and what beside
seems fitting to your melancholy mood. Thou
needst not me, I trow, to woo her. Fix, if you
may prevail on her, your bridal day at once
whene'er ye list, 'twixt Christmas-tide and Easter.
Be happy, Edgar, be happy, and let me see you
sosuch is my only wish this side eternity,
before
I go to my long home.
My goodmy generousmy gracious father!
cried Ardenne, affected to the point of weeping, as
he threw himself upon the old man's neck; too
good! too generous!
Tush! tush, boy!None of this! exclaimed
the veteran, hemming away the husky weakness
from his throat; none of thisbut away with
you to Sibylshe is more fitting object for these
raptures than an old weather-beaten trunk like me.
Away with you! but hark yehere is the ring
that plighted my departed angel. Let me behold
it on
her
hand, whom I have loved the bestnay,
I might say, the only oneof women, since my
own Alice left me, to drag out my pilgrimage alone,
without one hope to cheer it save that of meeting
her once more, when it shall be, O Lord, thy
merciful
and blessed will.
It would have been of no availso bent was the
old knight on his benevolent designit would have
been of no avail, even had Edgar been so minded,
to strive to alter or oppose his projects. They were
not such, however, as to leave a possible desire to
his son, which would not be, by their
accomplishment
,
at once achieved. He had no words to
answerbut the hot blood rushed tumultuously
through his veinsand his strong frame quivered
visibly with the excitement of his spirits, as he
hurried from the hall to seek his beautiful
betrothed
.
Once mine, and all beside is nothing!
once mine, there will be no more struggle! Duty
and pleasure will go hand in hand! Once wedded,
and no difference of opinion then may put those
asunder whom God has joined together! Such
were the thoughts that thronged with irresistible
impetuosity, and with the speed of light, upon his
busy brainbut he had not made six steps beyond
the threshold before reflection changed the
prospect
.
Would it be noblehonourableupright
thus did he commune with himself; would it be
worthy of an Ardennethe supporter of an
unblotted
fame of generationsnay, rather, would it not
be sordidbasedishonestand degrading to the
lowliest gentleman, to win a credulous confiding
woman by a fraudby an implied, if not a spoken,
lie?To let her wed, believing him she wedded a
supporter of the cause she deemed most holy, a
soldier armed for the warfare which alone to
her seemed just and sacredto let her wed in
haste, and then find out at leisure that she had
been deceivedvilely deceivedby him she had
just sworn to
honour?
Not so! he cried aloud,
It shall not be, by Heaven! She shall know all
allevery thing! Knowing, she shall accept
my handor knowing, cast me off, but not at least
despise me! And, as his mind arrived at its
mature though swift conclusion, he reached the
door of Sibyl's oriel parlourwith a hesitating
hand he struck the panel, and so slight was the
sound that it conveyed no tidings to the inmate
at least it was unansweredagain he knocked, and
louder than beforehe listened, and still all was
silence. Supposing her he sought to have gone
forth, he had already turned away to follow her,
when a faint noise, as of a person breathing
heavily, or perhaps gently weeping, attracted his
attention; he knocked a third time, and then
though still unbiddenentered. She was within
she was alone!in the prostrationin the
absolute
abandonment of feminine and hopeless grief!
Her face was buried in her hands, as she lay
stretched at length on the broad pillowed settle
which encircled the bay window. Her light brown
hair, which had broken loose from the confinement
of her silken headgear, flowed in redundant waves
over the voluptuous outline of her shoulders,
trailing
down even to the ground. Her features were,
of course, concealed; but the large pearly tears,
forcing their way one by one between her fingers,
had already left a visible trace of moisture on the
damask cushions, while the convulsive starts that
agitated her entire frame told even more the depth
and anguish of her sorrow than all her weeping.
Sibyl, he whispered, stealing with noiseless
steps over the three-piled Persian carpet till he
was close beside her; my ownown Sibyl!
there was a deep fond pathos in his musical
accents
which no description could expressa liquid,
melancholy tenderness, that sank directly to the
heart; My ownown Sibyl. And with the
most respectful delicacy he lifted her from her
recumbent attitude; and weeping too for me!
but weep no longer, dearest oneI comeI
come! Oh grant it, God, that it may be soto
wipe those tears awayto make you minefor
ever!
She gazed upon him for a second's space,
wildlydistrustfullythen, as she perceived his
earnest air, and marked the hope that kindled in
his smilethen brighter thoughts prevailed; and
with the sudden strange revulsion, abandoning
herself to the full tide of her warm, passionate
feelings, she sank half fainting on the bosom of
her lover.
Oh grant it, Father of all merciesgrant it,
that this too mighty treasure shall indeed be
mine! he murmured fervently, as he supported
her, and with considerate expressions of calm
fondness recalled her gradually to her
self-possession
,
suppressing every sentiment that might
embarrass
her returning consciousnessthat might in
any wise offend or agitate her girlish sensibilities;
holding her hand in his the while, but with a quiet,
unimpassioned pressure, liker to the expression of
a kind brother's love than to the rapturous
devotion
of a youthful suiter; soothing her with the
gentlest tones of his familiar voice, till she was at
the least sufficiently composed to listen to his
self-restrained
and self-accusing pleadings.
Sibyl, he said at length, as her deeply-drawn
sighs subsided, and her tears ceased to flow in
such unnatural profusion; Sibyldear cousin;
soonsoon, I trust, to be addressed by a far dearer
title, I have muchmuch that I would say to you
before I go from hence, never unless at your
permission
to return!much from my fatherfor
myself yet more!Dry your tears, dearest, dry
them, I beseech youit is agony to me to look on
them!dry them, and listen to me, that we may,
if it be Heaven's pleasure, be happy as the
happiest
of earth's inhabitants.
Say on, she difficultly faltered forth the words,
say on, dear Edgarwith my whole soul I do
attend you.
Not here, he answered, not here, sweet one
and not yet! But do your mantle on, and walk
forth with me for a little space. You are too
greatly agitated yet, calmly to hear, and freely to
decide on that, which, for your happiness'for your
life'ssake, you must consider warily and well!
The pleasant sunshine, the fresh grateful air, and,
above all, the peaceful and quiescent scenery, will
tranquillize your mind. Moreover, I would not
that this sun should set unwitnessed by us twain
together. You will go forth, then, dearestwill
you not, Sibyl?
A smile, exquisitely sweet, glancing from out
her tears, was her sole token of assent, as she
disengaged
herself half blushingly from his supporting
arms, and, gathering her dishevelled tresses, folded
them simply, but in the most perfect taste, around
her classically moulded temples.
Wait for me in the vestibule, she saidI
will be there ere you shall have the time to miss
me; and vanished from the room, leaving a stronger
hope in Ardenne's breast than he had entertained
for many a day. He was assured in his own mind,
beyond the possibility of doubt, that she had
marked the secret conflict of his soul, that she had
penetrated his sole mystery, and was aware already
of his apprehensions, as to the part which it might
ere long be his duty to sustain, whether it should
lie in the grave and subtle forum, or in the
lamentable
field of civil strife; and he now listened to
the flattering voice within, which whispered that it
might well be, a maiden so affectionate, so warm,
and, above all, so deeply and devotedly attached,
would overlook the difference in their political
creeds, as counterbalanced, rendered nugatory, and
a thing of naught, by their entire harmony of soul
on every other subject. It might well be, that one
so strong herself in principles of honour and
integrity
,
would find more to admire in the inflexible
and stern uprightness which will not sacrifice one
particle of conscienceone straw's bulk of that
which it considers dutybefore the shrine of its
most intimate and near affections, than to rebuke
or reprobate in the opinions or the principles on
which that duty hinges. But he had not long time
to waste in thought or speculation; for, as he
reached the entrance of the hall, the form he loved
so well to look upon came gliding down the
staircase
,
wrapped in her walking-robefitted above the
waist with accurate precision to the mould of her
unrivalled shape, but full below and flowingof
dark velvet, furred at the cape and cuffs with the
most costly minever; and wearing on her head a
cap of ermine, its silken crown and lining
protruding
from above the border of deep fur, and hanging
gracefully down, with a white ostrich-feather
drooping
over it, so as to flush one delicate cheek more
warmly than its sister with a teint borrowed from
its own bright crimson. With a passionate and
fitful light, far different from the calmness of their
wonted radiance, the eyes of Edgar dwelt upon
the finely-modelled person, and the features, not
the less exquisitely fair that they now wore a
melancholy
,
downcast aspect, of her, on whose
acceptance
or denial of his present suit his all of hope
was fearfully suspended. So long, indeed, and
Vol. I.K
evident was that fixed gaze of admiration, and so
much was she pained by its expression, that the
bashful blood rushed like a torrent to brow, cheek,
and neck, with blushes scarcely natural, so vivid
was their hectic colour. Perceiving instantly the
cause of her confusion, with an air of deep humility
he lowered his offending eyes, and, as he took her
hand to lead her forth, Pardon, he whispered, in
low, reverential tonespardon me, gentle cousin,
my most unwitting and involuntary fault!if fault
it be he added, with a voice that faltered, and
then abruptly paused, as if he were unable to
complete
the sentence. A quiet pressure of the fingers
that yet lingered in his tender grasp, replied at
once, and reassured him; and in the silence caused
by feelings or by thoughts too powerful for
utterance
how
widely different from that of apathy or
dulness!they for the last time wandered forth
into the pleasant solitudes of the broad sylvan
chase.
Throughout the greater part of its extent, this
ornamented tract, although diversified enough by
change of dale and upland to redeem its beauties
from the charge of tameness or monotony, was
rather of a level than a broken character; its
charms were chiefly of that tranquil and composing
cast which is found rather in expanses of deep
meadow-land, carpeted by a sward so fresh and so
luxuriant as to lose little of its verdure even in the
dead months of winterin the massive foliage
of the scattered clumps, or more continuous groves
of stately timber-treesand in the sheets of limpid
but unrippled water, than in the features of a
scenery
,
which, if more romantic, is far less alluring;
if more enchanting to the first astonished glance,
bears not so well the test of daily and familiar
observation
.
Towards its northern and northwestern
boundaries, however, the ground was swelling and
uneven; the hills heaved up more boldly from the
valleys, which were in places so abrupt and narrow
as almost to deserve the name of glens, or dingles,
and often wore a coronet of gray and rifted
sandstone
above the purple heather, that clothed their
flanks with a dark russet mantle wheresoever the
soil was too poor or too shallow to support the
taller growth of hazel, birch, and mountain ash,
which clustered round their bases, or straggled up
their sides where any casual streamlet had worn a
channel to protect them from the western gales,
and afforded by its waters a grateful although
scanty nutriment to their dwarfed and thirsty roots.
Imbosomed in these rugged eminences, at a short
mile's distance from the manor, there lay a little
tarn or mountain lake, scarce larger than an
artificial
pool, but so deep that its glassy waters shone
black as polished jet even beneath the azure skies
of June. Narrow, however, as it was, it yet could
boast its isletstwo, fringed from the water's edge
with tangled underwood, above which waved some
three or four tall trees; the third, a bold and
barren rock, whereon some feudal ancestor had
perched his solitary fastness, dismantled now and
roofless. On every side but one the hills sank
steeply down to the lake's brink, leaving no space
for the adventurous foot of man, feathered with
coppice springing from every rift or crevice of their
rocky sides; but on that one a turfy glade sloped
gently to the marge, where it was bordered by a
stripe of silver sand, which formed a bright and
sunny frame to the dark mirror it enclosed. Just
where the turf and sand united, a single and
gigantic
oak, known as the friar's tree for miles
around, reared its short massive trunk, garnished
with limbs as tortuous and forked as the antlers of
the wild herds that loved to rub their budding horns
against it in the early springtide; but supporting,
even in the flush of summer, only a sparse and
scanty garland of green leaves, which rustled now,
all sere and yellow, in the melancholy breath of
autumn. Immediately beneath the shadow of this
forest patriarch, and partly overlapped by the
encroachment
of its twisted roots, lay a huge block
of deep-red freestone, bearing the marks of rude
and half-obliterated sculptures, in which some
village
antiquarian had traced or fancied a
resemblance
to a cowled and sandalled figure, whence
the prevailing appellation of the tree; which,
ancient
as that relic evidently seemed, had probably
been in its prime already when there it had been
placedplaced only to survive the memory of the
event or actor it had fondly been intended to
immortalize
.
It might have been the cover of a tomb
it might have been a monument designed to
celebrate
some great or wonderful achievementbut,
whatever was its pristine use or destination, it
afforded now a pleasant seat, cushioned with soft
luxurious mosses, and sheltered equally from
summer
heat and wintry gales by the huge stem and
gnarled boughs that overhung it. A lovely and
romantic spot this wasso still, so lonely, so
sequestered
from the eye by intervening thickets,
that, although situate at scarce a bowshot from the
most frequented walks, it yet was rarely visited but
by some passing forester, or some true lover of the
undecorated face of nature. For this cause,
perhaps
,
it had ever been a favourite haunt of Sibyl,
who, when a fairy maiden of fifteen, was wont to
resort thither with book, lute, or pencil, as the
fancy of the moment prompted, and for no other
reason had it been the usual termination of her
young wooer's wanderings. What was the aim of
Edgar in choosing this fair solitude to be the scene
of that most sacred audience which he had come
forth to demand, he could not have, perhaps,
himself
explained. It might be he had formed some
half-confessed and indistinct idea, that here, in the
familiar trysting-placethe home of so sweet
recollections
,
the shrine of so innumerable hopes
she would lean to the soft side of the heartwould
be more liable to yield herself to fond and
passionate
impressions, than to weigh matters with an
equable, calm scrutiny. It might be that habit
merely, and the trick of old association, had
conducted
his feet thither, while the mind was far
removed
from thought of time or place; or it might
be that, wise and philosophic as his spirit was, there
yet lay dubiously concealed within it one of those
strange superstitious touchesthose creeds of the
heart, not of the judgmentfrom which the bosoms
of so few, even the coolest and most stern
inquirers
,
can altogether wean themselvesone of those
fancies which we all at times have felt, that some
peculiar spot, or hour, or person, is secretly
connected
with the clew and crisis of our destinyis,
as it were, the hinge whereon the portals of our
fortune turn, opening to our steps the unknown
paths of future good or evil. Whatever were his
thoughts, however, during their silent progress to
the friar's tree, scarcely had he placed her on the
monumental stone, and stretched himself before her
on the dry white sand, ere he poured forth, in a
voice of so sweet harmony as might have well
beguiled
the ear and won the heart of the most
determined
votary of celibacy, a tide of language fraught
with such eloquence, and yet so practical in
meaning
so
deep in sentiment, and yet so pointed in
expressionthat few lips, perhaps, but his, could
have delivered it, without incurring some reproach
K 2
of studied insincerity, or awakening some feeling
of distrust. He told her of his hopes, his doubts,
his terrorshe told her how a cloud, he knew not
wherefore, had overshadowed his horizon, chilling,
as it were, the very sources of his most permanent
and warm affections; he told her how he valued
her the most of all things earthlythe most of
all
things, save his God, his country, and his honour!
How to him her wedded love would be indeed the
all in allcapable of making that which else were
misery the highest and most pure enjoyment;
how, to win it, he would lay down willingly rank,
name, fame, fortune, every thing save virtue! He
told her that, without that crowning gift, he should,
though wealthier than the wealthiest, bear but a
beggared heartthough girt with myriad friends,
be desolate and lonelythough dwelling in his
very birthplace, be a divorced and home-sick
exile! He told her of the violent and ceaseless
strife between his passion and his conscienceof
his profound devotion to herself, battling and
scarcely to be overcome by his more deep devotion
to his country's weal. It may be, he continued
it may be that I am but a timorous dreamer
but a trembling visionary, shaking at causeless and
unreal terrors. It may be that the trials, which I
shudder merely at foreseeing, shall never come to
the proof; but this is what I dreadand what,
though dreading, I may not, if it come to pass,
avoid or shrink from, even to win what were to me
a thousand times more dear than lifethe
miseries
of intestine war let loose to devastate our
smiling
country!a wild and bloody strife, dividing
brother against brother, sire against son, husband
sweet Sibylhusband against wife!A strife
between a king determined to be absolute, a people
to be free! If these things come to passthough
my life be barren, and my deathbed deserted
yea, though my heart be broken in the conflict
yet must I be for ever the sworn soldier of my
country's freedom. It may however beHeaven
grant it so!that I do falsely calculate the signs
of coming wrath; it may moreover be, that, as I
am, so are you a friend to liberty and justice, more
than a worshipper of kings! and, if so, all shall
yet be well. My father, Sibyl, my old, kind father,
hath proffered freely his consenthath urged me
to obtain your promise, that you will be my own
before this coming winter shall have made way for
spring flowershath implored me `that he may see
us happysuch is his only wish this side eternity
before he go to his long home!' Be mine, then,
Sibyloh be mine, ere the fierce storm of war
shall burst, which may divide us, and for ever
be mine to cheer, to guide, to comfort, and to bless
be mine for weal and wofor time and for
eternity!
While he had spoken, though her lips quivered
often, and parted more than once, as if she would
have interrupted himthough her colour went and
came in brief and fitful flashesthe lovely girl had
never once withdrawn her eyes from his pale face
pale with the struggle of contending passionsnor
yet relaxed her pressure of his cold damp hand;
and, as he paused from his deep-souled and eager
pleading, she replied at once, though her voice
faltered
,
and the big tears slid down her cheeks.
It is, then, she said, it is, then, as I dreaded!
and our young hopes have been but as a morning
vision! Oh, Edgar, EdgarI have thought, I
have hoped, I have prayed that these things might
not be, and yet toooh, too surelyhave I known
they must! and she hurried onward with her
speech, as if she feared that she should lack the
strength to act up to her resolution. Men will
say, she went on, with increasing passionmen
will say, and say
truly
but I care notthat it is
unmaidenly in me to speak in words how madly,
how devotedly I love you. My hope of hopes
has beenyou cannot doubt it, Edgar, no! no!
you cannotto know myself your wife; and now
my hopes are anguish and despair. But think not
that I blame youthat I love you, honour you,
adore you, one thousandth part the lesswhen I
sayGod grant me strength to bear itwhen I
say, that we can nevernever nowbe one.
Your
father has to
me
been asnay, moremore
than a father. To his heart your defectionsuch
will he term and feel ityour defection from the
loyalty of your high race will strike a wound, that
but one other blow could aggravate or deepen.
Were I to fall off likewise, he would die, Edgar;
die, and leave to us his sole bequesta father's
malison. No, no! I must stay with himmust
console the old man in his barren and unfriended
sorrows; must sooth his cares, and turn aside his
anger, lest it wax hotter and more deadly than
you, you, Edgar, shall be able to endure. Nor is
this all. I am a poor, weak girla frail, confiding
creature, of a sex whose duty and whose nature is
obedienceobedience to our king, our husband,
our God! I argue not!I hope not, fancy not,
that I can change your judgment, founded, as it
must be, on firm conviction; nor would I change
it if I could! That which in women is nature,
virtue, may well in men be cowardice and crime!
Your intellect is strong, and wise, and wonderful
mine womanish and weak! Nor should I love
and venerate you as I do, could you surrender up
your wisdom at the bidding of my weakness.
Then, as I respect your scruples, respect mine
also. The sapling bends, indeed, to the wild blast
that bows it; but, when the hurricane is overpast,
it stands no less erect than the proud oak that
yielded not an inch to the storm's fury. I in my
weaknessyou in your strengthwe are alike
immoveable
.
Yours I
can
not be now
may
not be
ever! But of this be certainwedded or single,
royalist or republican, living or in death, you only
shall I love, you only honourhonour and love
more deeply, that I know you greater in adherence
to that which I must deem fancied and erroneous
duty, than did you think as I. There is one hope
for us! Edgar, my Edgar,
one!
If this wild
storm pass byif the green homes of England be
unstained with native bloodand how more
fervently
than ever shall I now pray they be sothen
may we yet be happy.
The blood rushed coldly to his heart as he
heard her out, nor, though he had expected every
word she uttered, was the shock less stunning or
the anguish lighter than if the stroke had fallen on
him unaware. Too well, however, did he know,
and too entirely respect, the principles which
doomed him to eternal and unutterable sorrow, to
speak one syllable in answer or entreaty. One
kiss, he murmured, through his set teethone
last kiss, my own lost Sibyl. And she fell upon
his bosom unresisting, and her white arms were
twined about his neck with a convulsive clasp,
and their cold lips mingled in a long embrace that
had no taste of passion or of pleasure, and their
tears flowed together in that gush of unchecked
misery.
Before an hour elapsed Ardenne had left the
mansion of his fathers. The old knight wondered,
and was grieved, but silent; he saw, at an eye's
glance, that his own hopeshis first-born's
happiness
had
been dashed rudely down; but, to
imagine
wherefore, conjecture was itself at fault. He
wept upon his neck, blessed him, and sent him
forth! A pale form, indistinctly seen through the
fast gathering twilight, stood in the oriel window
as Edgar slowly mountedbut the burst of
agonizing
sobs that followed his departure was
distinctly
audible. Enough! Timanthes veiled the
face, on which the extremity of sorrow was
engraved
in characters so fearful as to defy the
utmost skill of human portraiture.
CHAPTER VII.
This is true liberty, when freeborn men,
Having to advise the public, may speak free,
Which he who can, and will, deserves high praise;
Who neither can, nor will, may hold his peace;
What can be juster in a state than this?
Milton, from Euripides
.
It
was a dark and gloomy afternoon in the latter
days of November, when Ardenne, having already
gone through all the necessary steps preliminary
to his entering on his novel duties, and having
devoted
a few days to renewing ancient intimacies,
or forming new relations, with some of the most
leading men of either party, took his way for the
first time toward the honoured precincts of St.
Stephens, around the walls of whichnow, alas!
levelled to the ground for everthe collective
eloquence
of ages had shed even then a halo of more
than mortal glory. The house had been some
time in session when he entered, and, to his
almost
irrepressible surprise, in passing to his seat,
the object that first met his eye was the ungainly
figure of the stranger who had succoured him near
Royston, habited, as heretofore described, in
garments
coarse, unseemly, and ill-made, standing
beside
the table, which at times he violently struck
with his clinched hand, and speaking in a sharp,
croaking voice, against delay in the discussion of
some motion then before the house. It did not
seem to Edgar, as he looked hastily around him,
that the members listened with much attention to
the fiery but somewhat involved declamations of
this worthy; but, after a few moments' survey, his
notice was attracted by the bent brows and
compressed
lips of a considerable number
gravely-attired
and stern-looking men, who sat apart even
from those who were completely recognised as
favourers of sweeping measures of reform, and
ever and anon responded to the sentiments
expressed
by the speaker with a deep hum or sullen
cheer of approbation. He could see, too, that
Hampden, with whom he had advanced already
beyond the earliest steps of friendly intercourse,
was not inattentive to the words of this
strange-looking
personage; although at times a smile
would flit across his comely features at some wild,
undigested thought, or strong denunciation fiercely
disproportionate to that against which it was
levelled
.
He had not, however, much space for
observation
,
since the orator, who, it seemed, had
wellnigh finished his harangue ere he came into
the assembly, now resumed his seat; and was at
once succeeded by a youthful gentleman, whom
Edgar recognised for Lucius Carey, Viscount
Falkland, of an exterior so prepossessing, that in
another man it would have been the principal
attraction
,
though in this instance it was but the
goodly shrine of a surpassing soul. His form was
slight, but elegantly framedhis countenance, of
singular and softened beauty, had for its most
obvious
traits a low, fair forehead, from which the
waves of his light brown or almost flaxen hair hung
down in natural curls below his cheeksa full
blue eye, well opened and expressivea bright
complexionand a lip, rich, ripe, and wooing as a
woman's. He was clad handsomely, in doublet,
short trunk hose, and cloak of dark blue velvet
slashed and lined with rich white taffeta, and was
in all respects a person whose appearance would
denote a man of birth and bearing. His voice, as
he began to speak, was sweet and tunable, and,
although
weak at first, increased in energy and
power as he proceeded, till Ardenne felt that he
had never listened heretofore to any one
combining
in so eminent a degree persuasiveness and
strength of language. From the Lord Falkland's
words he quickly gathered that the measure under
consideration was no other than the famous and
much contested bill of general remonstrance, which,
it appeared, had been at this late hour brought
forward
by the opposition party, when the morning
had been wasted in minor and unprofitable
questions
,
with the hope of smuggling it, as it were,
through the house, during the absence of many, its
most known opponents. The speech of the young
nobleman was luminous, though brief; and
touching
in no respect on the principles or object of the
bill, went clearly and directly to the point,
asserting
that it should not, at that irregular and most
indecent hour, be forced upon the assembly,
unprepared
,
at least, if not reluctant to consider it.
Loudly applauded by the moderate party, as well
as by the open antagonists of the measure,
throughout
the whole of his speech; and not less warmly,
though more sparingly, at times by its impartial
and sincere espousersHampden, and Pym, and
Hollishe concluded with a motion that the house
should presently adjourn, and that this question
should be entered upon the next morning at nine
of the clock, and every clause debated, the speaker
in the chair. As he sat down, a dozen members
rose at once on opposite sides, and for some
minutes
all was clamour and confusion, trampling of
feet, loud cries of Question! Order! and Go
on! mixed with vociferated names of favourite
orators, called on to utter their opinions. At length,
however, Lenthal, the speaker of the house, with
his clear, sonorous voice, enforced obedience to the
chair, and quiet was again restored. Lord
Falkland's
motion instantly was seconded by Hampden,
in a few words, forcibly but simply urging the
necessity
that this great question should be freely
discussed
and openly, by all who might decide to take
a part therein. The house was cleared for
question
,
and the adjournment carried with few
dissenting
voices. There was but little tarrying within
the body of the house; but, as they passed into the
lobby and down the parliament stairs, men fell into
little knots of two or three, discoursing, some on
the occurrences of the discussion just concluded,
and some on matters of more general and varied
interest. It was at this moment, just as Edgar fell
into a group in which he had observed the figures
of Hydein after days more celebrated as Lord
Clarendon and Chancellor of EnglandSt. John,
Lord Digby, Colepepper, and Hampden, all spirits
in some sort congenial to each other; all being
favourers, ostensibly at least, though differing in
mode and measure, of reform, both in the church
and statethat the orator, whom he had judged at
the first sight to be Lord Falkland, passed by so
closely as almost to brush his person with his
Vol. I.L
cloak, deeply engaged in conversation with his
mysterious fellow-traveller. This latter cast a
glance of recognition toward him, accompanied by
a short, unceremonious nod, though without making
any pause, or breaking off in his discourse, which
he continued in such tones as reached the ears of
Ardenne.
But verily, he said, but verily, I see not
wherefore you would have it thus put offfor this
day would right quickly have decided it.
There would not have been time enough,
replied the other, shortly; for it would sure take
some debate.
A very sorry one! a very sorry one, my lord,
if any, answered the puritan, who was already
passing out of sight, when Edgar touched the
shoulder of John Hampden, whom he had
previously
addressed. I pray you, of your courtesy,
he whispered, Master Hampden; I pray you,
tell me, who is yon slovenly and clownish-looking
man in converse with my lord of Falkland? for I
do see he is on your side, by his warm speech
to-day.
That sloven,
[1]
[1]
This very remarkable and prophetic speech was actually uttered
by Hampden, in reply to the question, as given above, of Lord Digby,
in the first year of the Long Parliament; i.e., at a date a little
earlier
than that assigned to it in the text.
answered Hampdenand, in
after days, when the undaunted breast of him who
spoke was mouldering in its bloody cerements, not
the least noble victim of that lamentable strife, his
auditor remembered those prophetic words
whom you see before you, hath no ornament in
his speech. That sloven, I say, if we should ever
come to a breach with the king, which God forbid!
in such a case, I say, that sloven will be the
greatest
man in England.
Indeed! said Ardenne, thoughtfully, indeed!
I had not thought of him so highly. And yet, I do
believe, nay, I am well assured, I have
encountered
him before. His name
His name is Cromwell, replied the patriot;
Oliver Cromwellmember now for the good
town of Cambridge, and little known as yet, or
listened
to, save by a few austere religionists; yet
of great parts! unwearied diligenceundaunted
couragepenetration, that intuitively reads the
wariest hearts, and perseverance, that will yield to
nothing human! That you have met him I can
well believeat leastwise he doth know, and
reckons
of
you
highly! You will be here to-morrow,
Master Ardenne, he continued, after a momentary
pause; you will be here to-morrowand with
us
,
I trust! If we should lose this bill, it will, I fear
me much, go hard with England's liberties.
Here I shall be, past question, answered
Edgar
.
I scarce should hold myself an honest
man were I to quit my station in the crisis of the
storm; although, he continued, with a smile,
although
that station be a new one, and its occupant
but strange and inexperienced. Here shall I be,
but more you must not ask of me. How I shall
vote, or if indeed at all, till I have heard both
reasons
and objections, I may not easily decide.
Wherefore, good Master Hampden, if you do care,
in truth, for the assistance of my vote, you were
best call to aid that eloquence and depth of
reasoning
whereof I hear men bear such testimony; and
so convince me that my country's weal requires it
at my hand! Give you good-night, fair
gentlemen
,
he added, with a courteous motion toward
the company; we meet again to-morrow.
If you be not in more than common haste,
said Hampden, laying a slight detention on his
arm as he turned round to leave the lobby, I
will entreat you tarry, while I speak ten words
with my Lord Digby. Your lodging lies, if I
mistake not, this side Charing; and my road is
the same. If you can wait on me five minutes at
the farthest, I will rejoice to have your homeward
company; and will upon the way, I do assure you,
exert what reasons I possess to win you to
conviction
.
Ardenne assented. Nor did the minutes which
elapsed while that high-minded patriot
remonstrated
as
it would seem by his quick, energetic
whisperswith the tergiversating noble, pass
heavily
,
as he conversed with the distinguished men
who seemed to givedesirous each, perhaps, of
winning to his respective faction a partisan so like
to prove of weight in the then equally poised state
of partiesthat eager and respectful heed to every
word he uttered, which cannot fail to please the
minds even of those the least accessible to
ordinary
adulation. With a glance pregnant of
meaning
,
and an admonition strongly urged, although its
import could not be distinguished by the
by-standers
,
Hampden turned from Lord Digby and
announced
his readiness to walk, flinging his cloak
in several folds over his left arm, and bringing
round his rapier's hilt to meet his grasp if needed
precautions not uncalled for in those times of
fierce and virulent commotion.
As they passed down the stairs, the men in
waiting recognised their masters, and fell at once
into their places; two moving on in front with
lighted links or flambeaux, necessary in those days,
when the most frequented thoroughfares of the
metropolis
could boast few lamps but those which
graced the residence of some great nobleand
two stepping along three paces in the rear, their
eyes warily moving to and fro, and watching with
keen scrutiny the air of every passenger who met
or overtook them; and their hands in frequent
contact
with the pommels of their swords. For,
notwithstanding
the eulogium passed some years
before
by a French resident of high distinction on the
orderly and peaceful regulation of the English
capital
,
in honourable contrast to the debauched and
dangerous turbulence of Paris, party spirit at this
time ran to such a height, and tumults were so
constant
between the factions recently accommodated
with distinctive titles of cavaliers and roundheads
tumults in which much blood was spilt and even
some lives lost, the sturdy citizens resisting with
their bats and cudgels the rapiers of the disbanded
officers and other desperadoes ever to be found
about the palace of Whitehallthat few, whose
purses could maintain such followers, esteemed it
safe to walk the streets by night without their
armed attendance; particularly such as were
obnoxious
to assault, or insult at the least, in
consequence
of party eminence or of political renown.
At a few steps distance from the house they
encountered
a stout body of the train-bands, well
equipped with muskets, swords, and bandoleers,
forming a portion of the guards which, on the
news of the attempt against Argyle and Hamilton,
the commons had required to be detailed for their
protection by the Earl of Essex, at that time
general-in-chief
on this side Trent; and to this it might
perhaps in some degree be owing, that during their
walk homeward no circumstance of annoyance or
attack occurred to interrupt the converse of these
high-minded men; who, though but newly and
imperfectly
acquainted, already felt, each for the
other, that reverential admiration which is often
the precursor to familiar friendship. At Ardenne's
L 2
lodging door, with feelings of increased respect,
and with renewed promises of a meeting on the
morrow, they then partedthe one hastening to
some nightly conclave, there to deliberate with his
associate patriots on measures rife with England's
wealthe other to stretch his limbs upon a
sleepless
couch, and ponder the effects of his accession
to the popular party on his own fate and fortunes.
Kind sleep, however, came at last, to seal up for a
little space the sources of his deep disquietude, and
to allay, until another sun should wake him to fresh
struggles, fresh anxieties, the feverish tumults of
his bosom. Still, so engrossing was the subject
which last had occupied his mind before he sunk
into slumber, and so powerful the operation of his
spirit even while the body was buried in what
seemed absolute oblivion, that scarcely had the
earliest indications of the wintry twilight crept
through the fogs of the near river ere he awoke,
and, starting instantly from his bed, began to do his
garments on, summoning the while his sluggard
followers to prepare his morning meal. But,
notwithstanding
all his haste, so gloomy was the
dawning, and so late, at that drear season, the
uprising
of the sun, that he had scarce the time to
snatch a hasty morsel before his horses were
announced
to bear him to St. Stephen's, and, almost
at the self-same instant, two gentlemen to speak
with Master Ardenne!and, with the word, John
Hampden entered the apartment, accompanied by
a person of most unusual and forbidding aspect.
Austere, fanatical, and gloomy he might have been
pronounced at the first sight by any person
moderately
skilful at deciphering men's characters from
the expression of their features. His dress would
not, perhaps, entirely bear out the chargefor such,
and a most grave one, was it deemed by the wild
cavaliersof puritanism; for, although uniform
and rather grave in colour, it yet was cut with
attention
to the prevailing mode, as well as to the
setting off a person infinitely less ungainly than his
countenance was harsh and extraordinary. His
hat, too, which he carried in his hand, was
decorated
with a feather, and his sword hung from a
shoulder-knot adorned with fringe and tassels.
Before
,
however, Edgar had well surveyed the
stranger
,
he was addressed by his companion of the
previous
evening. We have, I fear, intruded
somewhat
on your privacy, he said, at this unwonted
hour, I and my good friend, Harry Vane the
younger
;
whom I beseech you, Master Ardenne, know as
such; right soon, I trust, to stand in similar relation
to yourself; but we were both desirous of your
company this morning to the house, and I would
fain propose that you shall for the present occupy
a seat nigh mine. Till you shall be in some
degree
accustomed to the usages and method of the
house, it may be my experience shall in somewhat
profit you; and I fear not to make this offer,
seeing
that, should you find hereafter that your
conscience
may not justify your being one of us, I
shall provide that none may look on you as a
defaulter
from our partyand I have heard and seen
enough, methinks, already of your character and
bearing to know that, even should you differ from
us as to the quality or manner, you are not like to
be against us as to the needfulness of some reform;
so that to be seen companying one so hateful to the
courtly faction as John Hampden, shall in no sort
prevent you of advancement.
Most thankfully, said Edgar, after exchanging
courtesies with Vane, do I accept your offer;
the rather, that as yet I know not, though I fain
would learn, the persons of many among your
famous
oratorsand for the rest, my vote will not,
nor my opinion either, be affected anywise by
sitting
in this place or that. But now, if I mistake
not, time is urgent, and we should be on our way.
Ride you, fair gentlemen? My horses wait even
now; but if you walked thus far I shall dismiss
them
We came on horseback, and it is indeed full
time we were at the house; the bells rang nine
some time ere we arrived, replied Sir Harry.
We will, if it so please you, get us at once to
horse.
The pace at which they rode, when they had
mounted, prevented the possibility of any serious or
connected conversation, and but few minutes were
consumed in the brief gallop that brought them to
the low-browed portal of St. Stephen's. The
privates
of the civic guard on duty at the door
presented
arms, as if to some high officer, as the
patriot
leaders passed them; and it was not long ere
they were seated all together in the body of the
house, at no great distance from the speaker's chair.
The galleries were crowded, as it seemed, wellnigh
to suffocation, not with the ordinary idlers who
resorted
thither only to dissipate the tedium of an
hour not otherwise employed, but with men whose
anxious faces, and limbs that almost trembled with
excitement, announced the deep and painful
interest
they took in the debate, which had commenced
already; and with a spirit so unusual at the opening
of a measure as might be held a sure prognostic of
the fiery and determined ardour with which it would
be carried on ere it might come to question. At
the moment when they entered, Hollis was on his
legs, urging with logical and beautiful precision the
absolute necessity of fixing, and on grounds so sure
that they should never more be moved the limits
between right constitutional prerogative and
absolute
despotic powerpointing out the gradual and
successive innovations by which the ruling
monarch
had encroached on all the liberties, both civil
and religious, of the English peoplethe
tampering
with jesuited papiststhe evident dislike to
parliamentsthe most illegal levyings of money
by violent and arbitrary contributionthe billeting
of irresponsible and lawless soldiery on private
householdersthe imprisoning of members
contrary
to privilege of parliament, for words or
sentiments
expressed thereinOne of whom, he
proceeded
one
noble, and eloquent, and wise, and
loyalthan whom no better subject breathed the
breath of life within the girt of the four seas that
compass BritainDIEDmiserably diedfor want
of natural refreshment! Whose blood, he added,
in loud and pealing tones, that woke an echo in the
breast of every free-souled manwhose blood
of life, untimely and unrighteously dried up, still
criescries even from the dungeon-walls wherein
yet lies the mouldering clay whence persecution
drove the free and fearless spiritstill cries, I say,
to every English heartcries, trumpet-tongued,
for vengeance! Wildly and fiercely rose the
mingled shoutfor it was nothing lessof
approbation
and disgust. Eliot! exclaimed one bolder
than the rest, making aloud the application which
all had tacitly perceived; Eliot! the murdered
Eliot! while the hall rang with diverse cries of
Treason! Vengeance! Order! the latter
word prevailing gradually, even as the rest
subsided
,
till the orator again obtained a clear field for
his manly elocution. With a lower voice and less
impassioned manner, he proceeded to recount a
train of grievances that seemed to defy
enumeration
the
new and unfair tax of ship-moneythe
seas ill guarded, and the mariners left naked to the
violence of Turkish piratesthe depopulating of
the city, so to raise enormous finesthe seizing
of the merchants' money in the mintthe
shameless
project of brass coinagethe barbarous and
reckless censures of self-constituted courtswith
their imprisoning and banishingtheir
stigmatizing
,
gagging, scourging, and mutilatingay! I
said
mutilaling!
he went on, with energy
befitting
well his subjectmutilating the free limbs
of uncondemned and unoffending Britons! And I
say this, he cried, louder and clearer yet, I say
this, not of an Ottoman Divannot of a Spanish
Inquisitionbut of an English Chamber!of a
Star Chamber HERE! Here, in the land of Magna
Charta!Here, where the code of Alfred is not as
yet forgotten or extinct! A chamber judging
not
by law, and trying
not
by jury! A chamber
forcing men to yield their substance to be wasted
in the raising armies and equipping fleetsfor
what?what, but to compel their fellows, their
Protestant and pious brethren, to worship
Him
who made them, according, not to conscience nor
to faith, but to the will of painted potsherds!
scarlet iniquities!hoary and venerable sins!
wolves in sheep's clothing!faithless and hireling
shepherds, hounding the dogs upon the flock which
they should guard and cherish!prebends, and
deans, and bishops! And, amid a tumult of
applause
,
the popular and weighty orator resumed his
seat, while Hyde uprosenot, as it seemed, to
answer
,
but to palliate, to palter, to procrastinate; for
not once did he summon courage to question or
deny that which no earthly wit or wisdom could
disprove. And fiercely as the measure was
discussed
,
it was yet most remarkable that not one of
the royal partisans, maintaining, as they did most
resolutely, the debate from morning till past
midnight
,
spoke so much as a word to the denial of
these chargesurging alone the wantonness of
representing with such sharp reflections things,
some of which already were amended, and others
in fair state of promise toward adjustmentthe
impolicy of alienating more the good-will of the
king, now well disposed to gracious reformation
or, above all, the wickedness of thus infusing
jealousies
,
and strife, and discord into the bosom of a
state at this time flourishing, as some had the
audacity
to add, beyond all previous precedent in the
fair growth of freedom. All this made forcible
impression
on the clear mind of Ardenne, as he
listened
with enthusiastic feelings, it is true, but still
with calm discrimination, to the successive bursts
sometimes of eloquence, thrilling, sublime, and
almost
superhuman in its majestysometimes of
coarse, fanatical, and phrensied ravingswhile Glyn
and Maynard, Cromwell and Pym, and lastly, the
unrivalled Hampden, advocated this great measure
equals all, if not in perspicuity of argument or
vividness of torrent elocution, if not in talent or
ability, at least in truth and fervour, and in that
single-minded
earnestness which proved past doubt
their genuine and deep sincerity. At first he
waited
with strong interest the rising of some champion
who should turn, or at the least dispute, the
triumph
with the speakers of the liberal party; then,
as one after one they took their places at the table,
and spoke their speeches, varied in vigour and in
brilliance, but monotonous in argument, or rather in
the want of it, a sense of disappointment overcame
him; and by slow degrees the strong conviction
gained, that the cause must be indeed vicious and
feeble for which its most devoted favourers, wise,
eloquent, and witty as confessedly they were, had
nothing to advance beyond what he had that day
heard with mingled feelings of contempt and
wonder
.
Hours flew past like moments; and, before
Edgar knew that it was noon, evening fell dark on
the discussion; then, neither party willing to
adjourn
,
candles were called for, and the strife of
words went on, waxing more wild and fierce as
each successive speaker added his mite of fuel to
the fast-kindling blaze. Meantime the house grew
thinner, as the weary and the weak, the delicate in
health or frail in years, reluctantly departed,
actually
worn out by the lassitude that succeeds ever
to unnatural excitement; and the arena of the
mental
gladiators became more open to their virulent
contention. And still, at each succeeding pause,
the liberal party seemed to gain in strengththe
mighty hum of approbation rose more audibly at
every bold and popular sentiment; while the cheers
of the diminished royalists now failed to rouse their
flagging and disheartened orators. So wondrous
was the prevalent excitement, that it drove even
the calm, dispassioned blood of Ardenne dancing
through all his veins like streams of liquid fire;
and he found himself ere long lending his breath
to swell the shout of admiration that followed every
sentence uttered by the latter speakers. At length
the house divided on the passing of the bill; and
however certain the result had seemed while
distant
,
so thickly mustered the opponents of the
measure, that many an honest heart fluttered in
doubt, and many a face of England's noblest sons
was dark as midnight with despondency. During
the moment of confusion which always must occur
at such a crisis, a whisper fell upon the ear of
Edgar
a
low, stern whisper, not addressed to him,
nor at that instant comprehendeduttered, as he
fancied, in the sneering tones of St. John. Look
now! it saidlook now, friend Oliver, to your
most promising recruit! The answer came,
though he saw not the speaker, in the harsh voice
of CromwellNay, verily! but do thou look
and thine eyes shall see the truth of that I told
thee!
All, at the time, passed with the speed and nearly
with the tumult of a whirlwind; nor, although
afterward
he sometimes deemed the words had
reference
to himself, did they then penetrate beyond his
outward ear. Without a momentary doubt, a
thought of hesitation, Edgar stepped forth, and
sealed the downfall of his private fortunes by the
vote which he recorded in the cause of England's
liberty. A small majority of but eleven voices
passed that eventful bill, the loss of which would
have exiled hundredsthe best and wisest of the
landdriving them forth to seek, amid the
snowclad
wilds of the New-England shore, what they
had then despaired at homefreedom to worship
God.
Scarce had the hearty cheering which followed
this announcement ended, ere Hampden rose again,
to move that there might be an order entered for
the present printing of itand straightway, as if
all that had preceded it were but the prelude and
slight skirmish which so generally leads to a pitched
battle, a debateif that which was all animosity,
and virulence, and fury can be called debate
ensued
,
which speedily effaced all recollection of the
previous struggle, and had wellnigh steeped the
hands of the contending factions in each other's
gore. Hyde started to his feet the first, praying
that he might have permission to enter his protest
believing, as he said, such printing of the bill,
without concurrence of the lords, to be alike
unprecedented
and illegal; and, ere he had well
ended
,
Vol. I.M
up sprang Jeffry Palmer, a member of high
standing in the house for wisdom and experience,
no less than for distinguished talent, with flashing
features and a voice that quivered with hot passion,
moving that he likewise might protest! The
mildest and most stately of demeanour among the
assembled counsellors might be seen with
bloodshot
eyes, and tones husky and cracked with
clamouring
and
the more sullen and fanatical sitting
with teeth hard set, and hands upon their hilts, as
if but waiting for a voice to cry The sword of the
Lord and of Gideon, or some other text of warlike
and blood-thirsty import, before they should betake
them, in their own language, to the carnal weapon.
So critical, indeed, was the conjuncture of affairs,
and to such lengths had private pique and public
animosity been carried, among men all armed in
token of their gentle birth, that, writing coolly in his
journal after the heat and passion of the contest
had gone by, Sir Philip Warwick has recorded,
that when they voted it I thought we had all sat
in the valley of the shadow of death; for we, like
Joab and Abner's young men, had catched at each
other's locks, and sheathed our swords in each
other's
bowels, had not the sagacity and great
calmness
of Mr. Hampden, by a short speech, prevented
us, and led us to defer our angry debate until next
morning. And so in truth it was; for at two of
the clock past midnight, when he saw that nothing
could be hoped in the then temper of the house,
that wise and upright statesman moved an
adjournment
until two of the next afternoon, prescribing
motives so replete with good sense and good
feeling
,
that none so stubborn as could, with any show
of right, gainsay him.
Worn out and wearied, body and mind alike,
with the protracted contest, men of both parties
mingled hurriedly as they flocked homeward; and
again it was the chance of Ardenne strangely
enough to be ear-witness to a conversation
between
Cromwell and Lord Falkland. The
former
he had joined, hard by the foot of the great
staircase, desiring in some degree to cultivate
relations
with a man whose words and aspect had
imbued
him with a feeling which he could not well
account for or define, but which in after days he
mentioned as a prophetic awe, for that he was in
presence of a spirit mightier than his own. The
latter overtook them suddenly, and was passing
onward at the first without addressing either, till
he caught the eye of Cromwell. Ha! he said,
with a quiet smile, not wholly free from irony
Ha! Master Cromwell, think you there hath been
a debate to-day?
Another time, replied the puritananother
time, and I will take thy wordbut verily, I say to
youverily, as the Lord Jehovah liveth, had this
remonstrance been rejected, then had I sold mine
all of worldly substance on the morroway! and
had taken up my staff, and girt me with my sword
upon my thigh, and never had seen England any
more!
Nor you alone, perchance! answered the
youthful noble, after a moment of reflection.
Methinks
I have heard others named for a like
resolution
!
Perchance!Me no perchance! cried Oliver,
with a triumphant smile. Had the malignants
carried it, I tell you that their victory had robbed
old England of her trustiest spirits! But now, my
lord, mark well my words!and you too, friend
if that you be, as I do partly think you areand if
you be not, and I be in error, then may the Lord
enlighten and amend youa friend to liberty, mark
well my words! There shall be no stint more, nor
let, nor hinderance! Papists and tyrants in this
soon-to-be-regenerated land shall no more hold
dominion
!
The name of Englishman, now scorned
and scoffed at throughout Europeyou, Edgar
Ardenne,
you
do know the truth of that which I
avershall be as far and wide revered as ever was
the name of antique Roman! For verily I tell ye
and I tell ye truththat now the Lord's good
time hath come, when he shall choose him out a
MAN! I say not whomnor were it meet that I,
the vilest and most worthless of his instruments,
should judge whom the Lord listeth to appoint
but verily, I say, a MAN, who shall bring mighty
things to pass in Israel!
CHAPTER VIII.
Lo! how 'tis ever on the stillest day
When the breeze stirs not in the topmost bough
The aspen's quivering leafwhen peaceful clouds
Hang balanced in the dull and moveless air
When earth and ocean bask in deep repose,
Securely tranquilthat the thundrous storm
Rends the calm sky which bred it.
After
that mighty trial of the strength of
parties
the
bill of general remonstrancehad passed
through the house, there followed a short pausea
lull, as it were, in the loud tempest of commotion
a breathing-space snatched from the midst of
battle. With the exception of a short and
somewhat
turbulent debate on the day following that of
the main question, originating in a wish on the part
of the puritanic leaders to punish those who had
protested on the previous night, but resulting merely
in a penalty of form inflicted on one person, Jeffry
Palmerthe commons seemed to relax in the
vigour
of their defensive warfare against the crown.
The bill for regulation of the militia and prevention
of forcible impressment, unless in case of actual
invasion, was, it is true, brought forward, but
without
any of that inveterate and rancorous spirit
which had signalized their earlier measures. The
king, on his return from Scotland, was received
chiefly in consequence of the exertions of Sir
Richard
Gourney, the lord mayor of London, an active
and uncompromising loyalistwith loud, if not
sincere
,
manifestations of welcome and affectionwas
feasted at the Guildhall with more than ordinary
splendour, and hailed, as he passed to and fro the
city, with thundering acclamations by the wavering
and worthless populace. A farther triumph still
awaited him in the address presented at his
residence
of Hampton Court, by aldermen deputed
from the city, requesting him to take up his abode
among them, and to hold his court, as heretofore,
in his palace of Whitehall. This loyal and
well-timed
addressreputed, as it was, to be distasteful
in no small degree to parliamentwas graciously
accepted; the deputies all knighted, and the request
granted joyfully. The bills, moreover, most
obnoxious
to the kingthat principally which would
exclude the bishops' votesmade but slow
progress
,
and, even should it pass the commons, was
not expected to receive the sanction of the lords.
Falkland and Colepepper, heretofore active
members
of the reforming party, although moderate and
wary, now having taken office openlythe former
being secretary of state in lieu of Vane, the latter
chancellor of the exchequerheld nightly
conferences
at the house of Hyde for the well and
M 2
wisely ordering the shaken and dismantled
principles
of government; and would, as it seems
probable
,
have met with eminent success in their
beneficent
and patriotic measures, had it not been for
secret influences and the prevalence of counsellors
behind the throne, unseen and unsuspected, but
exercising
and
for ends most infamous and selfish
a power, to which, unhappily for him and for his
kingdom, the mind of Charles, easily led, and prone
to arbitrary counsels, though obstinate and
inaccessible
to aught of argument unsuited to his own
opinions, yielded complete obedience. Such was
the state of mattersthings gradually looking
brighter and more bright for the royal party, and
the remonstrant leaders, Hampden especially, not
only becoming less violent in their opposition, but
beginning to judge more favourably of the king's
motives and intentwhen the insane and childish
protest of the bishops, instigated to it by the proud
and angry Williams, was sent forth, declaring all
laws, orders, votes, resolutions, and determinations
already passed, or such as shall hereafter pass,
during their absence from that most honourable
housecompulsory, as they affirmed itnull
and of none effect. The consequence was an
immediate and almost unanimous vote, both of the
lords and commons, for the committal of the
prelates
to the towerone solitary member only so far
opposing it, as to declare that he believed them
utterly
insane, and therefore recommended Bedlam,
rather than the tower, as a fit place for their
detention
.
Then came reports of plotsrumours of
aggressions
meditated on the lower housedoubts,
and despondencies, and wrath, and panics! It was
believed on all sides, that, without confident
assurance
of support, the bishops had not dared to rush
to such extremities. Petitions were poured in from
every quarter! One from the city, setting forth
that, since their loyal gratulations on his majesty's
return had been misconstrued as though they would
disown the doings of the parliament, they now
declared
their full resolve to live and die with them
for the good of the commonwealth. Addresses
multiplied, and were accompanied, even to the
palace
,
by such crowds, that, in a message to the
common
council, the king complained of the tumultuous
assemblages daily increasing, to the disturbance of
his palace of Whitehall. On the same day the
parliament petitioned him to grant to them a guard,
commanded by the Earl of Essexthat detailed
for their protection during his absence in the north
having been instantly disbanded on his late return
on account of a malignant party now daring
openly to threaten them with violence. To this
request, reasonable as after events proved it to have
been, the self-willed monarch returned a negative,
though offering that such a guard should wait on
themunder a leader of his own choice, utterly
subservient to his willas he would be
answerable
for to Almighty God! This proposition they
of course declined, perceiving, doubtless, that the
guard so ordered would be more like to militate
against their liberties, if not their persons, than to
defend them from external outrage. It was upon
the very day that followed this insidious offerfor
such it must be deemedthat, urged by his worst
counsellor, the false and faithless Henrietta, to that
most rash and headlong step which rendered his
affairs for ever irretrievable, and reconciliation with
his subjects hopelesselated still by his reception
in the city, and heedless of the daily proofs of
public
feeling and opinion, he went on to commit his
last and desperate aggression on the privilege of
parliamentan aggression! which, had they
tamely
borne, his throne would have been fixed for ever
on the firm basis of despotic rule, and England
would have lain a fettered captive at his tyrannous
footstool. It was on the next day, while the
protestation
that
he would be answerable to Almighty
God for the safe-guarding of their liberties and
persons
was
yet fresh on his lips, that he struck that
blow at the very existence of parliaments, which,
had it fallen as intended, must have destroyed them
root and branch. For, on the afternoon of that
eventful day, Herbert, the king's attorney-general,
entered the house of peers, then sitting, and,
drawing
out a paper in the king's own writing, read it
aloud; by which the Lord Kimbolton, present there
and thenand of the commons, Denzil Hollis, and
Sir Arthur Hazlerig, Pym, Strode, and Hampden,
stood each and all accused of treason, as
conspirators
against the king and constitution. The peers
sat actually panic-stricken and aghast at this
tremendous
stroke of folly and misgovernment,
hearing
in sullen silence the grave accusation, while
Kimbolton, springing to his feet, with eloquent and
strenuous indignation, professed his total
innocence
;
nor was there any lord so hardy to so
much as move for his committal on his majesty's
behalf, Meanwhile the commons' house was
entered
by the king's sergeant, demanding that the
speaker should deliver up the bodies of the
members
named above, to answer to a charge of
treason
bearing
no warrant or authority from
magistrate
or counsellor, but acting solely at the king's
behest, and without intervention of the law. News
came at the same instant that the private lodgings
of those members had been visited by royal
messengers
,
their trunks and studies sealed up, and
their papers violently seized. With bold and
masculine
resolve, well suited to the peril of the crisis,
did the house meet this haughty and high-handed
insolence! The sergeant, having gone through his
message, was desired to avoid the chamber; but
word was sent the monarch by a deputation,
assuring
him those members should be instantly
forthcoming
so soon as any
legal
charge should be
preferred
against themthe house declaring, by a
powerful
vote, those violent acts of seizure breaches
of privilege, audacious, and illegal!empowering
their members to resist; calling on all men to abet
and aid them in resisting such attempts upon their
liberties as freeborn Britons; and instantly
adjourning
for the night until the wonted hour on the
morrow.
It was at a late hour in the evening of this
fatal day that several ladies of the court, richly
and splendidly attired, might have been seen
collected
in a proud saloon, decked with the
master-pieces
of Vandyke and Rubens, with tapestries of
Gobelins and Arras hangings, with cabinets of buhl
and marquetry, buffets of antique golden plate and
yet more costly porcelain, and all those priceless
luxuries which mark a royal dwelling. Among
this glittering group, and seemingly its principal,
was onea lady of low, slender stature, and a
shape slightly awry, though, by skill of her
tire-woman
,
this defect was so disguised as to be scarce
perceptible. Her hands were delicate, and
gemmed
as
were her ears, her neck, the bosom of her
robe, and the rich volumes of her jet-black hair
with Indian brilliants. Her features were
agreeable
and sprightly, yet such as could not properly
be praised as regular or beautiful; a pair of bright
black eyes and a coquettish smile forming their
chief attraction. Her conversation, lively, and
perhaps
even brilliant, though flippant and unguarded,
was listened to by her attendant ladies, and by the
only cavalier admitted to the presencea man of
noble bearing, easy yet dignified, and withal in
person eminently handsomewith an attention so
profound that it denotedeven without the bended
knee and the averted backthe speaker to be one
of royal rank. Music and cards were in the
chamber
,
and a most lovely girl, of some seventeen or
eighteen years, was dancing to the amatory strains
of some concealed musician, in a style which would
be now esteemed far too voluptuous, if not
absolutely
meretricious, to be performed by the chaste
limbs of ladies, or looked upon by modest eyes.
Yet neither lansquenet, nor the soft melody, nor the
exciting graces of the beautiful dancer, appeared
sufficient to banish some uneasiness which lowered
over that fair company. The brow of Henrietta,
for she it was, was dark and gloomy, much against
its wont, and her ill-humour had been so far
contagious
as to affect her bright companions with all
the outward signs of discontent and sorrow. While
she was talking earnestly to the Lord Digby, now
since the flight of Jermyn, her adulterous
paramour
her
most beloved and trusty counsellor, a
short and hasty step was heard without,
accompanied
by a slight bustle, as if some more
distinguished
personage had suddenly and by surprise
come on the unexpectant chamberlains and pages,
sole inmates of the antechamber. The door of
polished oak flew open, and, bearing evident marks
of discomposure in his lip depressed and
overshadowed
brow, a gentleman of graceful presence
entered
the apartment. Of that time of life when the
rashness and the fire of youth are tempered by the
sedateness of increasing years, although the face
has lost no trait of its attraction, nor the limbs of
their alert and agile motion, Charles Stuartfor the
new-comer was no otherwas of a middle height,
but strong and well proportioned, excepting that
his legs were triflingly bowed outward, a
circumstance
which, while detracting somewhat from the
grace and symmetry of his appearance, was
favourable
more than otherwise to his accustomed
exercise
of horsemanshipto which, indeed, it might
have been in some sort owing. His visage, of a
just and oval form, was pleasing, although
dark-complexioned
;
his features regular and comely,
with a full dark eye; gentle, and somewhat dull in
its expression, unless its owner were aroused to
sudden
anger, when it could kindle up and flash as
brightly as the keenest; he wore mustaches,
somewhat
unusually large and curling upward, with a
small pointed beard of that precise and formal cut
which is so often met with in the portraits of
Vandyke
.
The most remarkable trait, however, of his
whole appearance, was that continual cloud of mild
and softened melancholy from which his dignified
and stately aspect rarely or never brightened; for,
even when he smiled, it was a faint and transient
flash, scarce clearing up the gloom of that
accustomed
sadness which brooded over his
countenance
although
his disposition was cheerful more
than otherwise, and, if not buoyant, certainly
neither
mournful nor despondentand which, as
fanciful
and superstitious men have oftentimes
imagined
,
is ominous of an untimely end. His dress,
of plain black velvet, slashed and lined with satin,
differed in nothingsave that upon the left side of
his cloak glittered the diamond star belonging to
the order of the garterfrom the garb of any
private
gentleman. He wore his hat above his sable
hair, long-curled and flowing, and in his hand he
carried a strong cane or ferule, with a crutch head
of gold, which he struck passionately upon the
carpet
as he entered.
The undutiful, disloyal varlets! he exclaimed,
in tones of strong excitement. The false,
rebellious
knaves!to deal thus with their sovereign!
and for several moments he paced to and fro the
room, regardless of the eager entreaties of his
affrighted
wife to speak the cause of his
distemperature
.
A message! he burst forth at length, but in
a voice broken and faltering with passion. To
me! to me a message! I tell you, Marie, an' they
have their will, I may indeed be
called
your
majesty
be
served upon the kneebe waited on
bareheaded
but
I shall be no more a kingnay, ten
times less the master even of myself, than the most
lowly gentleman in all my wide dominions. But
so shall it not be!No! By Godnever! and
in a few disjointed sentences he told her how he
had demanded of the parliament the bodies of six
members, on a charge of treason against himself
and themand had received, not prompt
obedience
to his orders, but a message!
And is it possible, she cried, artful and evil
woman that she was, in feigned astonishment and
indignationand is it possible, my lord, that you
you, heir to such a line of mighty sovereigns
you, monarch of Great Britainwill be thus braved
and thwartedwill be controlled, defied, and
trampled
on by such a scum of low and scurvy
fellows
as this parliament? That you will brook to
have your crown robbed of its brightest jewels of
prerogativeyour sceptre wrested from your hands
without one struggle? Wouldwretched princess
that I amoh, would to God that I had tarried in
my own glorious France, or that I had been wedded
to a MAN!
Madam, go to! the king retorted sharply
for, all uxorious as he was, and prone to hold her
slightest words as mandates to his will, his temper,
naturally hasty and unpliant, was aggravated now,
even beyond its wont, by the commingled influence
of anger and irresolution. Be silentand dare
not impugn our energy and courage. England and
you shall know, and that right speedily, that
neither
will Charles Stuart brook insolence at home,
nor usurpation of his rights abroad! And for these
rash and reckless roguesthey too shall learn
that I am yet a king!
Well said!well said, my gracious
sovereign
!
exclaimed Digby, with an exulting voice
and an elated eye. Better to crush at once this
spawn of venomous and vicious serpents in the dark
den wherein they have engendered, than one by
one to scotch them, when they shall have crawled
forth to pollute the blessed daylight, and swelled
from grovelling reptiles to the full growth of
rampant
dragons!
In this, cried Henriettain this most noble
wrath, again I recognise the worthiest, the most
high-souled of men! To-morrow shalt thou pull
these vile rogues by the ears from out their
infamous
cabal! Else never look me in the face
again!
Brave girl, replied the facile king, ruing
already
his late burst of angerBrave, brave
Marie
,
and beautiful as brave! and, throwing one arm
round her waist, he led her to a sofa at the farthest
end of the saloon, where, seating himself at her
side, he hung, with all the manifest and ardent
passion
of a boy-lover over the wily Delilah, who
prodigal in secret to another than himself of her
voluptuous charmshad yet the perfidy, and with
it too the power, to woo him, by a scanty and
reluctant
show of public fondness, to measures, her
only interest in which was to bring back a banished
lover to her guilty armshow ruinous soever they
might be, she recked not, to her too trusting
husband
.
Vol. I.N
CHAPTER IX.
A King?A Tyrant!
It is a King'sto hold his sceptre firm
By love, not terrorhis assured throne,
A people's confidencehis sword, the law
Tempered with mercyand to guard the right,
The sole condition that affears his crown!
A Tyrant'sby enforcement stern to reign,
And slavish fearno charter to admit
Beyond his present pleasurenor no rule
His absolute yea beside.
During
the first part of the night which followed
this aggression of the monarch, the city was all
tumult
and confusionmen running to and fro, in
crowds or singly, conversing eagerly with white
and panic-stricken visageswomen, increasing,
with their shrill and anxious voices, the wild din
and children, long hours past the wonted time
when they should have been sleeping peacefully in
their warm chambers, wandering to and fro, with
looks of frightened and inquiring wonderment cast
upward toward the agitated features of their
parents
;
but the necessity of rest will conquer even
the quickest and most moving causes of
excitement
;
and ere the stars began to pale in the cold,
frosty sky, the thoroughfares of the metropolis
were quiet and deserted as though no turbulence
of party strife had ever interrupted their security
and silence. The morning broke in its due season,
and the only thing observable in the demeanour of
the groups who gradually filled the streets, passing
this way or that, as men engaged in their
accustomed
avocationsin their pursuits of profit or of
pleasurewas an air of general and pervading
sternnessnot merely gloom, but resolute and
dark determination. There was no light or
trifling
conversation! no jests! no laughter!
Whatever
of discourse seemed absolutely needful was
couched in brief and pithy sentences, and uttered
in a tone not puritanic nor morose, but sad, and at
the same time full of energy, grave, and severe,
and wellnigh awful in its character. Then, as the
day advanced, the members of the lower house
might be seen hurrying toward St. Stephen's
some mounted, some on foot, but all accompanied
by at least one retainer; and these were
greeted
severally by the multitude with shouts of
approbation
,
or with groans of censure and reviling,
accordingly
as they were known for men of popular
or loyal principles. Meanwhile, in a small
chamber
of the palace at Whitehall, richly adorned with
painted walls and splendid oaken carvings, and
overlooking, from its lofty casements, the street
through which the crowds were flowing toward the
parliament, sat Henrietta, with a single lady, and
a page awaiting, near the door of the apartment,
the pleasure of his royal mistress. A frame filled
with embroidery stood before her, at which it
seemed
she had but recently been occupied; though now
she held a volume of some French romance, from
which, however, her eyes glanced so often toward
the windows, attracted by the mingled clamours of
applause and hatred, rising at times even until they
penetrated her reluctant ears, as to denote that
little
of her mind was given to the wild, witty author
who apparently engaged her. Her eyes were full
of bright and keen excitement; a hectic flush
glowed
in a spot of vivid crimson high up on either
cheek, and her hands trembled with a visible and
nervous agitation. Her conversation, also, if the
light and frivolous sentences that fell from her lips
at intervals merited such a title, was broken,
interrupted
,
and evidently embarrassed by some
internal
conflict which she hesitated to disclose. For
a considerable time she struggled to maintain a
semblance of composure; but, as the hours passed
onward, her trepidation became more and more
apparent
.
At every step that sounded in the long
corridors
,
at every closing of a distant door, she
started
;
and once or twice, when the rattle of a
carriage
or the clatter of a horse's hoofs appeared to
cease before the gates, she actually hurried to the
balcony and gazed abroad into the town, exposing
herself, as if unwittingly, to the rude stare of the
transient multitudes, who failed to greet her with
the smallest tokens of affection or respect. Twice
or thrice, ere the bells chimed ten, the page in
waiting was despatched to learn whether no tidings
had arrived from parliamentand each time he
returned
the bearer of a negative, a peevish
exclamation
of disgust escaped her, not unnoticed by the
lady who attended on her privacy. At length, peal
after peal, the steeples rang forth ten, and then,
with an exulting smile, as though she could
contain
herself no longerRejoice! she cried, in
high, triumphant tonesRejoice, my Carlisle
for ere now the king is master in his statesay!
and his enemies are all in custody!
His enemies, your grace? exclaimed the
patriotic
lady, to whom, with indiscretion equalled
only by that of the rash, doting husband whom she
thus betrayed, she had divulged her secretHis
enemies?
His enemies, said I? returned the queen, in
accents sharper than before. In truth, then, I
spake wrongly! His traitors, rather! His false,
rebellious, and blood-thirsty traitorsby God's
help, now his captivesHampden, and Pym, and
all their rabble rout! And, as she spoke
sweeping
across the room with such a port as would have
well beseemed a Britomart striding upon the
prostrate
necks of Romans, in their turn subdued and
humbledand entering again the balcony, she cast
a wistful glance down the long avenue. But
scarcely had she turned her back before the high
born lady whom she had addressed hastily tore a
leaf from out her tablets, traced on it some half
dozen words, and pleading, on the queen's return,
some casual indisposition, quietly left the chamber.
Ten minutes had not well elapsed ere she
re-entered
itnor would the change in her demeanour
have escaped the close and subtle watchfulness of
her imperial mistress, had not that royal lady been
herself perturbed too deeply to investigate the
mood of others. The Countess of Carlisle's
features
,
cast in the purest and the calmest mould of
conscious aristocracy, had worn throughout the
morning an expression of grave feminine anxiety,
and her broad, placid eye had followed, with a
quiet yet observing scrutiny, every unwonted
movement, every nervous start, and every change
of colour that had resulted from the queen's
excitement
;
nor had she tardily discovered that some
dread crisis was at handthough what that crisis
was, not having been a party to the councils of the
regal circle on the previous night, she might not
even guess. The thoughtless words, however, of
the fickle-minded Henrietta had given her at once
the clew, which her quick apprehension followed,
as it were, intuitively through all its labyrinth;
and she at once availed herself of the discovery she
had made with a degree of cool and present
courage
,
that, even in that age of prompt and daring
action, failed not to wake the admiration which it
merited. Now, however, when the hardening
excitement
N 2
had passed overwhen the nerves, which
had been strung so tensely to the performance of
her duty, were no longer kept in playwhen she
knew that her trusty messenger was on his way,
and past the palace gates already, bearing the
tidings of approaching insultoutrageand peril
to the liberties of England's parliament, the
majesty
of England's laws, she for the first time
trembled
,
not for herself, but for her country! She for
the first time began to fear that she might be too
late, and that the blow might have already fallen,
ere her warning should arouse the destined victims
to perception of their danger. Her face was paler
than its wont, and her blue eye, so tranquil in its
usual expression, was slightly anxious. Yet it was
but a little while that her uncertainty continued
for, ere an hour had elapsed, the queen, whose
passions
became more and more enkindled with every
moment of suspense, sending another messenger
to learn whether the houses were in session still,
received for answer that they had just adjourned
until one of the clock, and that the members even
now were passing to their lodgings.
Heavens! cried Henrietta, almost in despair
at this unpleasing and most unexpected news
Just Heavens! can it be that he hath failed me!
and casting herself down at length upon a couch,
covered her head with a thick veil, and waited, in
an agonized and speechless fit of mingled hope and
terror, the result of her intriguing machinations.
In the meantime the house, which had
assembled
at the usual hour, not altogether unexpectant
of some farther outrage on their privileges, had
indeed
,
on receiving the well-timed announcement
from the Countess of Carlisle, upon the instant
voted an adjournment; that they might better so
concert plans of resistance to that lawless violence
which they were now too well assured their
sovereign
had resolved to perpetrate. It was at this
moment, when all were hastening homeward, that
Ardenne observed Cromwell hurrying to and fro
among the leading favourers both of the popular
and puritanic principles, and whispering to one a
word or two, then passing to anotherand, as he
gazed upon his compressed lip, and eye flashing
with almost savage pleasure, he felt, even more
strongly than at any prior moment, the conviction
that this wily person was indeed engaged more
intimately
in directing the important springs of party
action, than could have been supposed from the
inferior
part which he was wont to play in its
ostensible
and open movements. He knew not at the
time, any more than four fifths of the house, what
were the secret news which had so suddenly
produced
adjournment; and had, indeed, himself voted
against a measure which he could not comprehend,
although the private hints of Oliver and Hampden
had not escaped his notice; nor could he now
conceive
the meaning of the strong excitement which
kindled all who listened to the words of Cromwell,
as it were, with an electric spark. Not long,
however
,
was he destined to remain in ignorance; for,
with his harsh features even more than commonly
inflamed and ruddy, the puritan approached him.
Ha! he said, in a loud, sharp whisperHa!
Master Ardenne; how is this, that you, to whom we
confidently looked for succour, should, in this strait
and peril, have turned against us, consorting with
the men of Belial?
I know not, Master Cromwell, Ardenne
replied
I
know not, in good truth, to what you do
allude; nor have I heard of any strait or peril. I
saw, indeed, that you and Master Hampden were
desirous I should vote for this adjournment; but
seeing no cause wherefore, nor being, so far as I
knew it, your follower or pledged supporter,
assuredly
I deemed it best for mine own honour to
abide by the poor dictates of mine own opinion.
Call it you then no strait, asked Oliver, with
a dark sneer upon his lipno strait nor peril, that
Charles Stuart should dare come hither with his
accursed cavalierswith his lewd yeomen and
rakehelly pensionersseeking out whom they may
devourhaving their swords new-whetted, and
their hearts a-fire, to shed the blood of the saints
should dare come hitherhither, within these
privileged
,
time-honoured wallsto lay his violent,
tyrannical
hands on those with whose salt only we
are savoured?
What mean you, sir?speak out! cried
Ardenne
.
Will he indeed do this? Can he be so
infatuatedso insane?
Will
Charles Stuart dare it? said the other;
say rather what he will
not
dare, if we, the
watchers
and the guardians sitting on the tower, yea! on
the house-top, to give note of coming wo, blow not
the trumpet through the land. Yea! will he come,
and that right shortlyyea! will he come, and if
our hearts be not the strongerand our arms too,
if need there bewill trample down the liberties
of England unto everlasting!
Never! no, never! exclaimed Edgar,
vehemently
movedNo, never shall he do so! never
while Iif none besidehave sword to wield, and
hand with which to wield it.
Ay! is it so? returned the other, his whole
face blazing out with a triumphant ecstasyAy!
is it so? and would you draw the carnal sword if
it were needed?
Would I? cried Ardennewould I unsheath
the sword to guard these holy walls from
desecration
?
Would I uplift my arm against the hireling
ministers of lawless and despotic violence?ay,
were those ministers ten thousand sworded
spirits
!
Then fare thee well, cried Oliverthen
fare thee well, and hold fast to thy good resolve,
while I go wake the rest to a like sense; above all,
be thou in thy place when we again assemble, and
then call thou me fool and liar, an' thou see not
great things!
The interval passed speedily away, consumed
in wise and seemly preparation. Notice was
despatched
to the lord mayor and corporation of the
threatened danger; the citizens were all
admonished
to stand upon their guard; and members
were sent down to the Temple and the Inns of
Court to warn the students that the house was well
aware how they had been already tampered with;
and to command they should not come, on any plea,
to Westminster; and, ere the time appointed, the
house was crowded. Edgar was in his place
among the first; and as he saw the five obnoxious
members calmly resume their seats, as though no
peril threatened them, a mingled sentiment of
admiration
and regret thrilled to his heart at the idea,
that, if indeed the king, with his wild, dissolute
attendants
,
should forcibly attempt to seize them,
they surely would resist, and but too probably be
slaughtered on the very spot which they had made
to ring so often with their proud, patriotic
eloquence
.
As he thus thought, a new impression
shot with the speed of light into his mindIf
they be absentif they be absent when he come
the fearful consequences may be perchance
averted
,
which otherwise must, beyond doubt, result
from letting loose a band of reckless soldiery to
rush in, sword in hand, on gentlemen armed
likewise
,
and almost unanimous to guard their
liberties
with life. And on the instant he arose, and
in a few words, powerful and manly, moved that
the house should grant permission to those
members
to withdraw themselves, lest tumult, and
perhaps
even worse than tumult, fall of it. I second
it, cried Cromwell, starting to his feetI second
the most honourable member's motion. Let them
withdraw them straightway to the city until this
tyranny be overpast. Without a single voice or
vote dissentient, the question then was carried;
and the house gave permission that they might
retire
;
and, at solicitation from their friends, they
instantly
departed. Scarce had the hurry and
confusion
consequent on their withdrawal ceased, ere
a dull, trampling noise was heard without, as of a
powerful band of men; a word to halt was given,
and for a while the sound was hushed, the
members
sitting stern and silent in their places,
disdaining
to show any sign either of wrath or terror.
Again the sounds were heard ascending the great
staircase; and now the clink of steel, as the broad
blades of partisan or halberd clashed togetherand
now a shout, Fall on! Fall on! mixed with the
shuffling tramp of feet, the jingling of scabbards,
and all the bustle that accompanies a sudden and
disordered march. Nearer and nearer came the
tumultthe lobby was already filled, to judge from
the increasing clatter, with armed intruders; and
now the din of grounded arms rang audibly upon
the ears of the undaunted counsellors. Then for
the first time was a show of passion manifested
among the younger gentlemena dozen, at the
least, impetuously started to their feet, and not a
few grasped, with an energy that proved how
fearlessly
they would have used them, the hilts of the
long rapiers which all of gentle birth at that time
carried. A single word, however, from the speaker
of the housea single cry of order, sufficed to bring
them peacefully into their places. But there they
sat, with eyes that actually lightened with strong
indignation, and with that fiery aspect of the
gladiator
,
which marked how rapturously they would
have plunged into the fiercest conflict. At this
instant
was the door thrown open, and a messenger
sent in, who reverentially enough informed the
house that the king was at the door, and that the
speaker was commanded to sit still, with the mace
lying on the board before him. Still not one word
was spokennot a whispernot a breath, nor
murmur, through that spacious hall!and every
man sat fast, with head unmoved, and eyes fixed
sternly straight before him; as if they did not so
much as vouchsafe to cast a glance, still less a
thought, toward the violator of their rights. Had
there been aught of riot or confusionhad there
been aught of armed and passionate resistance
nay, had there been any fear, or doubt, or
wavering
,
it then had been an easier task for the
misguided
king to carry out his frantic and destructive
purpose. But hard it is, and most revolting to all
human feelings, to outrage and assault where there
is neither terror nor resistance. It was perhaps a
minute after the messenger retired, before aught
new disturbed the silence that prevailed unbroken
beneath the vaulted roofa minute, fraught with
the thronged sensations of unnumbered yearsa
minute, that seemed longer than a life to every
patriot
seated there, as gravely steadfast as those
senators
of early Rome, who waited in their robes of
dignity, and on their curule chairs, the moment
when the Gallic horde should pour out on their
white, unshrinking heads the cups of massacre
and vengeance. Then came a quick, irregular
tread, that readily betokened, by its uncertain time,
the irresolution and anxiety that were at work
within the breast of him who was approaching.
Enter not, any of ye, on your lives! was uttered
in the harsh voice of the king, before his person
came in viewan order understood by all who
heard, as it was doubtless meant by him who
uttered
it, to be words, empty words, and spoken for
effect! Then, leaning on the shoulder of the
palsgrave
,
Charles Stuart advanced! Those who stood
nearest to his person might have seen a momentary
pausea brief, involuntary hesitationa reluctance,
hardly, perhaps, acknowledged to himself, to cross
what was to be the Rubicon of all his future
fortunes
;
but so short was the pause, so small the
effort it required to conquer that reluctance, that it
would seem indeed as ifaccording to the classic
proverbdestined already to destruction, he were
deserted by his sanity of intellect. Perhaps he had
expected fearabject and tame submission!had
supposed that he should stride in triumph,
unopposed
,
and sued to on the bended knee, through
that magnificent assemblage! Perhaps he had
expected anger, indignation, and defiance! But
now, as he looked up those lines of crowded
benches, and met no glance of recognition
encountered
no full front either of wrath or scorn
but caught alone, row behind row, those stern and
masculine profiles, composed, severe, and
passionless
profiles,
averted less in resentment than in
proud, contemptuous sorrowhis wayward spirit
for a moment's space recoiled, and he half wished
the perilous step untaken. It was but for the
twinkling of an eye, however, that his rash mood
of obstinacy failed him; for, without a quiver of
his nerves, a change of his dark features, he strode
across the threshold, about a pace before his
foreign
kinsman. The Earl of Roxborough, a tall
and powerful man, armed, somewhat more than
commonly, with a long military sword and heavy
poniard at his belt, had followed close upon his
master's footsteps, until he also stood upon the
threshold; he crossed it not, however, but stood
there, leaning with his whole weight against the
door, which opened outwardly, so that it would
have been impossible for any from within the house
to close ithis right hand resting, as if carelessly,
upon the pommel of his war-sword, and his left
twirling, with a gesture of unbridled insolence, his
long mustacheswhile many a fierce, licentious
countenance might be seen glaring from behind
him on the conservators of their country's freedom
with a wild and wolfish aspect of malignant hatred.
The king himself, attired as usual in a plain garb
of sable velvet, wearing no weapon but an ordinary
walking-sword, and carrying in his right hand,
together
with his staff, the dark-plumed beaver which
he had doffed on entering, stalked coolly up the
housethe palsgrave following slowly, and, as it
seemed, with a half timid and reluctant step. Still
all was silence!silence so profound, that, save the
heavy footsteps of the monarch, not a sound could
be perceivedunless it were when from without
some weapon-clang was heard, or some rude threat
or grisly imprecation was muttered in the
antechamber
by the desperate attendants of a Lunsford
or a Digby. The face of Charles, grave and even
sorrowful by nature, was something paler than its
wont; but with that sort of paleness which conveys
no thought of cowardice or trembling, but of
resolve
immoveable and icy. His mouth was firmly
closed, but not compressed, nor showing aught of
effort! His eye, calm, searching, coldbut keen
and hard as iron! His nostril only of his features
Vol. I.O
gave token of emotion, or of any feeling hotter than
determination; for it was dilated, wide, and slightly
quivering! Yet was his hand steady as the
columns
which upheld the roof above him, and his
stride, now that he stood among his lieges
however
it had been irregular and hasty ere he entered
was measured, long, and equal.
As he advanced along the floor, he turned his
head from side to side, perusing, with deliberate
and steady glance, the lineaments of every
member
whom he passed; and if when at a distance not
one eye had sought him, so when he now stood
close beside them not one eye avoided him. Each,
as Charles came into his line of direct vision, met
his hard gaze with an unblenching and unloving
brow; for not one maneven of those the most
devoted
to his will, of those who
would
have served
him at that moment, who afterward
did
serve him
with their whole hearts and livesbut was
disgusted
,
angered, full of deep sorrow, almost of
despair
.
Little there was, however, of the stronger
and more stormy passions painted upon the brows
of those who sat thus fearlessly, braving the
temper
of a king whose wrath was no less lasting and
vindictive than it was hot and sudden. The
expression
that prevailed most largely was of
mingled
aspect, half pity, half defiance. But when
the tyrantfor that action, if that only, justified
the titleapproached the seat of Cromwell
perhaps
at that day scarcely known by name to the
proud sovereignand his glance fell upon those
grim, ungainly featuresthen Ardenne witnessed
for his eye was still attracted, why he knew not,
with a strange sense of fascination toward the
puritan
then
Ardenne witnessed that which in after
times he often called to mind, and never without
awe and wondera dark conflictfor such it
might indeed be termeda conflict of eye,
countenance
,
and bearing, between those men so
eminently
thrown together, and blended in their spheres
of good or evil action. The glance of Charles,
when first it fell upon the coarse and most
unpleasing
lineaments of Oliver, was instantly
averted
;
but averted merely as men ever turn the eye
away from objects naturally hateful or unseemly.
At that point of time the face of Cromwell was as
tranquil, as immoveable, as that of his great future
rival; but the tranquillity was no less different, than
is the stillness of a hushed volcano and the
peaceful
calm of heaven. The swollen and corded veins
upon the templethe eyebrows lowered and
contorted
the
balls gleaming beneath them with a
fixed and baleful lightthe nostril rigidly
distended
,
and the lips pressed so tightly that they alone
of his whole aspect were of a livid whiteness!
Ere Edgar had the time to think, had there been
any matter yet for thought, the eye of Charles
stole back, half timidly as it appeared, toward that
tiger-like and glaring face. Then, as it met the
sinister and ominous stare of fierce defiance, it
brightened alsovivid, and keen, and with a
falcon-like
and noble splendour. For some short
space they gazedthose two undisciplined and
haughty spiritsinto each other's very souls
mutually, as it seemed, conscious at a glance of
irremediable and desperate hostility. The king's
look, quiet, although high and angry, and most
unutterably
proud!Cromwell's, sarcastic, bitter,
furious
,
and determinedand withal so savagely
triumphant
,
so mirthful in its dire malignity, that
Ardenne thought he never had beheld a
countenance
so fiendishly expressive! And Charles
Stuart's aspectafter a fixed encounter of ten
seconds' spaceCharles Stuart's haughty aspect
quailed beneath it; and, as he passed alongfor
the whole occurred in less time than were needful
to recite ithe gazed no more around him, but
went directly onward, lookingand that, too,
gloomilyupon the ground, toward the speaker's
chair. But the stern democrat, as conscious that
his genius had prevailed, cast his eyes round him
with an air of loftier and more sublimated feeling
than Edgar had as yet observed him wear. It was
a trifle at the period when it passed, and none but
he have noticed or recorded it; but after times and
after deeds stamped it, no more to be erased, upon
the tablets of his inmost soul. Meanwhile the
king had reached the chair; and Lenthall, the bold
speaker, who had hitherto sat still, as proud and
far more placid than his visiter, arose, and stepped
out stately and cold to meet him. Then the king
mounted to his place, and stood upon the step, but
spake not, nor sat down; and there he stood,
gloomily gazing on the house, with a dark look
of sullen anger, for many minutesand after he
had looked a great whileGentlemen, he said,
in a high voice, clearly audible, though neither
musical
nor pleasing, to the most distant corner
Gentlemen of the Commons, I am sorry for this
my cause of coming to you. Yesterday I did send
a sergeant to demand some, who, by my order,
were accused of treason. Instead of prompt
obedience
,
I receiveda message! and he uttered
the last word with the most concentrated scorn
and insolenceI must, then, here declare to you,
that though no king that ever was in England could
be more careful of your privileges than I have been
and shall beyet, I can tell you, treason hath
no privilege!and therefore am I come to tell you
that I
must
have these men, and
will
, wherever I
may find them! And, as he spoke, he looked
around the hall with a deliberate air, scanning the
faces of all present, if he might find his men; then,
raising his voice higher yet, he called aloud, till the
roof rang againHo! I say, Master Hollis!
Master Pym! No answer was returned, nor any
sound; save an increased and angry tumult in the
lobby, with a brandishing of partisans and a
producing
of concealed but ready pistols, so that some
members thought to see the soldiers instantly rush
into the chamber. After a little pause, finding he
got no answer, he turned to the speakerSay,
he exclaimedsay, Mr. Speaker, be any of these
men here present? For a moment Lenthall
paused, as doubting whether to hurl his own
defiance
and that of the assembled commons into his
very teeth; but, ere the echoes of the monarch's
voice had ceased, he had resolved upon the wiser
and more prudent part, and bending, with most
deferential courtesy, his kneeI have, sir, he
replied, nor eyes to see, nor tongue to speak in
this place, save as this house, whose servant I am
sworn, shall order me. And therefore must I pray
your majesty to pardon me that I return no farther
answer!
Ha! sir, returned Charles, sharply, and with
incipient furybut a moment's thought convinced
him that the humble answer of the speaker defied
at once and rendered hopeless any charge or
violence
against him. Ha! sir, again he said, but
in a milder toneI do believe my eyes are to the
full as good as yours, and I do see my birds are
flown; but this I tell you, and so look ye to itI
hold this house to send them to me! Failing of
which, I shall myself go seek them! For, sirs,
their treason is most foul, and such as you shall
thank me, all of you, now to discover. And I
assure
youon a king's word I assure youI never
O 2
did mean any violence, and they shall have fair trial
I meant not any other! He waited not for
farther words; perchance he doubted what reply
he might receive to this last
false
asseveration
palpably, unquestionably falsefor wherefore
brought he his disbanded soldiery, his rude and
ruffian bravoes, with rapier, partisan, and pistol,
into the very precincts of the house? Wherefore,
unless he had designed to hale the accused
members
violently forth by the strong arm of tyrannous
authority?
Stepping down from the chair, he walked,
uncovered
still, but at a quicker pace than that with
which he entered, toward the lobby; but now, as
he departed, his looks were not turned haughtily
from side to side, but sadly bent upon the floor;
nor was his passage silent as beforefor member
after member started up as Charles went past him,
with bent brow and clinched hand; and groans
both loud and deep saluted him. As he came nigh
the seat of Cromwell, the king raised his visage,
haggard now and pale, as with an anxious curiosity
to look upon the man before whose eye he felt
himself
to have recoiledand, as he met it, Oliver
sprang upon his feet, his long tuck rattling in the
scabbard as he rose, and, stamping on the floor
with fury, shouted aloud, in tones not mild nor
measured, the word Privilege! A dozen voices
took it up, though not so loudly nor with so marked
defiance as the first daring speaker, and the whole
house was in the wildest and most uncontrolled
confusion. Delightedly would the despotic prince,
had he but dared it, at that moment have cried ON!
have given the
word
, expected by his
myrmidons
,
for massacre and havochave bid the swords,
which were already thirsting in their scabbards,
leap forth and drink their fill of that most noble
blood of England. But, thanks to Heaven, he
dared not! There would have been no object
worthy of the riskno gain to justify the
detestation
he would have so heaped upon his head! He
did not
dare;
and therefore, smothering for the
time his virulent and vengeful fury, he departed
the door rang heavily behind him; and with no
muttered curses on the head of him who lacked
the spirit to perform what he and they yearned
equally to execute, frustrate of their desired
vengeance
,
unsatisfied and balked, his hireling
desperadoes
filed out from the venerable walls their
presence
had so shamefully polluted.
CHAPTER X.
He hath gone forth!
Not with the gorgeous majesty sublime
Of marshalled hostsnot with the brazen din
Of trumps sonorousbut heart-sick and sad,
Despairing and dishonoured! He hath gone
Gonethat his place shall never know him more
Cursed of his peopleoutcast from his throne
A dim, discrowned king!
The
night fell dark as Hades, and tempestuous
withal. The winds wailed mournfully at intervals,
at intervals shrieked out with savage fury; and as
the giant clouds were driven reelingly across the
firmament, blotting the faint light of the winking
stars, fierce bursts of hail and rain came dashing to
the earth, and ceased as suddenly as they
commenced
.
And ever and anon the thunder growled
remotely, but with a sullen rolling that seemed
almost
continuous, such was the length and
frequency
of the strong pealsand lightnings flashed on
every side the heaven, now in broad, quivering
sheets of ghastly light, that transiently displayed
the ragged edges of each fleeting storm-cloud in
distinct relief, and now in wavy lines of most
intense
and life-like fire, rushing athwart the rack
from zenith to horizon. Yet, turbulent as was the
night aloft the city, and ominous as showed the
gathering of the elements, still more alarming was
the turbulence that reigned in the full streets, and
more portentous was the concourse of the armed
and angry citizens. The train-bands had been
mustered in the early evening, with arquebuse and
pike, their lighted matches gleaming on all sides
through the murky darkness, and the heavy
trampling
of their companies everywhere audible, as
they marched to and fro, vainly desirous to allay
the tumult which had arisen instantly on the
arrival
of the accused members, seeking protection in
the guarded precincts of the city. From sunset
until dawn the mayor patrolled the streets with
his assistant magistrates, vainly endeavouring to
quell the terrified and savage populace, with whom
each court and alley, from the purlieus of Alsatia
quite to the Tower, was blockaded and besetall
armed as chance had ordered it, some with the
perfect implements of modern warfare, others with
weapons obsolete and strange, brown-bills, and
glaives, and maces. Chains were made fast
athwart the most frequented avenues; and
barricades
of stone and timber, heaped rudely but
effectively
together, above which yawned the mouth
of many a ponderous cannon, would have
presented
no small obstacles to any who should dare
invade
the sacred limits of the city. Huge bonfires
blazed in every quarter, torches and flambeaux
streamed and wavered in each gust of wind,
casting
a singular and ruddy glare upon the pallid faces
and unusual weapons of the unwashed artisans who
formed the bulk of the assemblage; though they
were mingled here and there with grave and
well-attired
burghers, their morions and gorgets wildly
at variance with their civic garbs and golden chains
with young and ruffling templars, to whom aught
savouring of frolic or of fight was most congenial
and with sad-visaged and morose soldadoes, in
suits of buff, tarnished and soiled by service, girded
with broad-swords of unwieldy length, fresh from
the German wars or the Low Countries, then, as in
every after age, the battle-field of Europeall
keeping up, throughout the livelong night, a
dissonance
of tongues as loud and jarring as ever rent
the air around the heaven-defying Babel. At times
a sudden panic would run through the crowd, none
knowing whom to trust or whom to fleea cry
would ring above the mingled dinThe
cavaliers
!
The cavaliers! Fly! Fly! The king and his
wild cavaliers are up to fire the city! and,
without
waiting to inquire or to hear, the mob would
rush they knew not whither, trampling the aged
and the feeble under foot, and turning oftentimes
the very weapons they had belted on to guard their
liberties against each other in the blind and reeling
rout. And now, with words of fire and gestures
of defiance, some bolder spirit would brave the
panic-stricken throng, and rally it and lead it back,
with brandished arms and inflamed features, to
meet the foemen who existed only in their
imaginations
,
maddened with terror and excitement.
Nor was the panic and confusion slighter within
the royal palace. Between the hapless king and
his perfidious consort, distrustrecrimination
wrathfollowed by feigned repentance on the one
handuxorious pardon on the other! Among the
counsellors, dismay and doubthigh words, and
mutual reproaches, and all the vehement disorder
that ensues on the adoption and discomfiture of evil
counsels! Digby and Lunsford wearying Charles,
faint-hearted now and dubious, for permission to
assail the city gates, and drag the impeached
traitors
forth from their stronghold at point of partisan
and pike!Others deploring the rash steps already
taken, and protesting against farther violence!
and some, the nobler and more upright spirits
Falkland, and Hyde, and their associatesholding
themselves aloof in deep, resentful sorrow, that all
their wisdom had been wasted, and themselves
distrusted
and deceived. Never a longer night was
followed by a sadder morning; for, although
daylight
calmed the terror and the tumult, it allayed
nothing of the concentrated wrath, diminished
nothing
of the jealous apprehensions entertained by
either party. After a short debate, the parliament,
both lords and commons, adjourned for several
days, appointing a committee to sit constantly,
mornings and afternoons, at Merchants' Hall,
within
the city walls, where they might be secure from
farther outrage, and free to devise means for
vindication
of their members, and safeguard of their
violated
rights. Edgar, informed of the commotions,
and anxious for the safety of the city, called for his
horse the moment after the adjournment, and, with
some six or seven followers, well mounted and
equipped, rode up the Stranda scattered street
at that day, occupied by the suburban dwellings of
the rich and noble, with terraced gardens sloping
downward to the Thamesfull of calm resolution,
and intending instantly to volunteer his aid for
putting
down the riots, and establishing some
governance
of law. When he reached Temple-Bar the
gates were closed with bolt and chain, a powerful
band of musketeers, with gun and bandoleers,
manning
its loops, and mustering at every window that
overlooked the area before it. But, at
announcement
of his quality and name, the bolts were drawn,
the heavy leaves unfolded, and he entered amid
presented arms and muttered greetings of the
sentinels
.
With a pleased eye he saw at once that
order was restored; suspicion still prevailed, and
vigilance, but tumult and confusion had given way
to wise and watchful regulation. The shops were
shut, and business was suspended, it is true, and
all men who went forth wore weapons; but the
trained-bands patrolled the streets, with magistrates
at the head of every company, no less to enforce
internal quiet than to resist external force. Scarce
had he ridden twenty yards within the gate ere a
fresh summons roused the wardens, and a king's
messenger, after some parley, was admitted, and
conducted by a file of infantry to hearing of the
aldermen, then sitting at the Guildhall. The
business
on which Ardenne came directing him to the
same quarter, and strong anxiety to learn the future
movements of the court still farther prompting him,
he at once wheeled to the rear of this small band,
and, passing onward with them, was ushered in
without delay to the mayor's presence, and, in
consideration of his place in parliament,
accomodated
with a seat whence he might witness the
proceedings of the day, and lend his counsel, if
need were, to these the magnates of the city. To
his astonishment, as to that, indeed, of all, the
messenger
announced that his majesty was already
entering
his coach to wait upon the mayor, when he
had left Whitehall; and that he prayed that
dignitary
to call a common council on the instant. Sir
Richard Gourney, the then holder of that office,
although inclined not slightly to the principles of
the decided royalists, disclaiming, as did all the
wiser of the party, any participation in, or
knowledge
of, a course which, now that it had failed,
they all professed to disapprove, was careful to
display no symptom of subserviency; perhaps,
indeed
,
he truly felt that wrong had been committed,
and was sincere, as he was evidently faithful to his
trust, in the determination to maintain inviolate the
privileges of which he was the guardian. The
council was at the time in session, and scarcely
had the messenger withdrawn before the king
arrived
not
with the armed and dissolute attendants
who had convoyed him to the halls of parliament,
but with some two or three lords only, and those
of the most moderate among his partisans. The
shouts that ran like wildfire along the crowded
streets, mingled with groans and yellsthe cries,
Privilege! Privilege of parliament!announced
his presence at the doors of the Guildhall before
he had alighted from his coach, and clearly proved
the temper of the now thoroughly-aroused and
fearless
multitude; while, as a token of the perfect
mastery of the law even at that moment of
tremendous
and wellnigh unparalleled excitement, a
daring pamphlet-writer, who had thrown into the
monarch's coach a paper, bearing inscribed the
scriptural watchword, To your tents, O Israel,
was instantly committed for contempt. The city
dignitaries rose indeed from their seats on the
king's entrance; they tendered to him allall, to
the most minute particularsthat was his due of
reverence and ceremonial greeting; but there was
no heart-inspired applauseno loyal, spirit-stirring
cry, God save the king!no smileno welcome!
Strange it may seem, yet he had hoped indeed,
infatuated
man, that he should now succeed in
gaining
the authorities to yield their honoured guests
to his demand; and so commenced what he
esteemed
a mild, conciliatory harangue, requiring
their surrenderfull of false statements of his
veneration
and regard, in all past time, for England's
laws and libertiesof his affection for the
Protestant
religionof his enforcement of the penal
statutes
against the dreaded papistsand no less full
of promises, unmeaning, insincere, and empty,
concerning
his intentions for the future. Little
applause
and no obedience followed! Baffled a
second
time, and yet more deeply mortified, he left
the Guildhallbut, desirous still of pleasing, and
imagining, short-sighted and deluded prince, that,
by a slender show of condescension, he could efface
the recollection of so many arbitrary acts against
the corporate and individual interests of the city,
he vouchsafed to onethe worse affected toward
his personof the sheriffs the honour of dining at
his house;was served, together with his retinue,
with more than courtly luxurywith all respect
and honour, paid, not to himself, but to the station
which he so ill occupiedbut with no semblance
of that glad alacrity, that honest and ungrudging
heart-service, which is well worth a world of
bended
knees and hollow ceremonial;and in the
evening
harassed
in spirit and fatigued in body,
irritated
by the reproachful hootings of the multitude
that jarred, at every instant of his homeward
progress
,
on his reluctant ear, and hopeless now of
compassing
his tyrannical endsretired to his palace,
there to give impotent and childish vent to his
indignant
spleen, by publishing a proclamation against
all men who should presume to harbour or conceal
the persons whom he had previously denounced as
traitors. Days passed away; each marked by
some bold resolution of the commons  by
increased
tokens of the deep respect and admiration
entertained by the great bulk of the metropolis
toward
Vol. I.P
the vindicators of its rightsand by some
weak and useless aggravation of his former
measures
on the part of the misguided and
wife-governed
monarch. A week had scantly rolled above
their heads, before the house, conscious of its own
strength, and knowing the entire impotence of the
king's party, determined to bring back their
members
to Westminster, as being men against whom
no legitimate or constitutional charge was pending;
and preparation of unwonted splendour and extent
was made for reconducting them in triumph to
their seats. The news might not escape the ears
of Charles, bruited as it was all joyously abroad
through every class of persons, and pleasing as it
was to nearly allfor not a few, even of those who
heretofore had backed him with their voices and
opinions in all his troubles, and who in after days
as faithfully assisted him with life and fortune,
were not entirely sorry for the occurrence of a
marked reverse, which might, they fondly hoped,
avail to check him in his inordinate and reckless
cravingscravings which, to their own eyes, they
could not now disguise or palliatefor power,
unconstitutional
at least, if not tyrannical and
absolute
.
Bittermost bitterwere his feelings, as
he went, ungreeted by one loyal acclamationhis
absence unlamented by one loyal tearforth from
the palace of his fathersalmost alone in actual
fact, but absolutely so in sentimentthe queen, for
whose sake mainly he had embroiled himself with
his true-hearted subjects, ungratefully and
spitefully
upbraiding him, not for the folly of his
measures
,
but for his failure in their executionhis
courtiers, who had urged him on to every fresh
aggression, and lauded every new caprice, now
silent
and dejectedand the very guards who rode
before his coach dispirited and crest-fallen.
Bittermost bitterwere his feelings; but it
was not with the bitterness of manly and upright
repentancenot with the bitterness upspringing
from the sense of wrong committed, and resulting
in a promise of amendmentbut with the
bitterness
of discontent and disappointment, of unholy
wishes frustrated, and merited reverses sullenly
remembered. Such were the feelings of that bad
monarch and unhappy man as he drove forththat
so he might avoid the triumph of his disaffected
subjectsafter the shades of early evening had
already
gathered dark and cold about the misty
streets, toward Hampton Court, as virtually
exiled
from the metropolis of his oppressed and
groaning country, and from the jeoparded,
dishonoured
throne of his forefathers, as from the hearts
of his once loving subjects.
But the sun rose upon a nobler and more
glorious
spectaclea spectacle rife with great blessings
for the present, and brilliant omens for the future
the spectacle of a vast people, free and united!
victorious, not by the sword, nor over slain and
mutilated
carcassesbut by the strength of popular
opinion, founded on the broad base of justice
animated
by the deathless love of libertyand
directed
by such a knot of patriots as England in no
other age had witnessed! On came the fair
procession
,
marshalled by loud, triumphant music, and
the yet louder shouts of honest and exulting
myriads
;
gay with a thousand flags and banners
flaunting
to the wintry sun, which wore, on that proud
morning, his brightest and most gorgeous aspect;
guarded by all the sober strength of civil discipline,
and all the orderly and bright array of the
well-trained
militia of the city; not fluttering, indeed,
with tasselled scarfs or many-coloured plumes,
but well equipped with morions of steel, polished
till they shone out like silver, and stout buff-coats,
all service-like and uniformwith their puissant
pikes thick as a grove of pines, their broad heads
glinting back the sunbeams  and arquebuses
clearly burnished as when they left the armory.
Fifty in front they marched, in close and serried
order, striding along with regular and sturdy steps,
rank after rank, each as a single manwith that
erect, undaunted bearing which belongs only to the
free; and with the tranquil eye and calm though
proud expression which mark the disciplined,
law-loving
citizen, and not the fierce, unruly democrat.
The companies were all arrayed beneath the civic
banners of their respective wards, and headed by
their captains, mounted well on strong and
serviceable
chargers, and gallantly equipped in scarlet
cassocks and steel corslets. Behind this stately
host, preceded by the bearers of his mace and
sword, and all the glittering insignia of city pomp,
Sir Richard Gourney rode along, curbing a
splendid
courser, whose footcloth, blazoned with rich
armorial bearings, almost swept the ground, sorely,
as it would seem, against his will, to slow
procession
pace; then, two and two, in flowing robes of
scarlet, with chains of gold about their necks, and
tall white feathers floating above their velvet
bonnets
,
the sheriffs and the aldermen advanced!and
then, received by acclamations that were heard for
many a mile around, clad in their ordinary garbs,
and wearing in their grave demeanour no tokens
of undue importance or unfitting exultation, the
denounced
patriots rode steadily along; and, headed
by their speaker, the whole house of commons
followed
.
No banners waved above themno
gorgeous
dresses pointed them for public admiration
no high assumption called the eye to themyet,
as they swept slowly forward, a band of gentlemen
mostly of noble,
all
of reputable birthchosen
for worth and wisdom to be the delegates of a great
peopleof a people the most manly, and
intelligent
,
and free of the wide universethey could
not but have attracted the eye and fixed the
untaught
admiration of the most stolid or most
slavish
;
what then must they have done when they
were passing before those whose liberties they had
asserted at the risk of all that men hold dear?
Close trooping in the rear of these another strong
battalion of the train-bands marchedseveral
brigades
of field artillery, huge, cumbrous iron guns,
with tumbrils following and matches lighted,
rattled
and groaned over the rugged pavements, and
a long train of well-appointed horse of each
denomination
then in usethe heavy cuirassiers, with
helmets, breast and back pieces, poldrons and
taslets
of bright polished steel, bearing long
two-edged
broad-swords, and pistolets with barrels full
two feet in lengthmounted arquebusiers, with
short but ponderous matchlocks and formidable
rapiers
lancers,
with no defensive arms save morion
and gorget, and no weapons save their spears of
fifteen feet and light curved sabres, in imitation of
the Polish horse, already celebrated in the German
warsa splendid cavalcade, brought up the rear.
While thousands and tens of thousandsstrong
men and tottering children, matrons and
hoary-headed
sires, and maidens delicate and tender
the vast population of the city and its suburbs
poured out to meet their champions, hindering
their progress by their living masses, and
clinging
even to the horses they bestrode, with
fervent
prayers and blessings, and with tears of holy
joy, and waving kerchiefs, and exulting shouts, to
greet the people's friends; and with wild curses
on the king and on his cavaliers, concerning whom
P 2
they oft and sneeringly inquired, Where be they
now, and whither have they fled? Meanwhile
adown the Thames another pomp was floating,
toward
the stairs at Westminster, second, if second,
only to the landward showhundreds of lighters,
pinnaces, and long-boats, dressed up with
waist-cloths
and with streamers, laden with musketry
and ordnance, manned by a host of British
mariners
,
whose meteor flag even then had braved, a
thousand years, the battle and the breeze,
furrowed
the broad and placid river; while ever and
anon the salvos of their cannon, thundering above
the din and clamours of the mighty concourse,
announced
to the disheartened monarch, even in his
sad retreat at Hampton, the failure of his insolent
aggressions, and the triumphant testimony borne by
his indignant subjects to the untiring efforts and
undaunted resolution of those noble spirits, whom
his oppressive madness had converted, step by step,
from the most steady guardians to the most
constant
foemen of his person and his crown.
BOOK II.
They have drawn to the field
Two royal armies, full of fiery youth;
Of equal spirit to dare, and power to do:
So near intrenched, that 'tis beyond all hope
Of human counsel they can e'er be severed,
Until it be determined by the sword
Who hath the better cause; for the success
Concludes the victor innocent, and the vanquished
Most miserably guilty.
Massinger
The Duke of Milan
.
CHAPTER I.
Mal.
Let us seek out some desolate shade, and there
Weep our sad bosoms empty.
Macd.
Let us rather
Hold fast the mortal sword, and like good men
Bestride our downfallen birthdom.
Shakspeare
Macbeth
.
A YEAR had passed since Ardenne's landing on
his native shores, unfixed of purpose, and, above
all, an advocate for peace!a year in which events
had taken place that rendered hopeless all
accommodation
between the hostile parties, until one
should have been proved decidedly superior. The
very day on which the king had fled from London,
lest he should witness the return of the five
members
to the house, having been signalized by a most
wild and ill-digested movement of the fiery
Lunsford
,
sufficiently disclosed the intentions of the
royalists
in an attempt to seize a magazine of arms at
Kingston. Then came the treachery of Goring
the king's fruitless effort against Hullthe calling
out of the militiathe arming on both sidesand
all the small guerrilla skirmishes that were
occurring
daily for some months previous to the nominal
commencement of the war. The queen, who had
escaped to Holland, stealing and bearing with her
the crown jewels, which were pawned at once to
furnish arms, and men, and money, was setting
every spring in motion on the continent. Rupert
and Maurice had arrived in England, and the
former
was, on his first interview, appointed general
of the cavalry. The royal standard had been
raised, some two months past, at Nottingham, with
evil omens, and under auspices the most
unfavourable
a
mighty tempest having poured its fury on
the gathering of the troops, dispirited and few in
number, and unfurnished with the most evident
and indispensable equipments of an army
weapons
,
and clothes, and ammunition. The flag itself,
displaying, in addition to the wonted quarterings of
England, a small escutcheon, charged with the royal
bearings and the crown, and compassed by a scroll,
with the proud motto, Render his due to Cesar!
was scarcely elevated ere a heavier gust of wind,
accompanied with floods of rain and a fierce crash
of thunder, shivered the staff in twain, and dashed
the ensign violently to the ground; while such was
the increasing fury of the tempest that two whole
days elapsed before it could be reared again. Still,
although by this overt act the king had most
unquestionably
issued his appeal to the sword as to
the sole remaining arbiter, matters went on but
heartlessly and slowly. Each side, averse to
throw away the scabbard, paused in a grim and
terrible suspense, irreconcileably hostile to the
other, yet unwilling to incur the blame of being
first to strike, or foremost to refuse
accommodation
.
The royal forces, far too weak to court the
brunt of battle, aimlessly marched and
countermarched
,
levying contributions in this place, and
mustering volunteers in that; while the superior
party of the parliament, already strong enough to
have surprised and crushed the royalists at a single
blow, lay in their quarters, waiting, as it would
seem, till they should muster resolution to
commence
hostilities. The truth, which has been
strangely overlooked by all historians of these
turbulent
and most important times, was simply this
that, in the outset of that fearful strife, there was
but little difference between the views, and hopes,
and fears of the most eminent and upright men of
either party. How it should ever have been
fancied
,
much less gravely argued, that the great body
of the English gentry and nobility were anxious to
subvert the constitution, which had been freed from
the arbitrary power of the Norman princes by the
sole efforts of their order, and to erect an absolute
and unchecked despotism, which must have
necessarily
ruined their own caste, it is most difficult
indeed
to comprehend or to conjecture. Nor is it
less absurd to hold that the more liberal peers,
who, neither few in number nor deficient in
sagacity
,
were enlisted on the people's side, were in the
least degree prepared to overthrow that ancient
monarchy from which they all derived their
greatness
,
and to descend at once from their exalted
grade to mere equality with their less elevated
countrymen. In simple fact, the leading men of
either party dreaded defeat or victory with a nearly
equal apprehension; knowing that such an
overthrow
befalling either host, as should conclude the
other absolutely masters of the game, would be
most hopelessly destructive to the liberties of
England
.
It was then in this spirit that the counsellors
of Charles, scarcely more fearful of reverses which
should deliver them a prey to their stern foemen,
than of success which would inflame and aggravate
the monarch's native haughtiness, laboured, with all
their powers, to bring about some reconciliation;
but in vain, their every effort being frustrated by
the imbecile insincerity and double-dealing of their
principal! At length, when the last hopes were
quenched of peace unbought by victory, the fiery
Rupert, who, from the first, had been the open
advocate
of instant battle, acting with indefatigable
and almost sleepless energy, collected horses, men,
and cannon from the northern and the midland
counties
,
until the royal army amounted to the number
of ten thousandthree foot brigades under Sir
Jacob
Astley, and the Earl of Lindsey, an officer
experienced
in the wars of the Low Countriesthree
dragoon regiments, to act as horse or infantry as
need might be, under Sir Arthur AstonLord
Bernard Stuart commanding the king's guards, a
troupe dore
, composed entirely of gentlemen,
whose annual incomes are said to have exceeded
the united fortunes of all the members who, at the
outbreaking of the war, were voters in both houses
a good park of artillery, under the trusty Sir John
Heydonand the adventurous princehimself a
hostleading the cavalry, consisting of the very
flower of the youthful gentry, practised in arms,
and high in chivalrous and daring spirit. Then,
early in October, having resolved to strike a blow,
and anxious to give battle to his enemies, the king
marched hastily from Shrewsbury upon the capital.
Meantime the Earl of Essex, who had been
recently
appointed by the parliament their
general-in-chief
,
left the metropolis with an array some
fifteen
thousand strong, more thoroughly equipped
and better armed than were the gentlemen of the
opposing host, but far inferior to them in that
sustained
and burning spirit, which is of more avail
than tenfold numbers in the day of battle. The
earl's instructions were to tender to the king a joint
petition of the housesbeseeching him to leave the
gathering of malignants, whose ill counsels had so
far prevailed to alienate him from his loving
subjects
,
and to repair at once to the vicinity of his
Vol. I.Q
most loyal parliamentand, in the case that this
petition should prove of none effect, to rescue him,
by force of arms, from the foul traitors who
surrounded
and misled him. To this intent, he was
provided with all the requisites that constitute an
armya heavy train of well-arranged artillery,
with ammunition and supplies of all kinds in
profuse
abundancea powerful brigade of horse, under
the Earl of Bedford and Sir William Balfour; and
a picked body of the London train-bands, well
disciplined
and admirably well appointed! Among
the numerous nobles who accompanied the general
of the parliament, two, perhaps, merit an especial
noticethe young lords Rochford and Feilding
as being destined soon to meet, as foemen in the
shock of battle, their own fathers, the earls of
Dover
and of Denbigh, who were enrolled as
volunteers
in the king's guard of horse! Many there
were, indeed, in this array, who yielded not in spirit
or in valour to the proudest cabalier of Charles!
many who panted for the onset with all the
patriotic
zeal of freemen trampled and oppressedwith
all the bitter and fanatic rancour of religious
prejudice
and
these were more than matches for the
best of Rupert's soldiery!but more were
doubtful
,
and reluctant, and affected by the cold and
backward spirit of their leaders, who felt, perhaps,
a secret apprehension that, in battling for the liberty
and constitution of their land, they might in some
degree be warring with the interests of their order.
Such was the aspect of affairs, and such the
state of parties, when, on a brilliant morning
toward
the last days of October, a gallant regiment
of horse was winding through the deep green lanes
and devious woodlands of Northampton toward the
little town of Keinton, distant, perhaps, some
twenty
miles, at which it was beginning to be understood
that Essex had established his headquarters. An
animating spectacle they formed, and lively, as
they gleamed out and disappeared among the lofty
hedges and dense coppices, still glorious in the
leafy garniture of variegated autumn, their
polished
armour glinting back the cloudless sunshine in
long and dazzling flashes, their colours fluttering
in the cheerful breeze, their videttes warily
surveying
every thicket, the matches of their arquebuses
ready kindled, and their extended lines sweeping
along the irregular wood-roads in serpentine and
wavy orderpausing at every brook or dell where
they might possibly be set upon at disadvantage,
until their advanced guard should fall back with
tidings that their path was unobstructedand
varying
their array from open file to solid column, as
the nature of the ground might dictate. The leader
of this splendid body was a fine-looking figure, in
the prime of life, well formed and stately, and far
above the ordinary height of men. He wore a
military coat of strong buff leather, garnished with
fringe of tawny silk three inches broad, and loops
of golden braid, partially covered by a breast-plate
and its corresponding back-piece, polished till
they shone bright as silver. He had no gorget,
but a rich cravat of Flanders lace, with long,
transparent
ends, half veiling the clear steel on which it
fell. His dark curled hair flowed down his neck
beneath the rim of a steel cap or morion,
exquisitely
damasked, but without crest or feather; his
hands were guarded by high gauntlets, and his
lower limbs by breeches of the same material,
similarly
ornamented with his cassock, and strong
jack-boots
that would have set a sabre-cut at naught.
His sword, a two-edged, basket-hilted rapier of
uncommon
length, hung from an orange-coloured
scarf, betokening his adherence to the parliament
its army having adopted for their badge that
colour
from the ancient liveries of Essex, as the
cavaliers
had assumed for their distinctive uniform
black feathers and blue shoulder-knotsalthough
the fashion of his garments and the general bearing
of the wearer were more in character with the
demeanour
and the principles of their opponents, than
of those stern and gloomy fanatics who are so
generally
and so erroneously believed to have
composed
the great numerical strength of the liberal, or
to speak more justlyconstitutional party. The
animal he rode, a mare of splendid action,
symmetry
,
and size, was evidently a practised charger,
and accoutred, as became one, with demipique and
holsters, and all that goes to the equipment of a
war-horse. In these minuti, no less than in the
accurate array and perfect discipline of the tall,
hardy-looking youths who rode along behind him
in the strictest silencein the condition and the
bitting of the horsesand, above all, in the cool
intelligence with which he listened to the varying
reports of his subordinates, the quick, decisive
firmness which made known, and the prompt
energy
which carried out, his ordersmight be
discovered
at a glance the officer of many actions!
the soldier on whose mind no lesson of experience
had been lost, until his very nature was no more
the same; that which was once an effortonce
the result of intricate and thoughtful calculation,
arising now from an intuitive foreknowledge, more
like the wondrous instinct of an animal than the
deep reasoning combinations of a man!
It lacked, perhaps, an hour of noon when this
detachment
,
having extricated itself, without so much
as hearing of an enemy, from the wide tracts of
woodland, portions of which may still be seen in
the adjacent counties of Huntingdon and Bedford,
had reached the summit of a considerable
eminence
;
which, falling away steeply toward the
west, commanded an extensive view over the
velvet
pastures of Northampton, checkered with
cornfields
and dark tracts of fallowwith many a
whitewashed
cottage peering from out the foliage of its
orchards, and many a village steeple, with its mossy
graves and tufted yew-trees, and here and there
some castellated mansion, scarce seen amid its
shadowy plantations  stretching away till they
were bounded far to westward by the blue hills
of Warwickshire. Just on the brow of the
declivity
there stood a large and isolated farm, with
stabling
and outhouses sufficient to accommodate a
hundred head of cattle; upon the green before it
the leader of the party drew his bridle, and, after
a quick glance across the champaign at his feet,
and another toward the sun, which had already
passed its height, entering the dwelling, held short
consultation with the sturdy yeoman who possessed
the fertile acres. Before five minutes had elapsed
he issued from the lowly doorway, ordering his
party to dismount and pile their arms, and take
what brief refreshment the farmhouse might offer
during an hour's halt. A hasty bustle followed, as
down the troopers sprang with jingling spur and
scabbard, and merriment suppressed no longer by
the rigid discipline enforced upon the marchno
oaths, however, or profane and Godless clamours
were heard, disgracing equally the officers who
tolerated
and the men who uttered them. Gayety
there was, and decent, sober mirth, but naught of
hoisterous, much less licentious revelling.
Videttes
were stationed on commanding points,
patrols
detailedand then, the horses picketed and
well supplied with provender, fires were lighted,
and canteens produced with all their savoury
Q 2
stores; and the men, stretched at length on the
smooth greensward, chatted and laughed as gayly
over their hurried meal as though they were
engaged
in some exciting sylvan exercise, and not in
the tremendous toil of warfare. The hour allotted
for their stay had wellnigh passedwhen, from
their farther outpost, a horseman galloped in,
bloody with spurring, and, driving through the
scattered
groups, flung his rein heedlessly upon his
charger's neck, and turned him loose before the
doorwhile, with an air betokening the
consciousness
of bearing high and stern intelligence, he
hastened
to convey his tidings to his officer. There
needed not, however, words to tell the men that
danger was at hand! A moment's anxious gaze at
the vidette, and the jest ceased, the flagon was
suspended
ere it reached the thirsty lip, the laugh was
not laughed out! Another moment, and the fires
were all desertedthe remnants of the meal laid
hastily asidehorses, recruited by their feed, were
bridledswords buckled on, and helmets braced,
and firearms inspected; and, ere their leader came
again among them, in anxious conversation with
the messenger, they waited to mount only till the
ready trumpets should sound boot and saddle!
Get you to horse! he saidget you to horse
as silently as may be! But spare your breath,
he added, turning abruptly to the bugler, who was
already handling his instrument, till it be needed
for a charge, which, an' we be so lucky as I deem
we are, it may beand right early! Sir Edmund
Winthrop, have your men into line as speedily as
may be; but move not until farther signal! My
charger, Anderton  and let a sergeant's guard
mount instantly! I go to reconnoitrea bugler
with the party. Soh! Steady, men, steady!and,
without farther pause, he leaped into his saddle
and, followed by the small detachment, galloped
at a fierce pace down the hill-side, rugged and
broken
as it was, in company with the patrol who had
brought in the tidings. Close to the bottom of the
hill whereon the troops were halting there ran a
deep and hollow gorge, cutting across the road
which they had kept thus far directly at right
angles
,
and screened from observation on the upper
side by a long, straggling belt of furze and
underwood
,
with here and there a huge and
weather-beaten
oak or glossy beech, forming the outskirts
of a heavy mass of forest that fringed, for several
miles in length, the extreme left of the level
country
across which their line of march would lead
them. Through this gorge, as the sentinel
reported
,
a powerful force of cavalry was moving toward
the causeway at scarcely two miles distance; but
whether friends or foes he might not, as he said,
determine. Checking his charger at the junction
of the roads, the officer dismounted; and, taking
off his head-piece lest its glitter should betray him,
stole forward through the trees to a high sandstone
bluff commanding the whole gorge. From this he
instantly discovered the approaching troops, who
had so nearly come upon him unawares. There
were at least five hundred horse in view, all
cuirassiers
completely cased in steel, escorting, as it
seemed, a strong brigade of field artillery. When
first they had been seen by the vidette, they were
emerging from the forest-land alluded to before,
and had attempted, as he said, a cross-road visible
from the hill-side; but it had proved so miry, as he
judged from the slow progress of the guns, that
they had countermarched, and were advancing
steadily, as now beheld, under the guidance of a
countryman who rode beside their leader, toward
the sandy gorge by which they evidently hoped to
gain the practicable road. Earnestly did the wary
partisan gaze on the glittering columns, searching
their movements, and examining their dress and
arms with eager scrutiny, and ever and anon
sweeping the country in their rear with an
inquiring
glance, that seemingly expected father
indications
from that quarter. But it was all in vain!
The regiment in view wore neither scarfs, nor any
badge that might inform him of their politics or
partytheir colours were all furled around the
staves and cased in oil-skinand all, from which
he might in anywise conjecture of whether host
they formed a portion, was the exact and veteran
discipline their movements indicatedfar too
exact
,
as he supposed from the reports prevailing
through the country, for the tumultuary levies of
the Puritans. The hollow way on which they
were advancing opened, at a mile's distance, on the
plain, and it appeared that the new-comers were
about to enter it unthinking of surprise, and
confident
,
perhaps, in their own power. If they be
foes, we have them! cried the partisan. Back,
Anderton, back to the regimentride for your life!
tell Major Armstrong to lead down three troops
dismounted, with their arquebuses ready, and their
matches lightedbeneath the cover of yon dingle
on the hill-side till he shall reach this gorge, then
line it with his musketry! Let Anstruther wheel,
with three more, about yon round-topped hillock
in half an hour he may debouche upon the plain
or sooner, if he hear our shotand charge upon the
rear of yon horse-regimentthey will be in the
trap ere then! Sir Edmund Winthrop will lead
down the rest by the same road we cameI tarry
him! Away! Be swift and silent! Away! for
more than life is on your speed! and, with the
word, the subaltern dashed furiously away,
spurning
the pebbles high into the air at every bound,
and instantly was lost to sight behind the angle of
the sandy banks, while he who had commanded,
after another wistful gaze toward the approaching
squadron, returned with leisurely and quiet steps
to his good charger. With his own hands he drew
the girths more tight, looked to each strap and
buckle of his rein and stirrups, patted her arched
crest with a fleeting smile, and mounting, rode,
with half a dozen followers, sharply along the
gorge, as if to meet the strangers, who now seemed
disposed to pause upon the plain, and reconnoitre,
ere they should enter a defile so perilous and
narrow
.
Just at this momentwhile a score or two
of troopers rode out from the advanced guard of
the horse, which had now halted, and warily
dispersing
themselves among the broken ground,
began
to beat the thickets with deliberate and jealous
scrutinya low, stern hum arose from the dark
corps of cuirassiersincreasing still and swelling
on the ear, till it was clearly audible for a full mile
around, a burst of deep-toned, manly voicesharsh
perhaps in themselves, and tuneless, but harmonized
by distance and the elastic atmosphere on which
they floated, till they were blended at least into
a solemn and melodious sound. Louder they rose,
and louder on the breeze, and now were answered
by a faint and dream-like echo from out the dim
aisles of the forest in their rear, among the leafy
screens of which the arms and standards of another
and another band might fitfully be seen to glitter.
It was the soul-inspiring crash of sacred music,
the peal of choral voices untaught and undirected,
save by the impulse of a thousand hearts attuned
to one high key of patriotic pietyunmixed with
instruments of wind or stringa deep, sonorous
diapasonthe soldier's anthem to the God of
battles
and the Lord of Hosts!
Arise! arise! the mighty sound went forth,
its every syllable distinctly audible to the excited
listener
Arise! arise!oh Godour Godarise!
Ride on in might, in terror, and renown
A kindling flame, their nobles to consume
A two-edged sword, to smite their princes down!
Thou that dost break the arrows and the bow
Thou that dost knap the ashen spear in sunder
Thou, Lord of Hosts, that gav'st the horse his strength,
And clothed the volumes of his neck in thunder
Be thou our rockour fortress of defence
Our horn of safety, in whose strength we trust
So shall their hosts be chaff before the wind
So shall their thousands grovel in the dust!
So shall our feet be crimson with their blood
Their tongues our dogs shall purple with the same
The fowls of air shall have them for a spoil
Their pride a hissing, and a curse their name!
For not in armour, nor the winged speed
Of chargers, do we hopebut only see
By whose great aid their vauntings to outspeed
Most Mercifulmost Mightyonly Thee!
Scarce had the first sounds reached the leader's
ear, before he checked his mare abruptly
Walters
,
he cried at once, away with you, and
overtake
him ere he gain the regiment! These be no
enemies, but friends! Let not a troop descend
from the hill-sidebid them await me, as they be,
in order! Spare not your spurs, nor fear to spoil
your horsefleshwe have no time to lose! I well
had deemed, he added, muttering to himself, after
the orderly had galloped off with his commands
`I well had deemed their rear was many a mile
advanced past this ere now. Pray Heaven that
Essex lack not men to hold the king in check, as
he is like to do, if that this news be sooth how he
hath gathered head toward Keinton and Edgehill!
and, without farther words, he hastened down the
road, to be, as soon as he had cleared the first
projection
of the broken banks, discovered by the
reconnoitering
party in advance. A dozen carbines
were presented on the instant at a short range
Standho!
Friends! friends! he shouted, in reply, but
without altering his pacecan you not see our
colours? waving his orange scarf abroad, as he
closed with the foremost trooper.
Stand, friend, then!if that friend you be
stand, friend, and give the word! returned the
other, grufflystand! or I do profess that I will
shootyea! shoot thee to the death!
How now, thou peevish knave, replied the
officer, in high and ireful tones. Recover
instantly
thy carbinemarshal me straight unto the
leader of you horse! Who is he that commands
them?
For a moment's space the grim parliamentarian
stubbornly gazed upon the features of the gallant
who addressed him, as if reluctant to obey his
mandate; but then a gleam of recognition flashed
across his sunburnt featuresI crave your
pardon
,
he said, half abashed; it is, an' I mistake
not, Lieutenant-colonel Ardenne, of the
parliament's
Lead on, then, sirrah! since thou knowest me,
interrupted Edgar, shortlylead on, an' thou
wouldst not repent itand tell me who commands
yon horse brigade!
Stout Colonel Cromwell, answered the
soldier
,
more respectfullystout and courageous
Colonel Cromwell! He will, I do believe, rejoice
at this encounter. This way, good sir. Yonder
he sits on the black horse beside the standard,
awaiting our return. Lo you! he sees us, and the
files move onward!
And he spoke truly; for, as the cavalry
perceived
the videttes moving orderly and slowly
back, they filed off, troop succeeding troop, toward
the entrance of the lane, advancing on a gentle trot
in regular and beautiful array. As they passed
Ardenne, many a scrutinizing eye perused his
figure
and equipments, and in most instances a
sanctified
and solemn sneer disturbed the dark repose
of their grave featurescalled up, as it would
seem, by the rich dress and courtly air of the
young officer, which, in their wonted parlance,
were denounced as fleshly lusts that war against
the soul, devices of the Evil One, fringes,
phylacteries
,
and trappings of the beast. Nor, in
meanwhile
,
did Edgar turn a heedless or incurious glance
toward those with whom, discarding friends and
kindred, birthright, and rank, and chivalrous
association
as things of small avail compared to the
great common weal, he had now cast his lot for
ever. The first emotion of his mind was deep
anxietythe second wonderand the third
unqualified
and unmixed admiration. Never, he
thought, in Germany or Francenever, among the
veteran legions of the Lion of the North, the
Protestant
Gustavus, had he beheld superior discipline,
or men more soldier-like and promising. Mounted
on strong black chargers of full sixteen hands in
height, their furniture of the most simple kind, but
well designed and in the best conditiontheir iron
panoply, corslet, and helm, and taslets, stainless
and brilliantand, above all, their bearing and
demeanourtheir seats upon their horses, firm yet
easytheir muscular and well-developed limbs
their countenances full of resolution, and
breathing
alldespite the difference of individual
character
,
and the various operations of the same
affection
on minds of different biasa strange
expression
of religious sentimentsolemn in some, and
stern, or even sullenin others wild, fanatical,
exalted
,
and triumphantyet in all more or less
apparent
,
as evidently forming the great spring and
motive of their action. Still, though attentive in
the first degree to the essential rules of military
discipline, keeping an accurate and well-dressed
front, and managing their heavy chargers with
precision
,
there was not any of that deep, respectful
silence among these military saints which Edgar
had been used to look for in the strictly-ordered
service of the Netherlands, and to esteem a
requisite
of soldiershipbut, on the contrary, as every
troop rode past him, there was a constant hum of
conversation, suppressed, indeed, and low, but still
distinctly audible; and he might mark the
knotted
brows and clinched hands of the vehement
disputers
,
arguingas it would seem from the
decided
gestures, and the texts which he occasionally
caught lending an elevated savour to their homely
language, and, more than all, from the continual
appeal to the well-worn and greasy Bibles which
each of these stern controversialists bore at his
girdle
on
questions of religious discipline or points
of abstruse doctrine. Although this mixture of the
soldier and religionist, this unduc, and, as it seemed
to him, irreverent blending of things good and holy
with the dreadful trade of blood, jarred painfully on
his correct and feeling mind, he could not but
acknowledge
that this dark spirit of religious zeal,
this confidence in their own overweening
righteousness
,
this fixed, unwavering belief that they were
the elected and predestined instruments of the Most
Highto execute, as he could hear them cry
aloud, vengeance upon the heathen and
punishment
Vol. I.R
upon the people!to bind their kings in
chains and their nobles in fetters of iron! was
indeed
a mighty and effective agent to oppose that
chivalrous, enthusiastic bravery, that loyal,
self-devoting
valour which inflamed the highborn army of
the cavaliers to deeds of noble daring. Nor did he
entertain a doubt, when he perceived the
extraordinary
person who commanded them, occupied
himself
in preaching, or expounding rather, the
mysterious
prophecies of the Old Testamentto which
especially the puritans inclined their earto an
attentive
knot of officers, grouped, some upon their
horses, and yet more dismounted, around the
regimental
standard, but that he had some reason far
more cogent than mere feelings of devotion for thus
encouraging a spirit so unusual in the breasts of his
stout followers. The colonelfor to such rank
had Cromwell recently been elevated, more even
in consideration of the powerful and trusty
regiment
which he had levied from the freeholders and
yeomanry of Huntingdon by his own personal and
private influence, than of his services performed
already
,
not either few or inconsiderable, keeping the
cavaliers in check, surprising many of their
leaders
,
anticipating all their meditated risings, and
cutting
off all convoys, whether of money or
munitions
,
throughout the counties of the Eastern
Association
the
colonel, as he met the eye of
Ardenne
,
was seated on his powerful black war-horse,
bestriding him, as it would seem, with giant
strength, and perfect mastery of leg and hand, but
with an air wholly unmilitary and devoid of ease or
gracesheathed nearly cap-a-pi in armour of
bright steel, heavy and exquisitely finished, but
utterly
without relief or ornament of any kind. A
band or collar of plain linen, with a broad hem,
fastened
about his short Herculean neck, varied alone
the stern simplicity of his attire; no feather waved
above his low and graceless casqueno
shoulder-knot
or scarf bedecked his weapon, which was girt
about his middle by a belt of buff three inches at
the least in width, and balanced on the right side
by a formidable dudgeon and the brass-bound case
of the familiar Bible, which he now held extended
in his left hand, while with the finger of his right
he vehemently smote the open pages at each
emphatic
pause of his discourse. His features showed
not now so sanguine or so kindled as when
Ardenne
last beheld them; but, on the contrary, there
was a mild, half-veiled expression about the heavy
eye; and, though the lines were strong and marked
as ever, there was more of deliberate and quiet
resolution than of imperiousness denoted by the
firmness of his mouth. It was the countenance,
he thought, of a calm visionary, pensive and
meditative
in his mood, and rather steady in the
maintenance
of his own fixed opinions than zealous to
proscribe or controvert the fancies or the rights of
others. But he had little time for noting the
expression
,
changed as he fancied it to be, of his
superior
,
much less for marking the diverse features
of the martial auditorsfor, as he drew nigh to
the spot whereon they stood, Cromwell had ended
his discourse, and, with a word or two of military
precept, was dismissing his attendants to their
several
stations. Several dashed past him as he rode
up to the little eminence on which the colours were
erected, and but two were waiting near the colonel
when he reached himone a bull-necked,
coarse-featured
,
and ungainly-looking person, with a gay
feather in his morion, a showy tassel on his rapier's
hilt, and a falling collar of some low-priced lace
hanging above his gorgetthe other an erect and
well-made man, not past the prime of youth, with
features singularly noble and expressive, though of
an almost Spanish swarthiness, and tinctured with
a deep and melancholy gravity.
Ha! Master Ardenne! exclaimed Oliver, his
eye joyfully flashing as he recognised himright
glad am I to see younot carnally, nor with a
worldly-minded and a selfish pleasure, but in that
there will be work to do anon, in which the
righteous
cause shall need all arms of its supporters!
Have you a power at hand?where be they?in
what force?not travel-worn, I trust me!
Three hundred horse, Edgar replied, on the
height yonderbut for those trees you might
behold
them where we stand! I left them but just
now, to reconnoitre your advance, under Sir
Edmund
Winthrop, my lieutenant.
Good! good! cried Cromwell, eagerly; and
how far have you marched to-daybe your men
travel-toiledyour steeds leg-weary?for verily
we have a march before us.
We have but travelled six brief miles this
fore-noon
,
and barely sixteen yesterdaymy men are
in right spirits, and my horses fresh! I could
accomplish
twenty miles ere nightfall, and that
without
fatigue!
Surely the Lord is gracious, was the answer
and of his grace, too, shall we right soon make
trial. My Lord of Essex hath, ere now, his post
at Keintonand the man Charles of Stuart hath
at length mustered head to face him. 'Tis marvel
that they be not at it even now. I fear me the
lord general shall lack both horse and cannon; but
we have marched already a sore distance with our
ponderous guns and heavy armature, nor may I
now adventure to press on more hastily without
dispersing my command. Ride with me to your
regiment, good sir; I trow you were best speedily
move forward. Keinton is barely twelve miles
distant, and the roads, they tell me, sound and
passable
;
and, as he spoke, touching his charger
lightly with the spur, he broke into a managed
canter
.
Cornet, advance your colours, he
exclaimed
,
in short, keen accents, strangely at
variance
with the monotonous and inexpressive tones
of his discourse when unexcitedsound
kettledrums
,
and march! and, riding briskly forward,
easily passed the troops while filing through the
lane. Halt them here, Ireton, he said to the
dark-favoured officer who had accompanied him, as
he turned into the main road, having outstripped
the forceshalt them in column here, within
the lane, till I returnand, Desborough, do thou
ride back to Hampden's regiment of footit is a
mile or so in the rearand bid him bring it up as
rapidly as may be. Now, Master Ardenne, I
attend
you!
As they rode up to Edgar's quarters, Cromwell
informed him briefly, and with none of those prolix
and verbose sentences with which he was at times
accustomed to confuse the senses of his hearers,
that he, as senior officer, and therefore in
command
of the brigade forming Lord Essex's rear
guard, was marching up, at his best pace, with his
own trusty cavalry, and twothe stoutestof the
parliament's foot-regiments, besides a strong
division
of field-gunsthat, by want of intelligence, the
generalas he had learned himself but yesterday
was hastening right upon the king, and, he was
fearful, would fall, unawares and unprepared for
battle, upon his very outposts! These tidings I
received of a sure hand, he added, though whence
it needeth not to advertise you. Whom the Lord
listeth to enlighten, surely at his own time shall he
inform him. But so it isand it may be that
Essex
R 2
knoweth not his peril! Wherefore I pray you
ha! be these your men? I do profess to you I
hold them stout and soldierlynot like the drunken
tapsters and vile turncoat serving-men whofy on
it! that I should say sodo compose the bulk of
our array! Truly these fellows shall do credit to
the causeso that the spiritthe right leaven be
towardand the Lord strike on our side!
Wherefore
I pray you lead them, as swiftly as you find
consist with order, upon Keinton. If that they
have not yet joined battle, say thus to the lord
general
,
that I beseech him hold off from them so long
as he may; I shall be with him by nine of
tomorrow's
clock. Ha! heard you nothing? he
broke off abruptly, as a deep, distant sound rolled
heavily upon the air; and, before Ardenne might
reply the sullen rumbling was again repeated, like
the faint muttering of a rising thunder-storm, or
the premonitory growling of an earthquake. It
was not thunder! answered Edgar, in the voice of
one asserting rather than questioning; there are
no clouds aloft, nor yet on the horizon!
Ordnance! exclaimed the otherordnance,
and heavier, too, than ours! Listen, now listen!
And again the heavy rolling sound came surging
down the wind, which freshened slightly from the
westwardagain it came after a momentary pause,
yet loader than before, and more distinct; and then
continued without interval the deep, unquestionable
voice of a hot cannonade.
Away, sirGod go with you! cried the stern
puritan, excited now beyond the bounds of
self-restraint
Tarry not on the way, nor loiter! Gird
up your loins, I say. Ride on! ride on, and
conquer
!
Verily, but that it is the Lord's own doing,
verily, Edgar Ardenne, I would have envied thee
thy fortune. Ride onthou shalt be yet in time
ride onamen! Selah!
While he yet spoke, the officers and men, stirred
up already by the near sound of battle, and almost
maddened with excitement by the exulting and
prophetic
cries of Cromwell, were vying with each
other, these to give forth, those to obey, and almost
to anticipate, the needful ordersand, as he uttered
the last words at the full pitch of his piercing voice,
the trumpets rang a wild and thrilling flourishthe
squadron, with a single shout, unbidden and
unanimous
,
that spoke the burning feelings of the
troopers
,
swept on at a hard trot; and, in an instant, not
a sound was to be heard save the thick-beating
clatter of the hoofs, mixed with the clang of spur
and scabbard, and now and then a boom of the
deep kettle-drum timing the pace of the advance.
Onward! onward they hurried at the utmost
speed which prudence would admit, which nothing
but the admirable quality and high condition of
their chargers enabled them to prosecute. Mile
after mile was passed, and still the dull and awful
roarthe knell of many a gallant spiritwaxed
clearer and more clear. Having accomplished
seven miles within the hour, they halted for ten
minutes in a small hamlet to water and to breathe
their horses; and therewhen the confused and
constant noise of their own rapid march was silent
they might distinguish the first sharp explosion
of the leading gun in every rolling volleyand ever
and anon, between the deep-mouthed cannon, the
grinding rattle of the musketry was audible, though
faintly. Onward! onward again, and, ere another
hour elapsed, Ardenne had marked the clouds of
smoke surging and eddying above the distant hills.
The squadron cleared the verge of a low eminence;
a gentle valley slept below them in the still misty
radiance
of a rich autumnal sunset; a tranquil stream
wound through it, crossed by a lofty one-arched
bridgebuilt, as was evident from the bright
ripples
of the ford beside it, merely for use in times
of wintry floodand to the left, at a short mile
above the bridge, nestled the white washed cottages
of a neat country village. The ridge which
bounded
this fair dale toward the west, though cultivated
at the base, and checkered with dark woods and
golden stubbles, lay bare toward the rounded
summits
in unenclosed and open sheep-walks. Above
these summits the volumed smoke rose white as
fleeces of the purest wool, and scarce less solid to
the eye, relieving every object on the brow as
plainly as though it had stood out against a clear
horizon; while all the mingled din of battle rolled
up, a near and fearful contrast to the sweet peace
of that secluded spot. Just as they gained a fair
view of the valley and the heights beyond, a single
figure crossed the opposite swell, dark and
distinctly
seen; a horseman on a furious gallop! As he
descended, a slant sunbeam glanced upon his iron
headpiecehe was a trooperflying! Another
rushed across the ridgeanother, and anothera
confused and panic-stricken group. Forward!
secure the passage of the stream! Forward! ho!
forword! and at a yet more rapid pace they
plunged down the descent; they reached the
causeway of the bridgethey lined the banks with
their arquebusiers, and waited the arrival of the
fugitives
.
On came the first, urging his jaded steed,
but urging him in vain; his sword was gonehis
holsters emptyhis buff-coat soiled and splashed
with many a miry stain. His spurs alone were
bloody! Long ere he reached the bridge
Ardenne's
quick eye had caught the orange scarf, and
he rode forth alone to meet him. At first the
fugitive
drew up his horse as though he would have
turned, but a fresh roar of cannon from behind
decided
him. All's lost! all's lost! he cried
all's lost! Fly! fly! Rupert is close behind!
Silence, for shame! shouted the partisan
coward and slave, be silent, or I cleave thee to
the earth! If all be lost, why rages you hot
cannonade
!
How far from this to the field?
A short three miles, replied the other,
trembling
,
and fearful no less of new acquaintance than
of the foes he fled. Meanwhile on came the rest
all panic-stricken, travel-soiled, and weaponless;
but not one man was wounded.
The cowards! Edgar muttered, as if
carelessly
,
when he rejoined his men, fearful lest they
might be disheartenedthe vile, dastard hounds!
that fled without blow stricken or blood drawn!
But that 'twere loss of time, I would draw out a
file for execution. We will advance, and win more
casily, that none are left to cumber us with
heartless
counsels! Fly on, ye dogs, he cried, more
loudly, as he wheeled his men once more into their
columnfly on, and pray the while ye fly that ye
meet not with Cromwell on your route, else shall
ye but repent that the cavaliers made not an end of
ye before your race began; for, an' I know him,
he will cut it right short with a halter or a volley!
And, with a scornful laugh, he cantered on, eager
to gain the vantage of the hill, and seeing at a
glance that no more runaways poured over it. It
cannot be, he said to his lieutenantit cannot
be the day goes utterly against us, else how should
these have fled three miles from the encounter, and
still the firing on both sides continuecontinue,
said Inay, but it waxes warmer!
They reached the summit of the ridge, and at
first sight Edgar indeed believed that all was
over-A
long broad valley lay outstretched beneath him,
that might almost be called a plainthe foreground
scattered thick with groups of roundheads, flying
here singly, here in bodiesto the south, toward
the town of Keinton, in a line nearly parallel to the
range of heights on which he stood; while in the
middle distance he might see a torrent of dispersed
pursuing cavalry, with flaunting plumes and
fluttering
scarfs, swords brandished to the sun, and
pistol-shots all redly flashing out through the dense
smoke, as unrelentingly they urged the massacre.
But, as he looked more steadfastly upon the scene,
he could distinguish, at some two or three miles'
distance toward the northern verge of the unbroken
valley, two dark, uninterrupted lines, whence rose
the smoke and burst the vivid flashes of artillery
with undiminished vigourhe could discern,
between
the cloudy screens, the wavering and
wheeling
masses that still waged the balanced fight, and
he could hear the rattling volleys of the musketry
sharp and incessant. 'Tis but our cavalry, he
said'tis but our cavalry that fly, and their
horse-general
has lost a golden opportunity; had he but
wheeled upon our flank when the dog-troopers fled,
he might have gained the battle! But it is now
too late, and, an' he look not out the sharper, we
may yet give him a rebuff he dreams not of. Sound
trumpetsha! sound merrily a rally and a charge!
Advance, brave hearts, we will redeem the day.
For lo! he added, with rare tact, as he perceived
the royal horse relaxing their pursuit, and heard
their bugles winding a recallfor lo! they have
perceived us, and retreat already!
And down the slope he moved in admirable order,
interposing a small wood between his force and the
retiring cavalry of the victorious royalistswhom,
notwithstanding his most politic vaunt, he little
wished at that time to encounter. Just ere he sank
upon the level ground he carefully reviewed the
scene before him, and was even more convinced
than ever that the battle was indeed still
undetermined
and,
farther yet, that the royalist horse
were at the last aware of their mistake in urging
the pursuit too far; for he might see them
straining
every nerve now to repair their error, as they
swept back toward the left-hand rear of the
contending
parties, leaving thereby the access to the
right wing of Lord Essex, whom Ardenne justly
deemed to lie between himself and the king's forces,
easy and unobstructed. Instantly he perceived,
and profited as instantly by this advantage;
marching
at a sharp trot across the field strewed with the
mangled carcasses of those who, by their dastard
flight, had lost the wretched lives they sacrificed
their honour to preserve, and forfeited all claim to
that precarious boon, a soldier's pity. Once on the
level ground, he could discover nothing farther, and
the suspense was fearful; and now the cannonading
ceasedthe musketry fell thicker and more
constant
then
that ceased likewise, and was followed
by the faintly-heard hurrah of charging horse, and
the wild chorus of a psalm. The day is ours,
he shouted, as he recognised the soundson!
on! to share the glory! Faster they hurried, and
but little time elapsed ere he brought up his
squadron
,
without the slightest opposition, or indeed
notice
,
on the king's part, to the extreme right of the
position occupied in the commencement of the
action
by the army of the parliament. The moment
was indeed most critical, and Edgar could not but
perceive, as, having left his squadron for the
moment
in command of his lieutenant, he rode up and
reported to the general, that his arrival was deemed
singularly opportune. Never, perhaps, had been a
field more nearly lostnever a victory more madly
cast awaynever a battle poised more equally.
The base desertion of Sir Faithful Fortescue, the
terror-stricken flight of Waller's horse on the left
wing before the fiery charge of Rupert, and the
defeat of the right wing by Wilmot and Sir Arthur
Aston, had left both flanks of the parlimentarians
utterly naked and unguarded; so that a single
charge by either of the royalist commanders upon
the flank or rear which they had turned, must
have annihilated all of their array which yet stood
firmthe foot under the earl in person, and a
reserve
of horse under Sir William Balfour. But
with that desperate and selfish fury which
neutralized
,
in every instance, the effects of his undaunted
valour, Rupert drove past the left, as Wilmot passed
the right, of Essex, trampling and cutting down
their unresisting countrymen for several miles'
distance
from the field, the former suffering his men
to sack the town of Keinton, and to disperse among
the baggage of the enemy; while his desertion had
not only robbed the king of all his hopes of victory,
but actually placed him in a more evil plight, and
peril far more imminent, than had defeat the foe.
For Balfour, with his squadron of reserve, seeing
the plain entirely clear of horse, had charged the
royal foot with such a steadiness of persevering
courage, that he had cut the Earl of Lindsay's
regiment to pieces, taking that nobleman, with
his brave son Lord Willoughby, both desperately
wounded, prisonerswinning the king's own
standard
throwing
the centre into perilous confusion
and hewing his way almost to the person of the
monarch. Just at this moment, when a bold
advance
of his whole line must have completed the
king's ruin, Lord Essex was compelled, by
Rupert's
reappearance on his left with his fast
rallying
cavalrywho, though in disarray, and tired both
horse and man, were flushed with their success and
high in spiritto recall Balfour to make head
against him; and that bold leader's trumpets were
calling off his troopers from their half-achieved
success
when Ardenne reached the field, and was
directed
instantly to move his fresh men forward to
protect
the left wing of the infantry till Balfour should
draw off and relieve him. His troops, though new
to service, were admirably disciplined and full of
daring confidence in their tried leader; and with
such promptitude and regularity did they
manuvre
and deploy in face of a superior body, that he
almost regretted that there was no better
opportunity
to prove their mettle and to flesh their maiden
swords. His duty quietly performed, and the
reserve
of Balfour being reformed in haste and
fronting
Rupert, he was commanded once again to
occupy
his first position on the right; and now
instinctively
he saw that either army might be
deemed half conqueredthat a single charge
nay, but a single demonstrationwould suffice to
win an absolute and undisputed victory. Each
host was spiritless and disarrayedthe leaders on
each side confused and doubtfulthe troops
exhausted
,
slack, and heartless. Vainly he prayed
the general-in-chief to suffer him to risk his single
regiment in but one charge on Rupert's
half-collected
squadrons; pointing out to him clearly, but
without effect, the strong presumption that his fresh
men and vigorous horses must sweep away, like
dust, the cavaliers, worn out with the lassitude for
ever consequent on over-fierce excitement, and
troubled farther at finding themselves assailed from
having of late been assailantsand the certainty
that, if such should be the case, undoubted
conquest
must ensue. The earl was cold and
dubious
.
Vol. I.S
We may not hope, he saidwe may not
hope for victory to-night. It is a mercy from on
highI had right nearly said a miraclethat we
stand here as now, at vantage, holding the better
of a doubtful day! An hour ago methought that
all was lost. Moreover, it has gone tenfold more
fatally with them than us. We have lost privates
men neither high of heart nor strong of hand,
much less of eminence or wisdomthey the first
flowers of England. Oh! I could wellnigh weep,
but that 'twere treason to our cause, for the pure
blood that has been shed like waterLindsay, and
Aubigney, and Stewart, and Edmund Verney, the
bravest and the best of the array, all lostall lost
in this accursed quarrel! Two more such fields
as this were fatal to the king, while ten such would
but leave us, at the worst, where now we are!
Slowly and unconvinced Edgar rode back to his
command; and as he watched the movements of
the enemy, now holding the precise position they
had occupied three hours before, whatever doubt he
might have entertained till then vanished at once
for he beheld the hapless Charlesarmed as
becomes
a king to battle for his crown, all steel from
spur to helinet, a mantle of black velvet, with the
star and George of diamonds, floating above his
armour
reining
his snow-white charger gallantly
among his wavering lines, beseeching them once
more, with energetic gesturesonce more to
charge the rebels!and he beheld the faint and
false-hearted denial; for not by any prayer or
promise could those to whom he spoke with words
of fire be wrought upon a second time to dare the
onset.
Meanwhile the sun set gloomily in a dense bank
of cloudsthe night, that common friend to
wearied
and dismantled armies, sank darkly down
upon the plain so thickly set with sights and sounds
of agony and horror that it was but one mighty
charnel-house; and the two hosts, each on the
ground whereon they fought, slept anxious and
uneasy
on their armsuncertain of their present
safety, and unresolved of their proceedings for the
morrow.
CHAPTER II.
Behold! our swords are drawn!
Not for the bubble famenor at thy call,
Vaulting ambition, that would stride the neck
Of prostrate kings, to mount, with foot profane,
Thrones of usurped dominionbut for right!
For freedomfor our countryfor our God!
And think ye they shall e'er go up again,
Till that this solemn cause adjudged shall be,
In high Heaven's sight, by death or victory?
The
morning was yet gray and gloomy after a
night of frostfelt the more bitterly by those who
bivouacked upon the field, since there was neither
tree, nor hedge, nor any other covert nigh to fence
them from the piercing windwhen Ardenne
started
from the disturbed and unrefreshing slumbers
which had crept upon him, beneath the partial
shelter
of an ammunition tumbrel overturned and
broken
,
uproused by the loud trumpets of the
powerful
re-enforcement brought up before the promised
hour by Cromwell, consisting of two thousand foot,
Hampden's and Grantham's regiments, and his own
ironsides, whose presence might, on the preceding
day, have turned the doubtful scale, and ended, at
a single stroke, the war unfortunately destined to
no such speedy termination. It was a strange and
melancholy, though exciting scene, that met his
gaze as he arose; the dark skies scarcely dappled
in the east by the first paly streaks of dawnthe
faint stars waning one by one as the cold light
increased
the
black brows of the neighbouring hills
cutting distinct and sharp against the wan horizon
the white and ghostly mist creeping in wreaths
along their bases, and curtaining the plain with a
dense veil, through which the watchfires of the
royal host, at scantly a mile's distance, burnt with
a dull and lurid redness, like to the glimmering of
a witch's caldronthe foreground heaped with the
carriages of the artillery, horses picquetted in their
ranks, and companies of men outstretched on the
dank soil, sleeping upon no better couches than
their dripping cloaks, beneath no warmer canopy
than the o'ercast and gusty firmament. Nor were
the sounds that rose at intervals from the opposing
camps, and the deserted battle field between them,
less wild and mournful than the images which
crowded their nocturnal areathe measured tramp
of the unwearied sentinel, now mingled with the
clash of armour, and close beside the ear, now
gradually
sinking into silence as he visited his farther
beatthe clang and clatter of the horse patrol,
sweeping at wider distances around the guarded
limits, and the deep, melancholy cadence of his
occasional
All's wellthe neigh and stamp of
restless
chargersthe howling of forsaken dogsand,
sadder and more terrible than all beside, the feeble
wailing, the half-heard, distant groan, or the
long-drawn
,
but unavailing cry for succour, of maimed
and miserable wretches, battling and wrestling with
their mortal pangs throughout the livelong night,
and cursing the unnatural strength that nerved their
fainting and reluctant flesh to strive with that
inevitable
angel, whom their more willing spirit would
have welcomed as a rescuer and friend. While he
was yet, with a sick heart and tortured ear,
listening
to these too numerous witnesses of human
agony
,
and pondering upon the dread responsibility
of him who, to indulge a lawless thirst after a little
brief authority, had let loose on a happy land that
most abhorred curse of nations, domestic war, an
orderly rode up in haste to crave his presence at
the quarters of the general. After a short and
rapid walk toward the rear, he reached the spot
where Essex, like the meanest of his men, had
passed the night, beneath no other roof than the
inclement
sky. A dozen pikes, irregularly pitched
into the ground, and draped with horse-blankets
and watch-cloaks, offered a shelter rather nominal
than real against the night air on the north and east,
while a huge pile of logs sparkled and blazed in
front, casting a wavering glare of crimson upon a
group of tall and martial-looking officers, collected
round the person of their leader, and glittering
more obscurely on the arms and figures of a score
or two of troopers, who sat motionless on their tall
chargers at some short distance in the rear. The
council, as it seemed to Edgar on his first approach,
were absolutely silent; but, as he drew more near,
he found that Essex was addressing them,
although
in tones so low and so subdued that they
scarce reached the ears of those for whom they
were intended. Nor, as he judged from the
expression
painted on every countenancefor the lord
general ceased from speaking just as he joined the
circlewere his words calculated to inspire his
listeners
with confidence or warlike spirit. A blank,
desponding gloom sat darkling on the brows of all,
and every eye save those of the new-comers, who
stood together and apart a little from the rest,
dwelt gloomily upon the ground. It seemed a
S 2
meeting rather of defeated and despairing fugitives,
than of the bold and dauntless spirits who had but
yestereven maintained a more than equal strife
against the flower of England's noblestill,
suddenly
,
with his harsh features kindling into
passionate
and fiery animation, and his eye glancing
wildfire, Cromwell, whom Edgar had not hitherto
observed, upstarted from a pile of housings and
horse-furniture on which he had been seatedAs
the Lord liveth, he exclaimedas the Lord
liveth
,
we can smite them hip and thigh, if so be that
your excellency will give me but command to
charge upon them now, while they yet lie, with
faint hearts and with heavy eyes, about their
watch-fires. I ask but for my own stout troop of
ironsides and Master Ardenne's horse here, if he
list to join meI ask but these, and, verily, I do
profess to you, they shall not bide the changing of
a buffet; nay, but we may destroy them utterly,
smiting them with the sword, as Joshua smote
them
beside the waters, even the waters of Merom,
what time he did to them as the Lord bade him;
he houghed their horses and burnt their chariots
with fire!
It is too late, sir! returned Essex, coldly
it is too late! The morning will have broken ere
you can get your men to horse!
Nay, but not so, lord general, anxiously
interrupted
Cromwell; my troopers be not yet
dismounted
;
and, of a truth, I do assure you that their
spirits are athirst, ay, and their souls an hungered,
to do this battle for the Lord!
We will not have it so, sir, replied the earl,
shortly, and scarcely courteouslywe will not
have it so. It might endanger our whole host. I
pray you, Colonel Cromwell, draw out your horse
upon our farthest left, facing thereby Prince
Rupert
on the king's right wing. And you, fair
gentlemen
turning
to Hampden and to Grantham
move up your gallant foot to re-enforce our
centre
.
Had ye been here but yesterday, I had not
feared to gain a complete victory; but now I hold
it rash to offer or commence, though, by God's
help, we will not shun encounter. Sirs, to your
posts. The council is at end. The day is
breaking
lo,
there sounds the reveille!
Cold council! muttered Cromwell in the ear
of Ardenne, as he left the presence; cold
council
,
if not traitorous! and, at the best, false
argument
!for
an he could half beat Charles Stuart
without us yesterday, sure, with three thousands
of fresh men, and those the best of his array, he
might now trample him beneath his feet! Besides,
with Verney slain outright, and Lindsey captive,
and half their officers cut down or grievously en
treated, stands it not certain that they must need
be faint of heart? Verily! verily! I say to you,
there shall be no good thing befall the righteous
cause while such a leader marshalls us.
As he concluded he turned off abruptly,
mounted
his horse, and rode away toward his troopers,
who awaited their stout colonel in the rear; and,
ere ten minutes had elapsed, Edgar might hear
them chanting, in subdued and sullen tones, the
melancholy psalm, Save me, O God, for the
waters are come in unto my soul, as they
marched
gloomily away to occupy the post to which
they were assigned. At the same time the
regiments
,
which, for the last half hour, had been
getting
under arms, fell in, and faced the army of the
king, now clearly to be seen, as the mists
gradually
rolled away before the growing daylight,
resuming
the position it had held before the action
of the previous day. The instruments of music
sounded, indeed, and cheerily, and the bright
colours
fluttered gayly in the freshening breeze; but
other sign of spirit or alacrity along the serried
ranks Edgar saw none before he reached his own
brave troopers, already mounted and in accurate
array, under Sir Edmund Winthrop, his lieutenant,
and eageras the heart-stirring shout with which
they greeted their commander spoke themfor
the onset, of which they deemed his presence the
immediate harbinger.
The sun rose broad and bright, kindling the
whole expanse of heaven with his fair lustre; the
mist-wreaths floated upward, and dispersed
themselves
into the delicate and scale-like clouds,
flecking
the azure skies, which promise glorious days;
the morning gradually passed away, and noon drew
nigh, and still each army held its ground, facing
the other in the stern array of warfare, both, as it
seemed, prepared and resolute to meet, but neither
willing to commence, the onset. At times, the
trumpets on one side would breathe forth a wild
flourish of defiance, and a shout or psalm would go
up to the peaceful heaven from the other, intended,
it might be, to challenge or to irritate the foe into
some movement that should lay him open to attack;
but the sun now rode high in heaven, and hour by
hour the chances of a general action became less
imminent. Suddenlyat a moment when all those
leaders of the parliament, who deemed it no less
for their interest than honour to give battle, almost
despaired of any opportunity for sealing their
adherence
to the causethere was a movement on
the right wing of the royal host. Directly in the
centre of the field, midway between the lines of
either army, four light field-pieces, sakers and
culverins
,
had been abandoned, on the previous day,
by the king's infantry, when shattered and
disordered
,
though still fighting with their faces to the
foe, by the repeated charge of Balfour's horse. So
rapidly had night set in upon the wearied hosts,
and perhaps so fearful were both parties of then
doing aught which might provoke renewal of the
conflict, that these, the proof and prizes of the
victory
,
had been permitted to remain unmoved, either
by rescuer or captor, through the long hours of
darkness; and, until midday was at hand, no
disposition
was exhibited to bring them off, whether
by cavalier or puritan. But noweither disposed
to fight, if needful, with courage gathered from the
weak policy of Essex, or convinced by their
inactivity
that he should meet with no resistance from
the despised and hated roundheadsRupert dashed
forth in person from the right, with a detachment
of the king's horseguard, that gallant troop of
nobles whose impetuous and headlong daring,
though at the first it had passed, like a torrent,
sheer through the reeling ranks and weaker
cavalry
of its opponents, had yet done more against
the final gaining of the day than had the fiercest
struggles of the adversary. Forward they came,
mounted on horses that might each have borne a
king to battle, rending the air with their repeated
cheers, and with the joyous clangour of their
defying
trumpets, a flood of waving plumes and
fluttering
scarfsthe bravest and the best-born of the
land. Midway between the hosts they galloped
on, exposing, as it would seem, in very wantonness
of bold bravade, the flank of their advance to the
stern ironsides of Cromwell, who showed like a
dark storm-cloud ready to burst upon their heads
with all the crash and ruin of a tempest. Already
were those gloomy martialists exchanging their
dull scowls of rigid and abstracted sanctity for the
fierce flashings of enthusiastic joy, with which they
never failed to clothe their features when rushing
down like eagles to the banquet of the sword!
Already were they brandishing their heavy blades
aloft in savage exultation. Already were they
lifting
up their voices in the triumphant psalm which
should preface their thundering charge, and, rising
high above the din of battle, strike terror and
confusion
to the hearts of those whom, as they sung,
The Lordeven the Lord of Hostsshall hunt,
to overthrow them! But, ere the word was given
by their colonel, whose sword was in his hand
outstretched toward the flaunting cavaliers, on
whose destruction he securely counted, an officer
came, at the full speed of his spur-galled and
foaming
charger, bearing the mandates of the general.
Ha! Major Winton, Cromwell exclaimed,
with a raised voice and joyous intonation, you
bring us right glad tidingstidings which my soul
comprehendeth ere mine ear hath caught their
import
.
Tarry thou but a little space, and call me
coward then, an thou see them not performed unto
the letteray! and those gay malignants yonder
scattered like chaff before the wind of heaven!
Sound trumpets, and
Hold! Colonel Cromwell; in the Lord's name,
hold! the other interrupted him, with a half
frightened
energy of zeal; you do misapprehend!
'Tis the lord general's command that you stir not
a foot! He would avoid an action.
Tush, man, it cannot be! Oliver fiercely cried;
nay, stay me not!forego thy grasp upon my
rein! Let me not now, I say, or truly I will
Nay, sir, returned the officer, cutting again
into his speech, as much chagrined by the
impetuous
gesture and half uttered threat, you shall do
as you list for me; but I do warn you, 'tis against
express commandment of my Lord of Essex if you
shall charge these horse. See how they muster
yonder to the front of the main host, dragoons and
cavalry, for the support of this detachment. One
charge must need bring on a general action.
The better! answered Cromwell, with a
gloomy frown; the betteran we had aught of
faith in the good cause, or spirit in our carnal
calling
.
But on his own head be it! Surely the
Lord hath deadened his understanding, causing his
heart to fail with terror and with fainting! On his
own head be it! and, as he spoke, he sheathed his
rapier, driving it home so furiously that the hilt
rang against the iron scabbard with a sharp, angry
clatter; on his own head be the shame, the ruin,
and confusion! and, turning his charger's rein, he
rode away toward the rear, in a dark, sullen
revery
,
determined not to look upon the capture of
the guns since he could not prevent it. Nor did
he check in anywise, or reprimand the deep and
bitter murmurs of reviling which the fierce zealots
he commanded launched against the cold and
cautious
policy that thus forbid them to arise, and
slay the enemy at Karkar, even as Gideon arose
when he slew Zebah and Zalmunnah!
And, in the sight of the whole host, the chivalry
of Rupert dashed along, with brandished weapons
and bright banners, unharmed at least, if not
unheeded
.
They pounced upon the cannon, and not
a sword was drawn or a shot fired. Six powerful
horses, led for the purpose, and already harnessed,
were, on the instant, linked to every gun; and
away they went, bounding and clattering over the
frozen soil at a hard gallop, while the fearless
cavaliers
formed front toward the host of Essex to
cover their retreat, patiently waiting till they
reached
the royal lines. Then, with three regular cheers
of triumph and derision, they filed off at a foot's
pace, as if unwilling to return without exchanging
shot of carbine or stroke of sword, even although
victorious. Another hour elapsed, and yet another,
and still the armies held their stations steadily, face
to face, neither advancing to attack, neither
disposed
to quit the field in presence of the other.
Noon was already past, when a fresh movement
was observed among the royalists near to the
centre of the army. But this time, as it seemed,
no hostile measures were intended; for a white
flag was suddenly advanced beyond the outposts of
the army, and then, preceded by his trumpet, and
followed by a glittering train of pursuivants, attired
in their quartered tabards, Clarencieux,
king-at-arms
,
refulgent in the blazoned pomp of heraldry,
caracoled forth upon a snow-white palfrey, whose
embroidered housings literally swept the ground.
When it had almost reached the advanced guards
of the parliament, the gay procession halted, while
its trumpets stirred the echoes of the slumbering
hills with a long-flourished blast, calling the leaders
of the host to a pacific parle. But, be their errand
what it might, their summons called forth no
emotion
from the stern puritans. No officer rode down
to meet themno peaceful symbol corresponding
to their own was raised to greet themno trumpet
answered theirs, though thrice it brayed aloud, with
notes of evident impatience. Wearied, at length,
by the contemptuous silence which alone
answered
to his overtures, leaving his train where it had
halted, the king-at-arms rode slowly, with a dubious
air, as if but ill assured of safety, toward the
nearest
guard of horsemen, one pursuivant alone
attending
,
and demanded to be led forthwith to the lord
general; after brief ceremonial, the subaltern,
detaching
half a dozen men, escorted him along the
line, requiring him emphatically, and with a glance
toward the carbines of the guard, which rested
upon their thighs, in readiness for instant service, to
speak no word an he would reach the general in
life. Nor was his greeting much more cordial
when, after hurrying him, with small respect, along
the serried ranks, the subaltern resigned him to an
officer of Essex's lifeguard, who, with the same
stern discipline, conducted him toward the
quarters
of the brave though over-cautious nobleman
who held the chief command. The general was
mounted on his charger, with his leading-staff in
hand, attired in a suit of beautiful half armour, with
a broad scarf of orange crossing his cuirass, and a
feather of the like colour drooping from his morion.
The Earl of Bedford and Sir William Balfour were
beside him, likewise on horseback; and some half
dozen of his staff, with Colonels Hazlerig and
Hampden, stood around, dismounted. Essex, with
whom he had no personal acquaintance, looked full
upon him without a word or sign of salutation; but
Balfour, whom he knew, bowed slightly.
I bear, so please you, my good Lord of Essex,
the king-at-arms began, in nowise daunted by his
cold reception, I bear a gracious proclamation of
his majesty, Charles, by the grace of God
Hold, sir, cried Essex, in a sharp and angry
tone, hold, sirto whom bear you this message?
Speak out, sirand fall back, you loitering knaves!
back with you all! back out of earshot! as he
perceived the troopers of his body-guard crowding
a little forward, as if to mark what passed.
Charles, by the grace of God continued the
bold speaker, resuming, even where he had been
before cut short, the thread of his discourse.
To whomto whom, I say, bear you this
message? exclaimed Essex, in tones of fierce
excitement
,
the blood rushing in crimson to his brow.
To whom, save me, dare you bear any word?
Vol IT
To all, he answered, calmlyto all men
present here bear I his majesty's most merciful
Silence, audacious! thundered the general;
silence, if thou beest not aweary of thy life!
Knowest thou not, William le Neve, knowest thou
not that for this breach of every law of war and
nations I might cause thee hang?hang like a
dog upon the nearest tree, for all thy painted
mummery
!
Away with him, sir, he continued, after
a short pause, as if ashamed of his display of
violence
,
addressing the officer who had escorted him,
away with him!see him a hundred yards
beyond
our outposts; and if he do but breathe too
loudly, shoot him upon the instant. I do profess,
he added, turning again to the abashed and silent
messenger, I do profess to you, you have
incurred
a very fearful risk; but, that you may not lack
an answer, say to your master that we have drawn
our swords at bidding of the parliament, and in
behalf
of those ancestral liberties, which we will
either
transmit free and unfettered to our children,
or lose together with our lives!thou hast thine
answer.
And with even more precaution than he had
been admitted was he led back to join his
followers
by a stout squadron of the general's lifeguard,
who, halting at some twenty yards from the
confused
and trembling pursuivants, deliberately blew
their matches and levelled their short arquebuses!
Startled at this manuvre, it needed little, when
the officer informed them, That, an they were
not a full flight-shot on their route before three
minutes, he should fire a volley on them, to send
them at a furious gallop scattering towards the
king's array.
This was the last attempt; and, ere an hour
had elapsed, the guns and carriages of the king's
host were drawn off by the road to Edgecot, his
late quarters; and Essex, on beholding their
retreat
,
was no less willing to lead away toward
Warwick his wearied and disheartened army,
abandoning thereby to Charles the access to the
capitalwhich he had marched, and even risked a
battle, to defendwhenever he should choose to
profit by the errors of his enemy. Scarce had the
orders for this movement been delivered before a
trooper galloped up to Ardenne's post, gave him a
packet, and, without waiting a reply, dashed spurs
into his horse, and was already out of sight ere
Edgar had discerned its purport. It was a
mandate
from the general in council, directing him to
join his force to that of Colonel Cromwell, and
place himself at once at his disposal; and he had
hardly read it through when Oliver himself rode
up. You have received, he saidyou have
received already, as I see, those tidings which,
trusting that they may not be displeasing, and that
so you be not rendered an unwilling instrument in
this great cause, I have come hither to
communicate
.
I am detached forthwith to march with mine
own ironsides and with your gallant horse for
Cambridgethence to protect the safety of the
eastern countiesand verily I do rejoice, for my
soul sickeneth at coward councils; and, so long as
we tarry here, we be not like, I trow, to meet with
brave ones! Come with me, Edgar Ardenne, and
I tell thee that we can achieve great things for the
deliverance of this groaning landyea! and work
more for its regeneration, with our poor hundreds
and the Lord's hand, which of a very deed shall
smite on our sidefrail vessels though we be and
faithlessmore to advance the liberties of England,
than Essex with his tens of thousands!
CHAPTER III.
Not for my life! not though the hosts of heaven
Bend down their knees in suppliance at my feet,
And woo me to consent, shall one poor coin
Defile my palm of what is his by right
His heritagebequeathed i' the olden time
From honoured sire to son, and last to him,
Most honoured, who
should
heir it now, as free
As his great souland
shall
, by Heaven, for me!
It
was a sharp clear evening, some two months
later than the undecided action of Edgehill, while
both the armies were lying in their winter quarters
that of the king at Oxford, whither he had
immediately
retired after his treacherous violation of
the truce at Brentford, and consequent repulse
from London; that of the parliament in the
metropolis
and its vicinitywhen a small group,
composed
of individuals the most discordant both in
character and outward show, was gathered in the
oriel parlour of the old manor-house of Woodleigh,
affording to the eye a combination singular and
picturesque. Sir Henry Ardenne stood in the
centre
at the oaken table, on which a standish was
displayed of massy silver, with implements for
writing, and a long scroll of parchment, carefully
engrossed, and decked with several broad seals, to
which, as it would seem, he was preparing to affix
his signature. His figure, still erect and stately,
was clad in a rich military suit of buff, splendidly
laced with gold, booted, and spurred, and girt with
the long rapier of the day; his snow-white locks
hung down on either cheek, uncovered, for an
attendant
held in readiness for instant use his
high-crowned
beaver, with its drooping feather, and his
sad-coloured riding cloak. His noble features were
knit firmly with an evident expression of resolve,
although a teardrop might be seen to twinkle in his
dark eye as he looked down upon his niece,
grovelling
in the dust before him, prostrate, and
clinging
to his knees, with her rich hair in its
dishevelled
volumes half covering her lovely formwith
her hands clasped, her eyes uplifted to his face,
her lips apart but motionless, in agony of tearless
supplication. A hoary-headed servant watched, at
an easy distance, the development of the sad scene,
with every wrinkled feature telling of his
affectionate
concern; while a stout, stolid-looking yeoman,
summoned, it might be, to attest a signature,
lounged at his elbow, staring in rude indifference
on the display of passions with which his boorish
nature vainly sought to sympathize; a small man,
meanly clad in a black buckram doublet, with an
inkhorn and a penknife in lieu of weapons at his
girdle, of an expression impudently sly and
knavish
,
was the last person of the group within the
manor; but without, plainly to be discovered from
the casements, there was assembled a fair company
of horsemen, gayly equipped in the bright
fluttering
garb affected by the cavaliers, with the old
banner of the house of Ardenne unfurled and
streaming to the wintry wind, and a groom leading
to and fro the favourite charger of the head of that
high name.
No! no! cried Sibyl, in tones that quivered
with excitement till they were barely audible,
resisting
the slight force which the old man put forth
to raise herno! no! I will not rise. Here!
here at your feet will I remain till I prevail in my
entreaty! Oh, you were wont to be wise,
generous
,
and just! Temperate in your youth, as I
have heard them tell, and calmbe then yourself,
T 2
my noble uncle, be then once more yourself, nor
sully, by this deed of unconsidered rashness, a
whole long life of wisdom and of honour.
It may not be, he answered, quietly, though
not without an effort, as he compelled her to arise
it may not be. The time allotted to our race
hath now run out!the house of Ardenne is
extinct
with the old miserable man who stands
before
you!the lands that have been subject to my
name for centuries shall never know it more!
The Lord gavethe Lord hath taken away
blessed
be the name of the Lord! But wouldoh,
would to Heaven that
his
corpse had mouldered on
some foreign battle-fieldthat his bones had been
entombed deep in the caverns of the seathat he
had died by any death, how terrible soeverthat
he had dragged out any life, however wretched and
intolerable! Better, far better had it been so to
have mourned for him, than to have seen him thus
a blota single blot!on an unblemished name!
a traitor to his kinga foeman to his countrya
curse to him from whom he drew his being! No!
plead to me no more; for never, never shall a
traitor
a
fanatic and hypocrite traitorinherit aught
from me save the high name he hath disgraced.
I haveand I bless Heaven that I have itthrough
his own act of treason, the right to sunder this
entail
,
and sundered shall it be ere sunset! He hath
no corner of my heartno jot of mine affections;
himself he hath cut out his path, andrue it as he
mayby that path must he travel now unto the end
dishonouredoutcastdisinheritedaccur
Oh, no, no, no! she shrieked, in frantic tones,
drowning his utterance of a word so terrible when
coming from a parent's lips; curse him not!
curse him not! or never shall you taste of peace
again. Father, curse not your sonyou firstborn,
and your only! Sinner, curse not your fellow!
Christian, curse not a soul, whose hopes are thy
hopes also! Curse not, but pray!praynot for
your erring childbut for your rash and sinful
self! Pray, uncle, pray for penitence and
pardon
!
Affected somewhat by her words, but yet more
by the fearful energy of her demeanour than by
the tenour of her speech, Sir Henry pausedbut
not to doubt, much less to bend from his
revengeful
policy.
In so far, at the least, fair niecein so far, at
the least, he said, with a smile evidently forced
and painful, you have the right of it. 'Tis
neither
Christianlike to curse, nor manly. But to
this gear, good Master Sexby, he continued,
turning
to the lawyer, who had gazed with hardened
coldness on the affecting scene; this deed, you
tell me, is complete and firm in all the
technicalities
?
As strong as law can render it, Sir Henry,
returned the mean attorney, else know I nothing
of mine own profession. Since Master Ardenne,
being last of the entail, and now declared a traitor
by proclamation of his majesty at Oxford, could
scarce inherit, even without this deed of settlement
on Mistress Sibyl and her heirs
Never! she answered, in a calm, low voice,
the more peculiar from its contrast to the fiery
vehemence
she had before displayed; never would
I receive the smallest share, the least particular of
that which is another'sthat other Edgar
Ardenne
,
too!though I should perish of starvation
never! And heirswhat tell ye
me
of heirs?
Think ye that
I
I, the affianced bride of such a
manwould deign to cast myself away on his
inferior
?
No, no! your testament is nothing worth.
Heirless will I die, or die the wife of Ardenne!
What, then, avail your crafts and subtleties of law?
I spurn their false and fickle toils before me, as
the free hawk would rive asunder with his
unfettered
wing the trammels of the spider's web!
Peace! for your fame's sake, peace!
degenerate
girl, the old man sternly answered; would
you disclose to these your miserable weakness
To these? To every dweller of the universal
earth would I avow the strengththe constancy
the immortality of my legitimate and hallowed
love! Affianced in my youth, by thee affianced,
to one whom both my reason and my heart prefer,
why should I shrink to own it! Weakness?I
tell you, uncle, that I am no whit less strongnay,
ten times stronger than yourselfin faith, in
loyalty
,
in conscience, in resolve. If I may not
approve
his actionsand of a truth I do notI may
not but revere his motives! and if those actions
must half sever the strong links that join us, and
render me for very conscience' sake a widowed
maiden, his motives, pure, and sincere, and fervent
as an angel's faith, shall at the least forbid me to
misjudge, much more to wrong him. Weakness?
I tell you I adore himadore him even more
for this his constancy to what
he
deems the better
cause, when every fibre of his heart is tugging him
to the otherwhen loss of name, and fame, and
fortune must be the guerdon of his unflinching and
severe devotion to a mistaken creed! Yet, deeply,
singly as I love him, never will I wed Edgar
Ardenne
while he unsheaths a rebel blade or prompts
a rebel council. I tell you I adore him, yet will I
die a maiden! unless and she paused, for a
space, in her most eloquent appeal, as if to mark
what influence it might have had upon the mind of
her stern relativeunless, by this your madness,
you drive me to do that my conscience shrinks from.
Suffer your broad lands to descend to him who
justly heirs them, and rest assured that sooner will
I die than marry with a rebel! Leave them to me
as in the madness of your passion you propose
leave them to me, and instantly will I make
restitution
to the rightful owner, if by no other means,
at least by sacrifice of mine own conscience
mine own person!
Go to!you will
not
, Sibyl! exclaimed the
old man, vehemently; I know you better than
you know yourselfyou would not do so, were
things a thousand times more precious than these
miserable lands dependant on your action!
And wherefore not? she cried; have I not,
at the dictates of my conscience, cast from me the
affections of the warmest and the highest heart that
ever beat for woman? Have I not sacrificed unto
my sense of loyaltya sense, perchance, fantastic
or mistakenmy every hope of happiness on earth?
And wherefore shall I not obey the voice of the
same counsellor, and to a sacrifice less grievous?
Think you the love of a justice is a less eloquent
or weaker advocate than the mere love of kings?
But, since you may not be convinced by argument,
nor won by any pleading, hear me then swear, and
hear me
Thou
, she added, solemnly turning
upward
her bright eyes, flashing with strong
excitement
,
and dilated far beyond their wonted size
that sittest on the wings of cherubimThou that
hast no regard for kings, nor any trust in princes,
receive my vow! She paused an instant as if to
recollect her energies, and as she paused a deep
voice broke the silence
Swear not, my gentle cousin, said the slow,
harmonious voice; and, above all, swear not for
me!
Instantly every eye was turned in the direction
whence sounded those unusual accents; and in the
sight of all, upon the threshold of the open door,
there stood a tall and stately figure, wrapped in a
horseman's cloak of some dark colour, and wearing
a slouched hat and falling plume, which veiled
effectually
,
in that dim, uncertain light, the features of the
speaker; but their concealment mattered not, for
every heart at once, and, as it were, instinctively,
knew Edgar Ardenne, whose arrival, with the
slight bustle that accompanied it, had passed
unnoticed
during the all-engrossing interest of the
scene in which those present were engaged.
Swear not in my behalf, dear Sibyl, he
continued
,
doffing his high-crowned beaver, and
displaying
his fine lineaments, haggard and pale from
violent emotion, nor, if you love me, thwart my
father's will. In good time, I perceive, have I
come hither, since something of your purpose
reached my ears ere you beheld my presence
And wherefore, his father fiercely
interrupted
him, laying his hand upon his rapier's hilt
wherefore have you presumed, traitor and villain,
thus to defile these honourable halls with the
pollution
of your footstep? Have you come sword in
hand, leading your canting and psalm-singing
hypocrites
,
to spoil, and slay, and lead into captivity?
or have you come, forsooth, with oily words and a
God-fearing countenance, to preach to the old man
the error of his ways, that he too may unsheath the
sword of Gideon, and go down with the chosen of
the Lord to strive against the Philistines in Gilgal!
Such is the style of your new comrades, and thou
canst mouth it with the best of them, I warrant
me! Canst thou not preach and pray? canst
thou not quote the Scriptures of the Lord to justify
the doings of the devil?
For none of these things have I come, my
father, he replied, in sad and humble tones,
sinking
upon his knee, nor yet for anything that may
offend or grieve you. Hear me, I do beseech
you; for, by the angry gesture of Sir Henry, he
perceived that his speech was like to be cut short
hear me but for a short while, and I will cease
to pain you with my presence.
Be it, then, for a short while, answered the
other, nothing mollified by the calm patience of his
son, if be it must at allas I suppose it
must
, for
I can well believe that you have some five hundred
fighting men of the saints to back you, else had
you never ventured hither. Let it be for a short
while, sirrah, for even now I look to see the
roof-tree
of my father's house topple and crush the
wretch that has brought infamy on all it shelters!
Not a soldiernot a followernot a groom,
said Edgar, sorrowfully risingthough I look
not that you will credit me, is with me, nor yet
within ten miles of Woodleigh. Alone I have
come hither, once more to say adieu, and crave
what I have nothing done to forfeita father's
blessing!
'Tis well, Sir Henry interrupted him in a
cold strain of the most cutting irony ere he had fully
ended, excellent well, indeed! So get you on with
what you have to
say
, as I in turn will presently
do
somewhat. Anthony, get you hence and fetch
us lights; it hath grown dark betimes; and you,
good Master Hughson, he continued, turning
toward
the yeoman, will wait our leisure in the
buttery
.
Now!get you on, son Edgar.
I did hope, sadly replied the partisan, that
your resentment, sir, had in so far abated that you
might have endured without disgust my passing
visit. To offer you the reasons for my conduct
were, in your present mood, I fear, of no avail:
suffice it, therefore, to inform you that, though I
may lose much, I can gain nothing by the part I
have espousedthat neither power, nor place, nor
bribe of woman's love, nor proffered rank, nor yet
the baser meed of gold, hath tempted methat
neither
gift nor guerdon will recompense my service,
nor aught else save the inward quiet of an innocent
heart, and the most high approval of
Him
who can
alone interpret it. But of this enough. This deed,
if I mistake not, which now but waits your
signature
,
is destined to deprive me of my heritage.
My father, as the last save me in the entail, and I
proclaimed a traitor, he continued, turning toward
the lawyer, hath, as you deem it, the power to
alienate this property. Hold! interrupt me not;
it may be that he hathprovided always that the
party which proclaimed me traitor shall come off
victorious in the end, and masters! If not, your
deed is nothing. But think notand he turned
again toward his fatherthink not, I do beseech
you, sir, that I would for one moment condescend
so to inherit what you would not that I should
possess
.
Annul this futile deed, and I, the last in tail,
will join with you to sever that entail for ever!
Let this man execute the papers, and, whensoever
needed, my signature shall be forthcoming! So,
whether king or commons win the day, shall you
be sole disposer of your broad possessions. The
son whom you abhor would freely barter all for one
short word of kindnessfor one last blessing from
a father, at whose command how gladly would he
sacrifice all save his conscience and his honour!
I take you at your proffer, rejoined the baronet,
without one symptom of relenting in his hard eye
without one sign of soft or kind emotion at the
devoted generosity of his discarded son; base
knaves although they be with whom you have
descended
to consort, I can rejoice you have not lost
all
your nobility of soul. I take you at your
proffer
.
Affix your signature and seal to this blank
parchmentfor it may well be we shall never
meet againand here I pledge to you my knightly
word of honour that it shall be applied as you
have said, and to no other end.
A large tear stood on either cheek of Edgar as,
with a steady hand, and firm though darkened
countenance, he signed his name in bold, free
characters
,
and so surrendered for himself and for his
heirs the title to that noble patrimony which for
so many ages had been graced by the high virtues
of his ancestry. But the tear flowed not, nor was
the brow o'ercast for any selfish thoughtby any
sorrow for the wealth thus forfeitedby any fond
regret
for the old home of happier days thus lost for
ever. At other times such feelings would have,
perhaps, been busy at his heartwould have,
perhaps
,
excluded every other sentiment; but now it
was the coldness of the father's tone, the stern and
firm resolve of hatred which had possessed the
father's
heart, that clouded the broad forehead of the
son and dimmed his eye. Quietly he replaced the
pen upon the standish, and once more sinking on
his knee, Father, he said, in faltering and husky
tones, I never yet, save in this one respect, have
disobeyed or grieved you; your blessing, oh my
father!
My blessing to a rebelto a hypocritea
traitor!not though my life should pay for my
refusal
!
thundered the pitiless old cavalier. Be
grateful that I curse you notbe grateful, not to
me, but to yon pale and suffering angel, whom
your false villany hath blighted, for she alone
with-holds
it. Begone!why tarry you? Begone, and
Vol. I.U
never let me look upon you more! Begone, an
outcast from my heart for ever!
For a minute's space he stood, fixed as the
eldest-born
of Niobe, pierced by the arrow of the
vengeful godpale, motionless, and voiceless!
the wretched girl had sunk, at the last fearful words,
mercifully deprived, for a short space, of sentiment
and reason; his father stood between them, with
flashing eyes and arms extended, as if he wanted
but a pretext to launch upon his head the awful
terrors of a paternal curse. It was but for a
minute
that he stood doubtful and unresolved; his
pulse beat hurriedly, his sinews quivered, his lip
paled with anguishyet in one little minute was
the paroxysm ended. Bless you, my father, bless
you! he exclaimed, in piteous and heartrending
tones; may the great Ruler of the universe
protect
and bless you! Oh, may
you
never know the
anguish you have this day heaped, fiercer than the
coals of fire, on the heart of a despairing child!
Farewellfarewell!
He turned, and, ere a word could be pronounced
a motion made to intercept him, vanished into
the darkness of the hall. Then, and not till then,
did the hot anger of the old man's heart relent;
Edgar, he gasped, in faint and faltering tones,
my boymy boy! but so low was the
intonation
of his voice that it reached not the ears of
him who would have welcomed those half-uttered
words even as a voice from heaven. The aged
servant, who had watched the scene in silent
agony
,
sprang forth as to recall himbut again it
was too late! The angry clatter of his horse's hoofs
upon the pavement of the court alone announced
the keenness of the goad that rankled in the bosom
of the rider; and ere an effort could be made to
overtake his flight, the demon pride had once more
gained ascendency, and with a darker frown and
colder accents than before, Sir Henry now
forbade
all further careconsigned his hapless niece
to her attendantsgave brief directions to the
lawyer
for the fulfilment of his cruel policymounted
his horse, and rode away, self-satisfied and stern,
through the chill darkness of the wintry night, to
join the king at Oxford ere he should raise the
standard for his second sad campaign.
CHAPTER IV.
Flourish'd the trumpets fierce, and now
Fired was each eye and flush'd each brow.
On either side loud clamours ring
`God and the cause'`God and the king'
Right English all, they rush'd to blows
With naught to win and all to lose.
I could have laugh'dbut lack'd the time
To see, in phrenesy sublime,
How the fierce zealots fought and bled
For king or state, as humour led.
Scott
's
Rokeby
.
The
winter had already passed away, and with
it every hope of present reconciliation between the
monarch and his parliament. Early in March the
royal hosts were in the field, one in the western
counties, commanded by the king in person, and
the most dashing of his generals, impetuous
Rupert
another
in the north, under the gallant
Newcastle
,
the noblest gentleman and most
accomplished
soldier who fought beneath the banners of
his sovereign. During the first months of the year
the tide of fortune had flowed constantly in favour
of the cavaliers. In March, a desperate action,
fought upon Hopton Heath, near Stafford, had made
small compensation to the parliament, by the death
of brave Northampton, for the defeat of Gell and
Brereton. Rupert had taken Cirencester, treating
his captives with unmanly and relentless cruelty;
and, shortly afterward, in the same sort had
captured
and half burnt the flourishing and wealthy
town of Birmingham. Nor had the occupation of
Reading by the Earl of Essex brought anything
except disaster and disease upon its captors. A
dangerous conspiracy had broken out among the
puritans, and, though suppressed and punished by
the deaths of the two Hothams, Challoner, and
Tompkins, had yet led many to believe that seeds
of discord were already sown among the democratic
party, which would ere long destroy their
unanimity
for ever. A heavier and more fatal loss
befellnot his own party merely, but the whole
realm of England, in the untimely death of
Hampden
,
mortally wounded in a trivial skirmish upon
Chalgrove field in Buckingham; he died, as he
had lived, a patriota martyr to the cause of
freedom
his
last breath, ere he rendered up his spirit
to his Maker, expended in a prayer for his
oppressed
and bleeding country. Nor had the
partisans
of liberty fared much more hopefully in the
North; Sir Thomas Fairfax, after a short but
unsuccessful
stand against the Marquis of Newcastle
on Atherton Moor, was compelled to retreat before
his victors, who pressed on with much energy and
vigour to recover Gainsborough, which had been
stormed and garrisoned by the Lord Willoughby
upon the parliament's behalf. In this important
aim they scarcely could have failed, had not the
leader of the ironsides with his brave cavalry,
augmented
in their numbers to full two thousand men
by Ardenne's junctionhaving already greatly
signalized
himself by the defeat of a superior force of
royalists before the walls of Grantham, and by the
storm of Burleigh house and Stamfordgallantly
interposed between the town and Newcastle's
advance
.
The enemy, amounting to above three
times his number, under Lieutenant-general
Cavendish
,
the brother of the marquis, flushed with
their late successcomposed of picked men for
the most, and officered by gentlemen of equal
gallantry
and rank  and animated by the highest
spirit of loyal bravery  had occupied a station
so commanding that they could only be assailed
by passing through a gateway, and charging up a
steep acclivity. Yet not for this did Cromwell
hesitate an instant; but, personally leading on his
troopers, he resolutely rushed upon them, and, after
a brisk conflict, routed them utterly, forcing them
from their position into a deep morass, and killing
Cavendish, with most of their superior officers.
Burning for vengeance, the main body of the
royalists
,
neglecting Gainsborough, pushed on, and
with such overwhelming numbers that Cromwell
was compelled to fall back first on Lincoln, and
thence immediately on Boston, uniting there his
forces with the army of the Earl of Manchester,
whom he had been appointed with all speed to
re-enforce
,
as second in command to that stanch
nobleman
.
Upon this point Newcastle marched,
eager for battle, and desirous to engage, before the
host of Manchester should be increased by new
accessions
,
which, as he learned, were swelling day
by day his ranks; having detached Sir John
Henderson
,
an old and well-proved soldier, in advance, with
eighty-seven troops, horse and dragoons, to seek
out Cromwell, and bring him, ere the earl could
aid him with his infantry, to action at a
disadvantage
.
It was a glorious morning in the latter part of
U 2
June, and at an hour so early that the heavy dews
of summer were yet hanging unexhaled on wold
and woodland, although the sun had lifted his broad
disk above the horizon, when the two armies
came in view on Winsley field, near Horncastle.
It was a gallant and a graceful spectacle as ever
met the eye of man. The scene a broad and
waving tract of moorish meadow land, checkered
with many a patch of feathery coppicebirch, ash,
and aldertufts of furze full of its golden bloom,
and waving fernand here and there a bare gray
rock peering above the soil, or a clear pool of
water reflecting the white clouds that hung aloft
all motionless in the blue firmamentand over
this romantic champaign a magnificent array of
horse, four thousand at the least in numbers,
contracting
or extending their bright squadrons, now
falling into column and now deploying into line,
as best they might among the obstacles of this
their battle-ground  their polished armour and
their many-coloured scarfs now flashing out
superbly
as the sunshine kissed their masses with its
golden light, now sobered into mellower hues as
some great cloud would flit across the sky and
cast its sweeping shadow over themtheir
trumpets
ever and anon waking the echoes of the
woodlands
that surrounded them on every side with
their exulting notes, and their gay standards
fluttering
in the breezetheir gallant chargers,
arching
their necks against the curb, bounding and
curvetting
along as if they panted for the onsetwhile
toward the eastern limits of the plain, upon a
gentle
elevation, flanked on the one side by the gully
of a deep and stony brook, and on the other by a
coppice, tangled with ancient thorns, and matted
with wild rose briers, which protected likewise the
whole rear of his position, Cromwell had formed
his line. Nor, though inferior far in numbers, and
lacking all that chivalrous and splendid decoration
which their floating plumes and gorgeous dresses
lent to the cavaliers, could his dark squadrons have
been looked upon without attentionay, and
admiration
also, by the most unromantic of observers.
The admirable discipline and perfect armature of
the stern zealots who composed the ranksthe
plain, but soldierly and bright accoutrementsthe
horses, superior even to the chargers of the
royalists
in blood, and bone, and beauty, and, above all,
in that precise and jealous grooming, without which
all the rest are little worththe grim and stubborn
countenances of the riderssome animated with a
fiery zeal that would have smiled exultingly upon
the stake of martyrdom, some lowering with a dark
and sullen scowl, but all severe, and resolute, and
dauntless! A single glance sufficed to tell that
every battle-field to them must be a triumph or a
grave!
Silent they stood and motionlesstheir long
array
drawn up, two deep, by squadrons at brief
intervals
solemn
and voiceless, presenting a strange
contrast to the shifting movements and the intricate
manuvres of their approaching enemy. Not a
man moved in his saddle, not a sound broke the
quiet of their discipline, save now and then the
stamp and neigh of an unruly charger, or the sharp
clatter of his steel caparison. And now the
cavaliers
,
within a short mile's distance, having already
cleared the broken ground, might be seen halting
on the farther verge of the smooth space which
swept away toward them in a gentle slope,
unmarred
by bush, or brake, or obstacle of any kind
to the career of the most timid rider; when, with
some three or four of his most trusty captains,
Cromwell advanced before his lines. Of stout,
ungainly stature when dismounted, none showed
to more advantage on his warhorse, and in full
caparison
of battle, than did the colonel of the
ironsides
.
It was not that his seat was graceful, or
that he ruled his charger with the ease of the man
ge, but that he swayed him with an absolute
dominion
,
which seemed to arise rather from his mere
volition than from the exercise of strength or skill.
His whole soul seemed engrossed by the
approaching
conflictcareless of self, exalted, and
enthusiastical
.
His eyes flashed with a brightness
almost
supernatural from the dark shadow of his
morion, and his whole visage wore an aspect so
irradiate
with energy and mind, that Edgar
wondered
how he ever could have deemed him ill-favoured
or ungraceful. His horse, a superb black, bore
him as if he too were conscious of Divine
authority
;
and such was the commanding greatness of
his whole appearance, that no human eye could
have descended to remark the plainness of his
war-array
!
Of the small group of officers who rode
beside the bridle of their leader, the most were
ordinary
looking men, burghers of Huntingdon, or
small esquires of the surrounding country, selected
for the stations which they occupied, by the wise
politician who had levied them, on account of those
morose and gloomy tenets which, with an early
prescience, he discovered to be the only power that
might cope with the high spirit of the gentlemen
who formed the bulk of their antagonistsmen
who affected, or imagined visions and transports
who believed themselves predestined instruments,
and deemed that in the slaying of malignants they
were doing an especial service to the God whose
chosen servants they declared themselves, with a
faith in the truth of the assertion which rendered
them almost invincible. Among these plain and
heavy-looking soldiers, the form of Ardenne,
highborn
,
and full of the intuitive and untaught grace
of noble blood, gallantly armed and handsomely
attired
for
he was not one of those who fancied that
the approbation of Heaven could be won by a rusty
corslet or an ill-blacked bootmounted on a dark
chestnut, thoroughbred, yet powerful enough to bear
a man-at-arms fully accoutred through the longest
day, showed like a glorious falcon among a tribe of
buzzards; yet even he, handsome, and young, and
fairly clad, filled not the eye like the majestic
person
of his colonel. At a quick trot they swept
along the lines, inspecting their array, with now a
word of commendation, and now a short reproof, to
the dark fanatics who had been chosen
lance-pesades
or sergeants for their savage and enthusiastic
humour. Just as they finished their career, a long
and cheery shout, accompanied and blended with
the clang of kettle-drums and the shrill flourish of
their trumpets, burst from the columns of the
cavaliers
,
now wheeling into line and eager for the onset.
No shout or burst of instruments replied from the
parliamentarians; but their leader, at the sound,
checking his charger from his speed till he reared
bolt upright, threw forth his arm with a proud
gesture
of defiance; Brethren, he called aloud, in
accents harsh but clearly audible, and thrilling to
the heartBrethren and fellow-soldiers in the
Lord, the men of Belial are before youthe
persecutors
of the saintsthe spillers of the innocent
bloodgodless and desperate!slayers of babes
and sucklingsravishers of maids and matrons
revilers of the prophets and the lawaccursed of
the Lord Jehovah! Wherefore, faint not, nor be
of feeble heart, for surely on this day shall the
Lord yield them up into your hands, that ye may
work his vengeance on their heads, and execute his
judgments. For said he not of old, `Lo! I will
tread them in my anger, and trample them in my
fury; and their blood shall be sprinkled upon my
garments, and I will stain all my raiment. For the
day of vengeance is in my heart, and the year of
my redeemed is come!' So saith the Lord of
Hosts. Amen! amen! Selah!
And, with a deep and sullen hum, the puritans
took up the wordsSo saith the Lord of Hosts.
Amen! amen! Selah!
And are not we, continued the fierce zealot,
with increasing energyand are not weblinded
although we be, and ignorant and sinfulI ask ye,
brethren, are not we the chosen of the Lord, and
shall we not obey his bidding? Smite them, then
smite the idolatrous, besotted followers of the
old Antichrist, even as just Elijah slew the priests
of Baal down at the brook of Kishon. Be strong,
and fear ye not! For lo! the Lord hath said, `Ye
shall not suffer one of them to live!' and who are
we that we should now gainsay the bidding of the
Lord, even the Lord of Hosts? Lift up your
voices, then, that yon malignants may perceive in
whom we put our trust.
Again, and in a sterner and more heartfelt shout,
the approbation of the puritans greeted their
leader's ears; and as he ceased, with brandished
blades and inflamed features, and with voices that
drowned utterly the feebler music of the cavaliers,
already confident of victory and maddened with
religious
zeal, they thundered forth their favourite
hymn.
What saith the God of battles, the mighty Lord of Hosts?
Ye shall prevail against them, though loud their godless boasts!
Ye shall destroy them utterly, and root them from the land,
For I will give ye strength, and edge your battle brand!
`At the rebuke of one shall mighty thousands fly,
For I have heard my people's prayer, their sad and grievous cry!
And I will raise my glorious voice, that it be heard afar,
And show the lightning of my handmy right handin the war.
`Wo unto them that put their trust in the Egyptian's crown
His chariots and his horsemenhis power and his renown!
The Egyptian he is mannot Godin whom they put their trust;
His horses are not spiritbut frail and fleeting dust!
`When I stretch out my hand, together they shall fall,
The helper and the holpenyea! they shall perish all!
Of old ordain'd was Tophet; for the king it was made hot,
As thorns that in the furnace blaze, or briers beneath the pot!
`But yeye are my peoplethe ransom'd of my soul!
Glory shall be your heritage, Jerusalem your goal!
And the sceptre shall not leave ye, and the crown shall not depart
From the faithful house of Judahfrom the chosen of my heart!'
The fierce strains ceased, and a loud acclamation
followed them, solemnly breathing a sublime, yet
savage spirit of defiance, and was responded to
immediately
by the huzzahs of the advancing
cavaliers
,
and the rich symphonies of horn and
kettledrum
.
A small reserve of some five hundred men
was posted in the rear, and, in one mighty line, the
rest swept forward at a brisk trot, the front rank
with their carbines all unslung and matches
lighted
.
Cromwell gazed steadfastly upon them for an
instantthen his eye lightened and his lip curled
scornfully as he addressed his second in command.
Lieutenant-colonel Ardenne, he exclaimed,
dismount
two hundred of our best dragooners, and,
under Fight-the-good-fight Egerton, let them file
down that gulley to our left, and fire constantly on
the advance of these misproud malignants.
Without
a moment's pause the order was transmitted
and obeyed, and, ere five minutes had elapsed, the
party was detached and scrambling down the rocky
bed of the ravine, unnoted by the royalists, under
the guidance of as morose and bold a puritan as
ever levelled musket or misquoted holy writ. Sir
Edmund Winthrop, Oliver continued, your stout
lieutenant, shall hold your regiment, as our reserve,
here on this ground of vantagebut shall not stir
from it unless at your command or mine. We will
not tarry for their charge, but meet them horse to
horsein onset of alternate squadrons. I lead the
first division, you shall support me with the second.
When you shall hear my bugle sound a recall and
rally, then strike in, and the Lord strike with you.
`Truth' is our word and `Peace.' Amen! Selah!
Even as he spoke, the royalists gave fire from
their first rank, but at too great a distance to do
execution, and halted to reload. Steady, men!
shouted Cromwell, whose sword was not yet drawn,
from the extreme left, as he perceived a
demonstration
of anxiety to charge among his troopers
steady, men; let them come nigher, and when
they fire again, shoot also ye, upon their flash,
through your whole line; and instantly, alternate
squadrons from the left, charge on them ere they
may reload!
Scarce had he ended ere the line again advanced
on a hard trot; a single shot rang from the gulley,
broken and fringed with thorns and alder-bushes
another, and anothera rapid and continuous fire of
skirmishers, picking off half a score of officers, and
throwing the right wing of the royalists into some
slight confusion; on, however, they still came, their
banners rustling, and their gay plumes and baldrics
fluttering in the wind, while, trusting to make such
impression on the main host of the puritans as
should cause their ambuscade to be of no effect,
they hurried to the onset. On they came, resolute
and dauntless! Their bugle sounded, for the gallop
for the charge! and, at the latter call, again the
levelled carbines rose to the riders' cheeksa
bright flash ran along their line, and a dense veil
of smoke covered their orderly and brilliant front.
Before it cleared away, the shattering volley of the
puritans, poured in with a deliberate aim, made
fearful havoc in their ranks, and on the instant,
casting aside their matchlocks and whirling their
long rapiers from the scabbards, one half the
squadrons
of the parliament hurled themselves furiously
upon the advancing foe. Eagerly, anxiously did
Edgar gaze upon the charge. On went the
colonel
of the ironsides, six horses' lengths in front of
his division, and all as gallantly out dashed a leader
of the king's to meet himthey met, and it was but
an instant ere the charger of the royalist ran
masterless
,
and its unhappy owner rolled, weltering in
his blood, beneath the trampling hoofs of the fierce
puritans. There was no falteringno doubt in
either lineforward they rushed, all straining to
the charge, their horses foaming and struggling
against the bit, and their swords flashing in the
sunlight
.
Edgar unsheathed his rapier, for now a
horse's length scarce intervened; yet neither host
had paused or turned aside. And now they were
encountering, when the rear rank of the cavaliers
threw in with desperate execution their reserved
volley, shaking the line of the parliamentarians like
an earthquake, emptying scores of saddles, and
hurling riders and horses headlong to the earth.
The smoky curtain once again swept over them;
it cleared away, and Ardenne saw his
fellow-troopers
,
unbroken and in close array, so orderly had
they closed in above the falling, now mingled hand
to hand, and fighting with the cavaliers, whose
front was bending like a bowthe points, on which
the troops of Oliver had charged, beat backward a
full pistol-shot, and the alternate squadrons which
had met no foe wavering and undecided what to
do. Sword cuts were glancing through the air on
helm and corsletpistol-shots flashed among the
mele; and the shouts, God and the church
Vol. I.X
God and the king, blended with groans, and
yells, and curses, and the clash of blades, and the
wild blast of trumpets, pealed dissonantly to the
sky. Still Cromwell's bugle sounded not, nor
were his men drawn off; and Ardenne paused in
doubt. His eye fell suddenly upon the form of
Oliver fighting among the foremost; another volley
from a small knot of cavaliers, and he fellhorse
and manand the strife closed more fiercely round
him; at the same instant the reserve of Henderson
moved up to re-enforce his battle. Then Edgar
paused no longerForward! he shouted, in a
voice of thunderforwardcharge home! and
dashing down the grassy slope, before a minute
passed burst like a thunderbolt upon the
unengaged
divisions of the enemy, and, killing two men
with his own hand, drove them in terrible
confusion
,
by the fury of his onset, back on their own
reserve
.
Turning his eye, now he had gained a
moment's
leisure, toward the spot where he had seen
his colonel fall, he caught a glimpse of him on foot,
fighting with desperate courage against some six or
seven horsemen, who were hewing at him all
together
with their long broadswords, and hindering
each other by their own impetuosity. Three strokes
of his good sword, and the superb exertions of his
charger, placed him at Cromwell's side just as he
fell to the earth, stunned but unwounded by a heavy
blow. One of the cavaliers received the point of
Edgar's rapier in his throat before he checked his
horse; the others were engaged and beaten
backward
by the foremost of his troopers. Hastily
springing to the ground as Oliver regained his feet,
Mount, he exclaimed, mount, Colonel
Cromwell
,
on my horse, and finish what so well you have
begun!
Without a word the zealot leaped to the saddle,
cast his eyes with a quick comprehensive glance
around him, and read the fortunes of the day upon
the instant.
They are half beaten now, he shouted, in
exulting
tones; one charge more, and we sweep
them like dust before the winds of heaven! Away,
sirdown with the reserve, and fall upon their left
flank. I will draw off my men, and, ere you be
in action, will be prepared to give it them again in
front. Ho! bugler, he continued, as Ardenne,
mounting his brown mare, which his equerry had
led up, galloped off swiftly to the rearho!
bugler
,
sound me a recall and rally! The shrill
notes of the instrument rang aloud above the din
of battle; and with that strict obedience for which
they had already gained repute, the ironsides drew
off from the encounter orderly, and beautifully
formed again, before the shattered and disordered
masses of the cavaliers had fallen into any
semblance
of array. In the mean time Ardenne had
reached his regiment, the men burning to emulate
the glory half achieved by their companions, the
horses pawing the turf, and snorting with
impatience
.
A loud shout greeted him as he addressed
them, in a few words terse and full of fire, formed
them by troops in open column, and advanced
between
the coppice on his right and the extreme
left of the enemy, now near a quarter of a mile
pushed forward beyond their right and centre,
which had been most disordered by the fire of the
skirmishers and Cromwell's furious charge. So
great, indeed, was the confusion of the royalists,
their officers toiling along the ranks, labouring with
oaths, and menaces, and exhortations to rally and
reform the men, that they perceived not Ardenne's
movement till he was wheeling into line to the left
previous to charging them. Then, when it was
too late, they struggled to redeem their error nobly
but fruitlessly; for, ere they could show front
against him, the trumpets soundedOliver's in
front, and Edgar's on the flankand simultaneously
they were charged, broken, and dispersed. The
action was already overbut the rout, the flight,
the havoc, the despair, the hideous,
indiscriminating
massacre, urged to the utmost by religious
fury and political rancour, ceased not till noon;
when Cromwell's bugles, slowly and most
reluctantly
obeyed, called back the men, their weapons
blunted and their arms aweary, but their hearts
insatiate
of carnage, from the hard-pressed pursuit.
CHAPTER V.
Upon the bloody field
The eddying tides of conflict wheel'd
Ambiguous, till that heart of flame,
Hot Rupert, on our squadrons came,
Hurling against our spears a line
Of gallants fiery as their wine;
Then ours, though stubborn in their zeal,
In zeal's despite began to reel.
Brave Cromwell turn'd the doubtful tide,
And conquest bless'd the rightful side.
Scott's
Rokeby
.
Though
but of brief duration and trifling
magnitude
as to the number of the troops engaged on
either hand, yet was the victory of Cromwell upon
Winsley field of vast importance, when considered
in its bearings on the general aspect of the war;
since by it only was the Marquis of Newcastle
prevented from co-operating with the royal forces
in the West, when, elevated as they were in spirit
by the defeat of Waller upon Roundway Down,
and the disgraceful fall of Bristol, they might too
probably have marched triumphantly to the
metropolis
,
had they been re-enforced, as they expected,
by the northern chivalry. In consequence of this
repulse, then, Newcastle sat down before the walls
of Hull, while Charles, thus disappointed in his
schemes, as fatally laid siege to Gloucester, which
he was soon compelled to raise by the activity of
Essex. The desperate drawn battle before
Newbury
ensued, signal for nothing but the death of the
good Falkland, the only counsellor that now
remained
about the king who could be deemed a
patriot or a true lover of the English constitution.
The Hampden of the royalists, this gallant
nobleman
fell with his country's name the last sound on
his lips; but fell not till he had become aweary of
a life which was imbittered so by the disasters of
his native land, that he was wont to sink, even
when circled by the gayest of his friends, into
desponding
apathy, and to ingeminate, after deep
silence
and continual sighs, with a shrill sad
accent
,
the words `Peacepeace!' The winter
which succeeded was by the cavaliers spun out in
feuds, dissensions, and intrigues among themselves,
the king remaining obstinately bent on
prostrating
all opposition to his will, and countenancing
such alone of his advisers as urged the fiercest and
most downright measures. Not so the parliament
at Westminster, in which the independent party
were, by the death of Hampden first, and afterward
of Pym, gaining an ascendency which was
increasing
daily through the abilities of Cromwell, St.
John, and the younger Vane, the leading
politicians
and debaters of the lower house. The
energy
and deep-laid shrewdness of these men
suffered
not one false step, however trivial, on the
part of Charles, to pass unnoted or unimproved to
their advantage; and, ere the spring was far enough
advanced for the commencement of a third
campaign
,
they had so thoroughly aroused the spirit of
the land, inflamed already by the king's impolitic
and shameful treaty with the rebellious Catholics
of Ireland, that, early in the month of March, five
several armies were on foot! Essex preparing to
oppose the king in personWaller commanding in
the Westthe Scotch, who had invaded England
in accordance with the solemn league and
covenant
,
and Fairfax, with his Yorkshire levies, shutting
up Newcastle in Yorkand Manchester, with
Cromwell's cavalry, hurrying from the associated
counties of the East toward the same important
point.
And now, for the first time since the
commencement
of the war, did fortune show herself in favour
of the liberal party; the total and complete
annihilation
of Lord Hopton's force at Alresford by
Waller, was in itself sufficient to compel even
Charles to give up all attempt at a campaign on
the offensive. Nor was this all; for Newcastle's
express advised him that he must surrender unless
succoured in the brief space of three weeks. It
was on this intelligence that Rupert, having
achieved much reputation and some eminent
successes
in that large county, marched out of
Lancashire
with all the flower of the royalistsdrawn
from the midland counties, burning with gallant
ardour, confident in their successful leader,
appointed
with a noble train of ordnance, and
re-enforced
by Goring's excellent brigade of horse
from Lincolnshirehastening ably, and no less
fortunately
,
to the relief of York, reduced already to
extremity, and on the point of yielding to the
parliament
.
During the dark and melancholy winter
which had thus elapsed, Ardenne, in close
attendance
on his duties, whether civil in the house at
Westminster, or active in the field, had struggled,
with more of steadiness than of success, to banish
from his heart the recollection of his own depressed
and wellnigh hopeless circumstances. Of his
implacable
and stubborn father he had heard but little
since their last interview at Woodleigh, save that a
copy of the document for the securing the estates
to Sibyl and breaking the entail had been
transmitted
to him for inspection; and that a rumour,
as it proved well founded, had reached London
that the old baronet, having been strenuous and
incessant
in stimulating warlike measures, had left
Oxford in the dead of winter, dismantled his fine
residence, and thrown himself, together with his
niece, into the capital of Yorkshire, some short
time only ere it was invested by the united troops
of Fairfax and the Earl of Leven. Such was the
state of matters when, on a lovely evening of July,
some few days after the strong succours under
Manchester and Cromwell had joined the northern
army, Edgar returned from a reconnaissance which
he had been sent, in consequence of rumours that
the cavaliers had been observed in force toward the
neighbouring towns of Wetherby and Bramham,
to execute, with his whole regiment, in that
direction
.
During the two days which had been
consumed
in scouring thoroughly that district of the
country, he had discovered nothing to justify, in
any sort, the vague reports which had prevailed
ere his departure from the camp; and it was
therefore
much to his amazement that he perceived the
forces of the parliament drawing off from the siege
in no small hurry and confusion, and forming line
of battle upon Marston Moor, some eight miles to
the westward of the city. It was not without
strenuous exertion that Ardenne found at length
the post assigned to his immediate superior, now
lieutenant-general of the horse, who was intently
occupied with Leslie, Fairfax, Manchester, and
others of the chief commanders, in ordering their
array so as to intercept the gallant host of
royalists
,
some twenty thousand strong, with which
Prince Rupert had wellnigh surprised them in their
trenches. Night fell upon them ere the task was
well completed; yet such was the determination
and the spirit of the leaders, such the quick
apprehension
and obedience of the soldiery, that, by the
aid of torches and the long summer twilight, their
position was made good; and that, too, on the
strongest ground that could be chosen from the
extensive
,
low, and somewhat marshy meadows lying
between the Ouse and the great Northern road.
Provisions were served out, with liquor, in
abundance
to the troops, who, for the most part, passed
the night upon their arms, though some were
quartered
in the neighbouring villages, commanding the
anticipated line of Rupert's march. Patrols of
horse and foot swept the surrounding roads; the
officers, with jealous zeal, made constant circuits
of the host, their progress being clearly indicated
by the acclamations of the men, and the loud
psalms of exultation and defiance which usually
answered their inspiriting addresses. Yet was
their active energy on this occasion destined to be
wasted; for scarcely was their host arrayed, ere
the discharge of ordnance from the town, and the
tremendous cheering, which was distinctly borne
to the ears of the now disappointed puritans,
announced
that Rupertwho, by the aid of better
information
and the exertion of great military skill,
had executed a detour far to the right of their
position
was
actually entering the beleaguered city
from the eastward side, whence they had drawn
their troops in the vain hope to intercept him.
Great was the consternation and dismay which this
discovery created in the breast, not of the privates
only, but of the best and boldest leaders of the
parliament
;
and in no less degree did merriment and
wild triumphant revelry possess the citizens,
relieved
beyond their utmost expectation.
Throughout
the livelong night the eastern sky was
reddened
,
wellnigh to the zenith, by the crimson glare
of bonfires blazing in every street and court within
the walls; while the square towers of the minster,
illuminated by the fierce discoloured light, were
visible distinctly at some miles' distance, their huge
bells swinging to and fro, a deafening peal of
shortlived
exultation. Upon the moor a council was
called instantly, and sentries posted round the
quarters
of the Scottish general, with the avowed
intention
of maintaining an inviolable secrecy
concerning
the debates of the stern martialists assembled
there. Such was, however, the tumultuous and
noisy character of the discussion between the
English
officers and the fanatical enthusiastic
Presbyterian
clergy, whom the Scotch brought habitually
into their warlike councils, that no precaution could
have hindered the entire army from perceiving
that dissensions, fired by their religious
differences
,
and fed to wilder heat by prejudice and
national disgusts, had fallen, with a perilous and
most pernicious influence, upon their leaders. It
was now nearly dawn, when, breaking up their
long-protracted session, they at length came forth.
Despondency and gloom sat heavy on the resolute
and manly brow of Fairfax as he strode forth and
leaped into his saddle, without altering his garb,
though in immediate prospect of a general action.
He was not, indeed, utterly unarmed, for he had
entered the court-martial with but brief time for
ceremony, after toiling from the preceding
day-break
at the evacuation of the trenches; yet did
he lack much of the heavy armature which was
still worn by officers in high command. A buff
coat, richly laced with silver, its open sleeves
displaying
the white satin of its lining; stout breeches
of the same material, fringed at the knee with costly
Flanders lace; and boots of russet leather, formed
the chief part of his defensive dress, although he
wore a short but highly polished breastplate, half
covered by his falling collar from the looms of
Valenciennes
,
and by the sash of crimson silk and
gold which was wound many times about his waist,
supporting his long silver-hilted broadsword. He
bore his truncheon in his hand, and, ere he
mounted
,
buckled on his head the open bacinet of steel
peculier to the day, which an attendant held in
readiness. Upon the faces of the other generals
anger, irresolution, and disgust were variously but
strongly written; and in the features of the
Scottish
tords especially, Ardenne imagined he could
trace a settled disaffection for the service they had
bound themselves to execute. No time was lost,
however, and, by a series of manuvres, not less
judiciously than rapidly effected, the whole position
of the army was reformed and taken up anew; so
that its front, which had originally faced toward
the west, as to oppose an enemy advancing against
York from that direction, was now turned easterly,
in readiness to meet the sally, which they hoped,
rather than expected, to be made on them from
that same city. Sir Thomas Fairfax, with his
new-levied Yorkshire cavalry and three Scotch
regiments of horse, held the extreme right wing,
and next to him the infantry of his brave father,
with two brigades of Scottish horse in readiness
for his support. In the main body and reserve
were all the regiments of Scottish foot, appointed
well and officered by their own covenanting lords,
and two of Manchester's brigades; while the left
wing was occupied by Cromwell, with all his iron
cavalry, and three good regiments of Northern
cuirassiers under Lieutenant-general Leslie, and
Colonel Frizell's regiment of Berwickshire
dragoons
,
who did good service in the action, posted
yet farther to the left, by a cross ditch intersecting
the main dike, which ran along the whole front of
the puritans, excepting a brief space before the
Earl of Manchester's pike-regiments. The plain,
upon the western side of which the army was
drawn up, was, on the whole, well suited for a
general
action, being of considerable extent, entirely
open, and untraversed by any hedge or fence save
on the left, where a long narrow lane between high
banks and bushes of old thorn debouched upon the
field, forming the only pass by which Fairfax could
cross the drain and bring his horsemen into action.
The rear of the parliamentarians was covered by
the thickly-planted orchards, each with its quickset
fence, the narrow garths and gardens surrounded
by stout walls of limestone, and the young
plantations
round the straggling village of Long
Marston
;
which, with its solid cottages of masonry,
would form an excellent and easily-defended point
whereon to fall back if repulsed from their original
position; while on both wings the strong
enclosures
of the pasture fields, studded with hedgerow
timber, would present most serious obstacles to
any movement of the enemy to overflank them.
Of all the generals, it seemed to Edgar that
Cromwell
was the least disturbed in mind or aspect;
yet even he, as he addressed his ironsides, spoke
not with the short, terse, and energetic style which
he was wont to use when he chose to be
understood
,
but in interminable and confused harangues,
resembling more the doctrinal discourses of a
fanatical
and visionary preacher than the
heart-stirring
oratory of a dauntless captain; nor did he
hesitate to declare openly to Ardenne, when at a
little distance from the troopers, thatOf a truth,
there is sore need of prayer and supplication
not of lip-service or knee-bendingbut of
soul-searching
cries, of earnest and continual wrestling
with the Lord; for verily, unless he work great
things this day in Israel's behalf, verily, Edgar
Ardenne, you shall behold this host melting away
like now before the April sunshine. Unless the
God, even the God of Battlesharden the hearts
and blind the understanding of yon perverse and
fiery Rupert, even as of yore he hardened the heart
of Pharaoh, that he might bring him to destruction,
with his captains, and his chariots, and his
horsemen
unless
he do all this, and more, I tell thee,
we shall fall into the pit ourselves have digged!
If the prince have but wisdom to abide in yon
fenced city which he has won from us, then shall
you see the carnal-minded and the feeble-witted of
the hostthose who, like babes and sucklings, may
not endure the rich meats and strong waters of the
Wordthose who are ill-assured, self-seekers, and
backslidersthen shall you see all these, and they
outnumber half our army, falling away by tens, by
hundreds, and by thousands! But lo! he added,
in a quick, clear voice, strangely at variance with
the drawling snuffle he had thus far adopted,
whom have we here? Tidings, I trow, from my
lord general; for, as he spoke, a youthful officer
dashed at a hasty gallop up to his side, and
checking
,
for a moment's space, his fiery horse, The
earl, he cried, lieutenant-general, prays you
will hold yourself in readiness for instant action!
Rupert and Newcastle are even now without the
gates, and marching hitherward to fight us!
Said I not, shouted Oliver, so loudly that
every one of his own cavalry might catch the
import
of his wordssaid I not that the Lord would
harden the heart of our foe and blind his
understanding
?
The Lord he is on our side; blessed
be the name of the Lord! and instantly he raised,
with his own tongue, the first notes of a hymn, in
which he was accompanied at once by full five
thousand deep and manly voices.
Not unto usnot unto us be given
The glory and the praise
Nor to the mortal sword
Though shrewdly we have striven
Long nights and bloody days
But unto thee, O Lord!
The fierce sounds rolled along the front, from
corps to corps, till one half of the host had kindled
with the same enthusiastic confidence and swelled
the same high chorus! It was one of those bright
flashes of that brightest talent in a leader, the talent
of inspiring trust, of awakening energy and zeal,
of lighting into sudden flame the hearts of
thousands
by a single worda talent, by-the-way, in
which no captain ever has excelled, and probably
but two
[2]
[2]
Mohammed and Napoleon.
have ever in the least degree approached
the wondrous man who was that very day about
to make himself a reputation with the mightiest.
As the thunders of that glorious psalm rolled
onward
,
gaining strength at every pause, and echoing
for miles around, doubt and despondency passed
instantly awaypulses, that but an hour before
had throbbed with cold and feeble beatings, now
leaped exultinglyeyes, that had rested sullenly
Vol. I.Y
upon the earth, flashed cheerfully and vividly to
the new-risen sunand tongues, that had half
uttered words of evil omen, and almost of fear,
now swelled the warlike anthem to the skies.
Before the psalm had yet well ceased, and while
its echoes were still alive and ringing in the air,
the pikeheads of the royal foot might be seen
twinkling in the level sunbeams above the
coppices
and furze-brakes that fringed the east side
of the plain. And now a massive column burst
into open view, their bright steel sallets and their
coats of plate reflecting in broad sheets the light,
which flashed in long and dazzling streaks from
their tall weapons as they wheeled up into line
and now a strong brigade of field artillery, its
caissons and its tumbrils following, came
rumbling
up at a full trotand now, with many a
blazoned standard streaming, and a white sea of
plumes floating above them, squadron after
squadron
of that superb and highborn cavalry, to which
the king owed all his previous victories, rounded a
distant wood, and formed in accurate array upon
the royal left. Then, as these formed, the heads
of column after column debouched upon the plain,
their mounted leaders darting along their flanks
and fronts, their music sounding joyously, and the
thick trampling of their march shaking the very
ground beneath themas these fell in, another
train of field-pieces and a yet more magnificent
array of horse wheeled up at the full gallop, and
fronted Cromwell's ironsides at a mile's distance
on the open plain. By seven of the clock both
armies were in full array of battle, facing each
other, when a gallant group of mounted officers
advanced a little from the centre of the cavaliers,
and instantly, amid the blare of trumpets and the
exulting shouts God save the king of the brave
gentlemen who mustered under it, the royal
standard
,
with its gorgeous quarterings, was displayed
to the light breeze, which bore its folds to their
full length, and shook them toward the squadrons
of its unrelenting foes. At the same moment,
from the midst of the dark masses of the puritans,
coldly arrayed in buff and plain gray steel, with
neither scarf, nor plume, nor lace of silver or of
gold to break the dull monotony of their
appearance
,
was hoisted the blue banner of the covenant, bearing St. George's cross of red, but not yet
intersected
by the white diagonals of Scotland's
patron saint. The elevation of this broad
dark-coloured
sheet was greeted by a stern and solemn
acclamation, as different from the wild and
animated
clamour of the cavaliers as is the deep
incessant
booming of the ocean-surf from the sharp
keen explosions of a thunder-storm. Then
followed
a short pausea fe
l and appalling interval
of quiet, like the brief space that often intervenes
between the mustering of the storm-clouds and
the outbreaking of the hurricane. The faces of
the bravest paled, and their pulses beat with a
quickened and irregular motion, not from the
slightest
touch of fear, but from the intense violence of
their excitement. Prayers were recited in this
interval at the head of every regiment among the
parliamentarians, and many of the officersand
not a few even of the private troopersmen whom
the spirit of the Lord had blessed with the high
gift of expounding mysteriesheld forth in their
wild jargon, savouring to the ears of Edgar rather
of blasphemous and profane phrensy than of
devotion
or well-ordered piety. It was at this
conjuncture
just
as Cromwell had concluded a long
and fervent prayer, tinctured at times with true
heartfelt religion, bursting occasionally into gleams
of real eloquence, and throughout fixing the
attention
of the zealots, who applauded him from time
to time with voice and gesturethat the same
group of officers which had displayed the royal
standard galloped in full career along the whole
front of the cavaliers midway between the armies.
The leading officer, as Edgar gazed upon him
through his perspective-glass, was a tall,
strongly-built
,
and splendidly-accoutred man, superbly
mounted on a jet-black barb of the tall breed of
Dongolahis cuirass literally blazed with stars
and decorations of a dozen military orders; his
mantle of dark purple velvet, fringed and laid down
with lace of gold three inches broad, displayed the
diamond insignia of the garter, and his
high-crowned
Spanish hat was overshadowed by an
ostrich plume nearly two feet in height. Yet were
his features coarse and ill-favoured, marked with a
supercilious sneer, and an expression ill-humoured,
haughty, and imperious; his hair, which flowed
far down his shoulders, was harsh and quite
uncurled; his figure, too, though tall and powerful,
was graceless; his body corpulent and gross,
betraying symptoms of debauchery and license,
as plainly as his countenance reflected a mind
despotic
,
brutal, and self-willed. The most profound
respect attended his swift passage through the
lines, and ever and anon some change of station
or some delicate manuvre was executed on his
bidding; but, when he reached the extreme right
of the royalists, he paused some time in deep and
earnest contemplation of the post occupied by
Cromwell with his cavalry, which were even then
engaged in chanting one of their vengeful and
prophetic hymns. Then sending off a dozen
officers
on the full spur in different directions, he
cantered coolly forward with but two attendants,
and these private troopers, till he was distant scarce
three musket shots from the grim ironsides. Here
he again drew in his horse, leaped to the ground,
and, levelling his glass upon the pommel of his
demipique, swept the array of Oliver with careful
scrutiny. Edward had from the first concluded that
this leader was no other than the impetuous and
daring Rupert; had he, however, doubted it, the
bitter imprecations and fierce shouts of the excited
puritans, to whom his cruelty and his successes
had rendered him an object of especial hatred,
must have at once convinced him. But he had
little time for observation; for Rupert, in his
audacious reconnaissance, had, as it seemed,
miscalculated
his own distance from Frizell's Scotch
dragoons, or overlooked the ditch that ran obliquely
from their station to a point within a few yards of
the elevation he had chosen, as commanding much
of the parliament's positionan oversight which
escaped not that experienced officer. A dozen of
his men, as the prince halted, had dismounted
from their horses, and, with their arquebuses
ready and their matches lighted, stole on from
bush to bush, behind the bank, unseen and
unsuspected
by the engrossed and anxious leader, till
within short carbine distancethen, flash after
flash, their scattering fire burst from the
willow-bushes
and the tufts of flags that lined the
water-course
and,
ere the sharp reports had reached the
ears of Ardenne, one of the prince's followers
leaped up in his saddle, and fell dead at his
general's
feet, while the perspective-glass dashed from
his fingers, and the white plume severed by
another
bullet, showed how well-aimed and
narrowly-escaped
had been the volley destined for
Rupert's
person. The charger of the fallen
trooper
dashed masterless across the field, followed
Y 2
with nearly equal speed by the surviving soldier,
who halted not till he had reached his comrades
but he whose life was aimed at more peculiarly
did not so much as look toward the enemy, whose
fire had so nigh slain him, till he had raised his
follower from the bloody sod, and ascertained that
aid was useless. Then, quietly remounting, he
shook his clinched hand in the air at the dragoons,
who had reloaded and were now in open view
preparing for a second shot, and trotted leisurely
away toward his chosen horsemen.
Scarce had this passed ere Edgar's notice was
attracted by the raised voice of Cromwell, on
whom he had been hitherto in close attendance,
but who had ridden a short space to the left to give
some orders to the colonel of one of his own
regiments
.
His words were lost to Ardenne from
the distance; but, by the short stern intonation of
his accents, he knew that something was amiss,
and galloped up to him at once. The officer whom
Cromwell had addressed was sitting motionless
before his regiment, his bridle loose upon his
charger's neck, his open hands raised upward, his
dull and heavy features lighted up by a phrensied
glare, and his voice rolling forth sentence after
sentence
of unconnected texts, strung, as it were,
together
by a running commentary of his own
ill-digested
ravings.
Heard you me not? Ho! Colonel Obadiah
Jepherson, shouted the general close in his
ears, his features kindling and his voice
quivering
with rage, heard you me not command you
straightway to despatch troops to bring up the
fascines
,
that, when we list advance, we may have
wherewithal to cross the ditch! Heard you not,
or do you dare to disobey me?
Must I not, then, replied the other, in a
drawling tone, as Balak said to Balaam, `must I
not take heed to speak that which the Lord hath
put into my mouth?'  and, turning toward the
troops, he again went onWherefore be ye as
those, O brethren, whom the Lord set apart to
Gideon
But not for many words did he continue his
oration; for, plunging both his spurs up to the
rowel-heads into his mighty charger, and plucking
forth a pistol from his holster, Oliver dashed
against him. Leaving the rein at liberty, by the
mere pressure of his limbs he wheeled the horse,
as he was on the point of riding down his
disobedient
officer, and, seizing with his left hand the
collar of his buff coat, with the right he pressed
the muzzle of his weapon to his temples; and with
such violence that, when the pistol was withdrawn,
a livid ring remained on the indented and
discoloured
flesh.
Now, by the Lord that liveth, he hissed
between
his set teeth, but in a whisper so emphatic
and distinct that all around him heard itif you
but wink an eyelid, much more speak, or move to
disobey me, it were better for thee thou hadst
ne'er been born! Away! and do my bidding, dog,
or you shall die the deathand, as he spoke, he
shook him off so suddenly that he had wellnigh
lost his saddle as he turned hastily away to set
about his duty with as much alacrity as though
he did so of his own free will. At the same time
a loud sharp roar told that the action had
commenced
;
and, riding once more to his station,
Edward
beheld a snow-white cloud surge slowly up
toward the royal lefta bright flash followed
another burst of dense and solid smokeanother
sharp explosionand then, each after each, they
woke the cannon of the cavaliers, till their whole
front was veiled in wreathed smoke, drifting
toward
the parliament's array, and filling all the
intermediate
space as with a palpable and massive
substancewhile the continuous and deafening roar
precluded for a while the possibility of hearing, and
almost of thought. Anon the answering ordnance
of the puritans belched forth its flame and smoke,
and added its din to the awful uproar. At times,
when the clouds melted for a moment under the
freshening breeze, Edgar and his yet more
observant
leader might catch glances of the royal
pikemen
pouring in solid columns to the charge, the
long lines of their levelled weapons glittering
through the smokeor, farther to their right, the
masses of their horse, wheeling like flights of
seabirds to and fronow all in gorgeous
sunshine
,
and now all in gloom. Meanwhile the
rattling
of the musketry was mingled with the deeper
bellowing of cannon; and, among all and over all,
the thundering accents of that most potent of all
vocal instruments, the voice of man, pealed upward
to the polluted heavens. A long half hour elapsed,
and they might hear the battle raging at every
instant
fiercer toward their right, yet they remained
still unengaged themselves, and without tidings or
directions how to act.
By Heaven, cried Ardenne, as he caught the
distant glitter of the royal standard floating among
the smoke almost within the puritan positionby
Heaven, our right must be repulsed; and, as he
spoke, an aid-de-camp dashed in, wounded and
ghostly, from the right; and, as he reined his
charger
up, the gallant brute fell lifeless under him.
Fairfax is beaten back, and all our right wing
scattered, he exclaimed as he arose.
Silence, man, Cromwell sternly interrupted
him. Wouldst thou dismay all these? Say on
but here apart, and not above your breath, an you
would live to speak it out! Say on!
Fairfax is beaten utterly, and all the right wing
brokenyou may not find two score of it together.
As he charged through you accursed lane, the
musketry of Belial mowed his ranks like grass
before the scytheand lo! the sons of Zeruah
Tush! tell me not of Belial and of Zeruah!
or, by the life of the Eternal, I will smite thee with
my truncheon! Speak out in plain blunt English,
again interrupted Oliver. Fairfax was broken
and what then?
His Yorkshire levies, flying all disorderly,
replied
the officer, confused and panting still from
the effects of his late fall, trampled beneath their
feet and utterly dispersed Lord Ferdinando's foot;
Balgony's lancers only broke one royal regiment,
and stout Sir Thomas, with but six troops of all
our northern horse, has cut his passage through
the cavaliers. These are now struggling
hitherward
the
rest are routed past redemption!
Lucas
,
and Porter, and the malignant Goring are
playing
havoc on the flank of our best Scottish foot, and
Newcastle, with all his whitecoats, is winning way
in front at the pike's point.
What message from the general? Quick, sir,
cried Cromwellquick!
That you draw out with all despatch, and
charge Prince Rupert!
Why said you not so sooner? Oliver replied.
Thou, Righteous Lambert, ride to Jepherson;
bid him advance with the fascines and fill you
ditch! Hulton and Barnaby, off with you to the
first and second regiments; we will advance and
cross the drain at a brisk trot, andHa! their
ordnance ceases on the left; Rupert will meet us
straightway! Forward!advance! Ardenne, be
near me thou! Forward! Sound trumpets; and at
a quick trot they advanced, but in the deepest
silence
,
save for the clashing of their armour and the
earth-shaking clatter of their hoofs. Ha!
Oliver
exclaimed again, as a quick spattering volley
on their left was heard distinctly, though the
smoke-wreaths
were too closely packed to suffer objects
to be seen above a spear's length distantthere
goes the musketry of Frizelland now we clear
the smoke! and, even with the words, they passed
the ditch, which was filled level with the surface
just at the moment of their reaching it; and, as
they passed it, the dense clouds from the royal
cannon, which, after the discharge had ceased,
sailed
sluggishly down wind and hung about the
puritans
some minutes longer than around the cavaliers,
soared slowly upward, and disclosed the whole of
that eventful field. One glance showed Cromwell
that the whole right of their position was indeed
brokenscattered to the four winds of heaven
and that their centre, though supported by the
whole reserve, could scarce maintain itself against
the desperate odds with which it was engaged;
though, by the fast and rattling volleys, and the
repeated charges of the pikemen, he saw that all
was not yet over!
The second glance showed him the prince in
person, with the whole gallant cavalry of his right
wing, advancing at full trot to charge him, with
scarce five hundred yards between them; while a
strong mass of pikemen, intent on turning the
extreme
left of the Scottish centre, had advanced so
far beyond their horse as to expose a portion of
their own right flank. Ardenne! he shouted,
with a voice clear as a trumpet, away! A flying
charge upon the flank of yon pike-regimentride
over them, wheel promptly, and fall in upon the
left flank of Prince Rupert! Buxton, ride thou to
Frizell, and tell him not to charge, but to deploy
and to maintain his fire! for life! for life! Now
for the work. Gallop! ho! Charge! Down with
the sons of Zeruah! Ha! ha! the sword of the
Lord and of Gideon!
An instant was enough; his messengers rode
like the wind; and with a mighty shout, that rose
above the thousand fearful sounds that mingled to
make up the thundrous voice of battle, the ironsides
plunged headlong on the advancing cavaliers. Five
thousand horse at least on either side, splendid in
all the vain equipments that cast a false and fleeting
light of glory over the ghastly face of havoc! On
they wentman to man, and horse to horse,
panting
for bloodshed as for the breath of lifedrunk
with excitementthoughtless of all except the
present! The trumpets of the royalists were
scarcely audible among the yells and shouts of the
wild fanatics. Ha! Zerubbabel! Down with
the cursed of God! Ho! Napthali; on, Benjamin!
Strike, and spare not! strike in
his
nameeven
his
own
name,
Jah
! The phrensy of their onset,
for they charged like madmen rather than cool and
steady veterans, together with the slight confusion
which always must be felt by an assailing party,
which in the very moment of attack is suddenly
assailed, would have gone hard against the
cavaliers
;
but when to this was added the continual
and well-aimed fire of Frizell's Scotch dragoons,
cutting down horse and man along their right by
hundreds; and when the fresh and gallant
regiment
of Ardenne, whichhaving fallen at an
oblique
tangent on the right flank of the pikemen,
and driven through them like a thunderbolt with
an unbroken fronthad wheeled, without a second's
pause, above the dead and dying, as orderly as on
parade, and charged full on the naked left of
Ruperts
cavalryit was no wonder that they were
cast into complete and irretrievable disorder! For
some time all was close and deadly conflictfor
such was the ecstatic valour of the gentlemen who
battled for the crown, and such the rash and stubborn
daring of their leader, that they persisted still,
rallying
in squadrons or in troopswhen their whole
line was broken and confusedand still, when
these were routed, rushed on in desperate knots of
ten OF twelve against the victors, and dealt them
death on every hand, with pistol, carbine-but, and
broadsword! Five times, at least, did Rupert rally
his own regiment, and bring it up to be again
repulsed
;
and, in the last charge, singling Ardenne
out, whose prowess he had noticed in the mele,
he drove his horse against him, and smote him
such a blow as shivered the tried rapier which he
raised to guard it to the hilt, and, falling thence
with scarce abated violence upon his morion, cleft
it down to the hair, but, deadened by the trusty
steel, inflicted no wound on the wearer. It was
well for Edgar that at this moment a fresh charge
by Fairfax, Crawford, and Balgony, who had come
up from the right wing across the rear, was made
with equal skill and executionwhile Cromwell
drew off and reformed his troopsbearing the
prince and all his bravest backward, pushing his
squadrons, utterly defeated, clear off the field, and
chasing them with fearful havoc to the very walls
of York.
A little interval ensued while they called off
their stragglers, eager for vengeance, and scattered
by the mele; but, ere ten minutes had elapsed,
the ironsides, though thinned in number and above
half of them wounded, were under their own
colours
and in their regular ranks. Ten minutes more
flew by, and nothing was yet donethey held the
ground with not a foe before themwhile on their
right the enemy's whole infantry, whose flank, by
the defeat of Rupert, was open to their charge, was
gradually pushing back their own foot, step by step,
at the pike's point, from their position. Amazed
at this delay, and fearing some mishap, Ardenne
intrusted his command to his lieutenant, and,
mounting a fresh horse, galloped off in search of
Cromwell, whom he found bleeding fast from two
wounds, both above his shouldersone in the neck,
a graze, as it was said, by a chance pistol-shot from
his own men; the other a smart sword-cut on the
collar-boneand evidently faint and failing from
the loss of blood.
A surgeon, ho! cried Edgar; bear him away
to the rear!
Not for the world, said Oliver, in a low voice,
but stern. Shall I go while the Lord has need
of me? Form to the right, brave hearts, and
follow
me! The sword of the Lord and of Gideon!
and, making a last effort to lead them to the charge,
he tottered in his stirrups, and would have fallen
had not two subalterns supported him and borne
him to the rear.
What now, lieutenant colonel? exclaimed
Jepherson from the head of the next regiment as
Cromwell was conveyed away.
Heard you not then the general's order?
answered
Ardenne. Each regiment form open
column
to the right by troops, and charge all on the
flank of yon dense mass of musketeers and
pikemen
!
Thou, Jepherson, wheel round upon the rear
of you brigade of whitecoatsthou, Desborough,
cut thy way through yonder pikemen. Sound
trumpets
!
forward all!
And on they went, with nothing to oppose or
Vol. I.Z
stand before them. Regiment after regiment, taken
in flank or rear, were cut down, trampled under
foot dashed out of the very shape and semblance
of array. But now they reached the whitecoats;
Newcastle's own brigade, of musketeers and
pikemen
mingled, four thousand strong, picked men,
flushed with success and valiant. Well was it
then that Ardenne had wheeled Jepherson upon
their rear; for, as he came upon their flank, while
they were fighting hard in front with the Scotch
infantry, they formed a second face with admirable
skill, and opened on him such a fire from their
second and rear ranks as emptied wellnigh half
his saddles, while their pikes presented an
impenetrable
rampart against his gallant horses.
With difficulty he rallied his own regiment and
again brought it to the charge; and, at the
self-same
instant, Jepherson burst upon their rear.
Assailed
upon three sides at once, they broke; but
fought it out even then, standing in small groups,
back to back, refusing quarter to the last, and lying
in their lines when dead as they had fought when
living! Oh, noble victims! thanklessly sacrificed
in the upholding of a tyrant against their country's
freedom! slain innocently in an evil cause! Alas!
alas for their free English blood, poured out like
water on their native soil, not to defend, but to
destroy its liberties!
With the destruction of the whitecoats the
battle
in truth ended; for, though a greencoated
brigade
still offered stout resistance, it was but a last
effort of despair. The parliament's whole centre,
now relieved from their assailants, moved steadily
and promptly up, pursuing the advantage gained
by the gallant ironsides, and pressing on the
scattered
parties of the royalists with such relentless
zeal, that they could never rally till they had
reached
the walls of York. Whole squadrons pushed
into the Ouse, were drowned in its deep waters, or
pitilessly slaughtered on its banks. The cavalry,
with Ardenne at their head, meanwhile still drove
right onward; and, wonderful to tell, traversed the
whole position of the enemy, from end to end, in
perfect and unbroken order, sweeping the relics
of that disastrous fight before them as the surf
drives the wreck which its own violence has made
before its foaming waters. Then, having reached
the farthest royal left, they wheeled once more to
the right, and actually occupied the ground which
Lucas, with his cavaliers, had held at the beginning
of the action. The only enemy now left upon the
field were these same victors; who, having
conquered
Fairfax and his tumultuary levies, had
pressed with much success upon the flank of
Manchester's and Lindsay's regiments of foot, till
these stout squadrons, when relieved by Edgar's
overwhelming charge upon their enemies in front,
found leisure to concentrate all their efforts against
the cavalry which had so nigh defeated them, and
were in turn repulsing them; when, on the very
spot where they had first so roughly handled
Fairfax and his northern horse, Ardenne fell on
them unawares, and well avenged his comrades.
In this last conflict the ground was broken with
steep banks and scattered bushes, and the deep
channel of the drain alluded to above. Here, as
before, the fight was obstinate, and hand to hand,
among the troopswhen, just as Edgar's men drove
Lucas back, killing his horse and making himself
prisoner, while all was smoke, and tumult, and
confusion, a small but well-appointed troop of
cavaliers
wheeled round some alder-bushes and charged
home. These, for a moment, threw his force into
disorder, but unsupported and too weak in numbers,
they fell fast, and at the last drew offtheir leader
fighting desperately to cover their retreat, till a
shot struck his charger; and, as he rolled upon
the gory and hoof-dinted sod, a savage fanatic
shortened his sword to stab the prostrate rider.
Edgar's eye caught a glimpse of the gray hairs
and noble features that were now disclosed,
blood-stained
and ghastly, by the falling of his battered
monon. With a fierce cry he bounded from his
horsehe washe was in time! He struck one
rapier up, received another, which he could not
parry in his own sword-arm; but he had saved
his father. It was not he alone, however, who
had perceived Sir Henry's perila desperate rally
of his followers was made to rescue himthe tide
of fight had rolled away after the flying cavaliers
of Lucas; and in an instant, ere he could strike a
blow or shout his war cry, Ardenne, second to
Cromwell only as the winner of that bloody day,
was made a captive, and borne off at a gallop by
the flyers from that very field on which his
conduct
and his valour had retrieved the fortunes of
his party when on the very verge of absolute
annihilation
.
END OF VOL. I.